Serum transaminase levels and cholescintigraphic abnormalities in acute biliary tract obstruction.Twenty-five patients presenting to the hospital with symptoms suggestive of acute biliary tract disease were noted to have a characteristic pattern of transaminase and cholescintigraphic abnormalities. There was marked variability in the initial serum transaminase levels; however, 16 patients had aspartate aminotransferase levels greater than 300 IU, and 19 patients had alanine aminotransferase values greater than 300 IU. Regardless of the initial values, there was a 76% (aspartate aminotransferase) and 58% (alanine aminotransferase) reduction in transaminase levels within 72 hours, prior to therapeutic relief of bile duct obstruction. In ten patients with common bile duct obstruction, cholescintigraphy revealed no excretion of technetium Tc-99m-labeled iminodiacetic acid, for up to two hours after injection, into the extrahepatic biliary tract or small bowel. Common bile duct stones were present in 16 patients, five patients had acute pancreatitis, and four patients were thought to have spontaneously passed common duct stones. We believe that high transaminase levels may be found in patients with obstructive biliary tract disease, sequential measurements of transaminase levels may provide an important diagnostic clue for biliary tract disease, and nonexcretion of radionuclide on cholescintigraphy may be a feature of acute bile duct obstruction.Exploration of the common bile duct--the relevance of the clinical picture and the importance of peroperative cholangiography.A series of 500 cholecystectomies performed over a 7-year period was reviewed retrospectively. The reliability of preoperative clinical features such as jaundice and pancreatitis was assessed in determining the presence of choledocholithiasis, and was found to be of limited value. Investigations such as intravenous cholangiography and liver function tests were found also to be inaccurate in the detection of common duct stones as was the appearance of the duct at operation. The usefulness of the peroperative cholangiogram in the detection of common duct stones that would otherwise have been overlooked is emphasized. Common duct stones would have remained undetected in 25 per cent of patients with choledocholithiasis. Despite the use of routine peroperative cholangiography common duct stones were overlooked in 11.25 per cent of patients who underwent exploration.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and gray-scale abdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of jaundice.Fifty-five patients with suspected obstructive jaundice were studied with both ERCP and abdominal ultrasound. Biliary tract obstruction was documented in 49 patients and parenchymal liver disease in 7. A definite cause of jaundice was demonstrated by ERCP in 45 of 49 patients with biliary tract obstruction but in only 28 of 49 patients by ultrasound. Bile duct dilatation, where present, was detected by ERCP in only 33 of 42 patients. ERCP was particularly effective in patients with common duct stones; common duct calculi and a dilated common duct were detected in 15 of 16 such patients. Dilated bile ducts where present were detected by ultrasound in 22 of 42 patients. Ultrasound was particularly helpful in patients with pancreatic cancer in whom a dilated common duct could not be opacified during ERCP. ERCP and abdominal ultrasound together provide a rapid and safe method of diagnosis in the jaundiced patient with suspected bile duct obstruction.Predictors of common bile duct lithiasis in laparoscopic era.To analyze retrospectively the records of 294 consecutive patients operated upon for gallbladder stones, to determine the predictive factors of synchronous common bile duct (CBD) stones and validate prospectively the generated model.The prognostic estimation of a biochemical test and ultrasonography alone to differentiate between the absence and presence of choledocholithiasis was assessed using receiver operating characteristics curve analysis. Multivariate analysis was employed using discriminant analysis for establishment of a best model. Prospective validation of the model was made.Discriminant forward stepwise analysis disclosed that high values (> or = 2 x normal) of SGOT, ALP, conjugated bilirubin and CBD diameter on ultrasound > or = 10 mm were all prognostic factors of CBD lithiasis in univariate and multivariate analysis, P< 0.01. History was not included in the model. Prospective validation of the model was performed by multivariate analysis using Visual General Stepwise Regression. Positive predictive value, when considering all these predictors, was 93.3%, while the negative predictive value was 88.8%. Sensitivity of the model was 96.5% and specificity 80%.The above model can be objectively applied to predict the presence of CBD stones.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy: laboratory predictors of choledocholithiasis.Liver function tests (LFTs) are most often employed to select patients for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and therapeutic sphincterotomy. Although ERC accurately detects CBD stones, the associated financial costs and potential morbidity argue against its indiscriminate use. We analyzed the value of LFTs to predict CBD stones in patients treated by laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). CBD stones were identified in 41 of 660 patients (6.2%) treated by LC during the study period (January 1991 to May 1993). CBD stones were identified by preoperative ERC in 19 of 33 patients (57.6%); by operative cholangiography in 18 of 289 patients (6.2%), and by postoperative ERC in 4 patients. In patients with CBD stones, there was a significant difference in alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, SGPT, and SGOT (P < 0.001). The positive predictive value (PPV) of a value > normal at admission was 5%-19%; and immediately before operation was 9%-36%. The PPV of a value > 2X normal was 30%-47%. Alkaline phosphatase and total bilirubin were independent predictors of CBD stones. If both were greater than twice normal, there was a 55 per cent incidence of CBD stones. Our analysis suggests that patients with greater than twice normal liver function tests have a sufficient incidence of CBD stones to warrant ERC. Patients without both these criteria should be managed by laparoscopic CBDE, with postoperative endoscopic stone retrieval for the failures of laparoscopic CBDE.Selective endoscopic cholangiography for the detection of common bile duct stones in patients with cholelithiasis.The detection and management of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy continues to be controversial. Several diagnostic and therapeutic strategies have been suggested. These include intraoperative cholangiography, selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography. The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of selective ERCP in detecting CBD stones in patients with cholelithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In a prospective study, patients with cholelithiasis who presented during a 6-year period were assessed on a selective basis with ERCP for suspected CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. ERCP was carried out if the patient had any of the following criteria: a dilated CBD on ultrasound, gallstone pancreatitis, or abnormal liver function tests. Intraoperative cholangiography was not performed in any of the patients. Long-term follow-up was undertaken.The study included 427 patients. On the basis of selective criteria, ERCP was carried out in 41 patients (9.6 %), with confirmed CBD stones in 22 cases (53.7 %). The most useful predictor of CBD stones on ERCP was the presence of a dilated CBD in association with abnormal liver function tests. In this situation, CBD stones were identified in 14 of 17 cases (82 %). Abnormal liver function tests alone had a sensitivity of 50 % (four of eight). All other parameters used in isolation had a lower detection rate. During a median follow-up period of 6 years (range 1-10 years), six of 386 patients (1.6 %) with initially normal imaging and biochemical tests presented again with retained stones. All were successfully managed by ERCP and sphincterotomy. There were no major complications.Preoperative selective ERCP is effective in detecting clinically significant CBD stones. However, there is a high false-negative rate when a single criterion is used to guide therapy. Multivariate analysis of preoperative parameters for risk stratification, in conjunction with other imaging modalities, may make it possible to minimize unnecessary ERCPs.[Ultrasonic diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].Potential of ultrasonic examination for diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was analyzed in 47 patients. Ultrasonic scanners Acuson 128XP and SONOLINE Elegra with 2-9 MHz sensors were used. Choledocholithisis was diagnosed during transabdominal echography in 38 (80.9%) patients. Method of ultrasound-assisted "vibratory" palpation for diagnosis of mobile concrements of the common bile duct is presented. Causes of 2 (4.3%) false-positive and 7 (14.9%) false-negative results of examination are analyzed.Radiology in laparoscopic cholecystectomy. A retrospective study.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is attempted in all our patients scheduled for cholecystectomy. The related standard radiologic procedures are preoperative ultrasonography (US) and preoperative cholangiography (PCA). In a retrospective study of 214 patients scheduled for LC over a 2-year period we have reviewed the radiologic and clinical records. Preoperative US revealed stones in the common bile duct (CBD) in 8 patients, all treated with endoscopic papillotomy before or after operation. PCA was successful in 176 patients (82%) and gave crucial information in 22 patients including 8 with stones in the CBD not preoperatively diagnosed, 6 with anomalous anatomy, and 8 with malpositioned surgical clip on the cystic duct. In 26 patients LC was converted into open surgery, but in only one case due to CBD stone revealed at PCA. Seventeen patients had minor postoperative complications, all managed conservatively. We consider preoperative US and PCA appropriate radiologic investigations in conjunction with LC.Gallstone pancreatitis: a prospective study on the incidence of cholangitis and clinical predictors of retained common bile duct stones.The aim of this study was to define the incidence of cholangitis in gallstone pancreatitis, in the absence of cholangitis, to identify the clinical predictors of persistent common bile duct (CBD) stones at endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP) or at intraoperative cholangiography (IOC).A total of 122 consecutive patients with acute gallstone pancreatitis were prospectively evaluated for the presence of CBD stones as determined by elective ERCP or IOC. Urgent ERCP was restricted to patients with concomitant cholangitis. APACHE II scores and serial laboratory data were obtained.Four (3%) patients had cholangitis and all underwent urgent ERCP successfully. Eighteen (15%) patients without cholangiogram were excluded. The remaining 100 patients underwent elective ERCP or IOC on a mean of hospital day 6.8. Twenty-one (21%) patients had persistent CBD stones. Univariate analysis detected significant differences in serum total bilirubin, ALT, and alkaline phosphatase levels between patients with and without persistent CBD stones. On multivariate analysis, serum total bilirubin on hospital day 2 was the best predictor of CBD stones. A serum total bilirubin level > 1.35 mg/dl had a sensitivity of 90.5% and specificity of 63%. Age, gender, mean APACHE II score, amylase, and presence of CBD dilation on ultrasound were not predictive of CBD stones.In patients with gallstone pancreatitis, 1) cholangitis is uncommon, and 2) the best clinical predictor of persistent CBD stones is serum total bilirubin on hospital day 2.[Diagnostic performance of biliary ultrasound vs. magnetic resonance cholangiogram in patients with recurrent biliary obstruction.].Obstructive jaundice in patients with previous cholecystectomy requires a precise diagnosis. In the diagnostic algorithm, biliary ultrasound (BUS) and magnetic resonance cholangiogram (MRC) are used, although the accuracy of each method is unknown in our setting. No previous comparison of US and MRC in subjects with cholecystectomy has been made.To determine diagnostic accuracy of BUS and MRC in patients with recurrent biliary obstruction.Patients with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopacreatography (ERCP) demonstrating recurrent biliary obstruction by stones were included. All patients underwent BUS and MRC. We determined the diagnostic performance of each image study compared with ERCP.Twenty-seven patients with a mean age of 62.9 +/- 17.3 years-old were included. Sensitivity and specificity of BUS were 0.12 and 0.58, respectively. Figures for MRC were 0.88 and 0.82. Diagnostic agreement between ERCP and MRC was k= 0.66 whereas BUS had a k of only 0.26.MRC had good diagnostic performance for recurrent choledocolithiasis. BUS demonstrated lower accuracy compared with previous reports, so should not be considered in the initial approach of recurrent choledocus obstruction.Selection criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the laparoscopic era.Indicators for cholangiography were originally designed to select patients at risk for common bile duct (CBD) stones for intraoperative cholangiography.To refine these criteria to apply to the much more invasive procedure of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Retrospective review of selection criteria for ERCP in consecutive patients referred over 18 months following the introduction of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Two ERCP units in adjacent teaching hospitals.Three hundred seventeen patients with gallstones and in situ gallbladders.Common bile duct imaging at ERCP.Abnormalities justifying ERCP.Abnormalities justifying ERCP were found in 66% of patients. This group differed significantly from those with normal ducts, with more being referred with abnormal results of all liver function tests (P < .001), jaundice (P < = .001), a dilated CBD on ultrasound (P < .001), or CBD stones on ultrasound (P < .001). On the other hand, patients with normal ducts were significantly more likely to have been referred with pancreatitis (P = .003) or elevated results of individual liver function tests (P < .001). A logistic regression model using age, presence of jaundice at ERCP, levels of alkaline phosphatase and albumin, and ultrasonography showing dilated ducts or visible CBD stones was found to have a specificity of 75% and a sensitivity of 89%. Past pancreatitis or elevated results of individual liver function tests were not predictive factors.The use of such a model rather than individual criteria would improve the selection of patients for preoperative ERCP, optimizing its role in the laparoscopic era.Ultrasound imaging of pancreas and biliary tract.Ultrasound and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) have been compared in the investigation of abnormalities of the pancreas and biliary tract. 208 patients undergoing ERCP were studied prospectively and all had an ultrasound examination in the 24 hours before ERCP. 15 patients had dilated bile-ducts for which no cause was seen on both ultrasound and ERCP; these patients were excluded. 120 of the remaining patients had an abnormal ERCP. In 101 ultrasound findings were in agreement (sensitivity 84%). 73 patients had a normal ERCP with ultrasound agreement in 70 (specificity 95%). The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasound is now such that patients can proceed directly to ERCP for diagnostic confirmation and papillotomy or endoprosthesis insertion where appropriate.Prospective evaluation of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in patients with biliary disease: comparative study with conventional ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography diagnostic algorithm.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is an accurate technique that can replace invasive diagnostic methods of the biliary and pancreatic duct.Our aim was to assess sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasonography using the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography as reference, and to establish a diagnostic algorithm under which circumstances magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography can replace endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Eighty-three patients with suspicion of biliary disease based on clinical, biochemical and ultrasonography findings were studied.Ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were performed, comparing the results of the techniques for the determination of their sensitivity and specificity.Sensitivity and specificity results obtained by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography were: 100 and 92.8% when dilated ducts were detected (n=61); 97.4 and 97.2% in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis (n=38); 100 and 96.7% in malignant lesions (n=14) and 81.8 and 98.4% when biliary ducts were normal. The percentage of images of diagnostic quality was 97.6%. Sensitivity and specificity achieved by ultrasonography was: 100 and 57.1% in detection of dilatation, 71 and 97.2% in choledocholithiasis, 92.8 and 96.7% in malignancy and 66.6 and 96.8% in normal ducts.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is a technique with high sensitivity and specificity in the evaluation of biliary ducts. Thus, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography may replace diagnostic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for purely diagnostic purposes, following an initial clinical and ultrasonographic exam.Reliability of ultrasounds in detecting common bile duct stones before biliary surgery. A retrospective analysis.The aim of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic benefit of US in the preoperative screening for CBD stones in patients submitted to surgery for biliary lithiasis.We analyzed the data of 135 patients admitted for biliary lithiasis, jaundice or biliary pancreatitis in the last three years. Mean age was 63 years (54.8% females), 48% of the cases had an urgent admission. US of the liver and biliary ducts was the first examination performed and the patients were divided in 2 groups on the bases of the results: those with the diameter of the CBD < 1 cm (101 pts-group A) and those with a diameter > 1 cm (34 pts-group B).In group A were subsequently performed: 35 IV cholangiographies (6 showed CBD stones, 1 was a false negative for CBD stones), 15 intraoperative (I.O.) cholangiographies (1 positive for CBD stones), 9 ERCP for jaundice or pancreatitis (2 positive for CBD stones). The incidence of CBD stones was 8.9% in this group. In group B were performed: 7 IV cholangiographies (2 showed CBD stones), 12 I.O. cholangiographies (6 showed CBD stones), 10 ERCP for jaundice or pancreatitis (7 showed CBD stones). The incidence of CBD stones was 44% in this group. CBD stones were detected by US in 2 cases (22%) in group A and in 6 cases (40%) in group B.In our patients there is a relatively high incidence of CBD stones (8.9%) in spite of a normal CBD at US. Considering that the minimally invasive approach for the gallbladder stones is becoming the "gold standard" and the laparoscopic treatment of the CBD stones is not widely diffused, it is important to know the presence of CBD stones before surgery. With this in mind US does not seem to be a reliable diagnostic tool and we suggest that before surgery an IV cholangiography (sensitivity > 95% in our experience) should be performed together with US and ERCP in selected cases. Moreover this could reduce the number of preoperative ERCP leaving the possibility to treat more selectively by endoscopic papillosphincterotomy the patients with CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Value of ultrasound and liver function tests in determining the need for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in unexplained abdominal pain.The value of serum liver function tests and abdominal ultrasound as screening tests of the need for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was determined in patients with unexplained abdominal pain without associated jaundice. In 1989 and 1990 1005 ERCPs were undertaken, of which 138 (14%) were for this indication. The duct or ducts of interest were delineated by ERCP in 95% of patients. The lesions found were bile duct stones in 10 patients, chronic pancreatitis in five, pancreatic carcinoma in one, peptic ulcer or duodenitis in four. A satisfactory ultrasound examination had been performed in 94% of patients. For chronic pancreatitis, its sensitivity was 60% and specificity 95%. For choledocholithiasis, the ultrasonic detection of duct dilatation or stones had a sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 86%. Of the liver function tests, the alkaline phosphatase was more sensitive (67%) than the transaminases (44%) in indicating the presence of bile duct stones and had a high specificity (95%). None of the 10 patients with duct stones had normal ultrasound and normal alkaline phosphatase. Thus it was found that demonstration of a normal common bile duct by abdominal ultrasound and normal serum alkaline phosphatase together have 100% specificity in excluding bile duct stones. Using such knowledge over the two year period of this study would have spared 36 patients the need for ERCP.Evaluation of the predictors of choledocholithiasis: comparative analysis of clinical, biochemical, radiological, radionuclear, and intraoperative parameters.This prospective study was performed to assess the predictive ability of the various indicators of common bile duct (CBD) calculi, individually or in combination, by analyzing 88 patients with gallstone disease. The patients were classified into two groups according to the presence of 10 predefined criteria. Of 53 patients with one or more risk factors (group 2), 26 harbored CBD calculi; none of 35 patients with no risk factors (group 1) had CBD stones. Jaundice correlated best, with a sensitivity of 69%; and pancreatitis had the lowest sensitivity (12%). Elevated serum bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels correlated better than liver enzymes and serum amylase. The sensitivity and negative predictive value of cholescintigraphy scanning for diagnosing CBD calculi were better than those of ultrasonography, the sensitivity being 84% versus 50% and the negative predictive value 95% versus 82%. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography was successful in 94% of the patients, and CBD calculi were diagnosed in 74%. Moreover, peroperative cholangiography was 100% sensitive with no false-positive results. Ultimately, a palpable stone at surgery was the best predictor. When all the criteria were analyzed, it was found that as the number of criteria increased so did the percentage of patients harboring CBD calculi.Preoperative determinants of common bile duct stones during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The aim of this study is to determine whether there are any clinical or biochemical predictors of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prospective database of nearly 1000 laparoscopic cholecystectomies performed under the care of a single surgeon with a standardised technique between 1999 and 2006, was analysed. Clinical presentation, ultrasound and immediate preoperative biochemical results as well as the operative cholangiogram findings were reviewed. Routine cholangiography was attempted in most patients and the primary outcome variable was the detection of bile duct stones. The data was analysed using chi-squared test for categorical variables. The significant variables on univariate analysis were further characterised to identify the independent predictors of bile duct stones using a logistic regression model (significance p < 0.05).A total of 757 of 988 patients (77%) underwent cholangiography. Male-to-female ratio was 1 : 3 with a median age of 54 years (range: 17-93). Ten per cent of patients had bile duct stones identified on cholangiography. On univariate analysis, jaundice (p = 0.019), cholangitis (p < 0.001), alanine transaminase > 100 (p = 0.024), alkaline phosphatase (ALP) > 350 (p < 0.001) and CBD > 10 mm (p = 0.01) were significant markers for predicting bile duct stones. Bilirubin > 30 (x2 normal) was found not to be significant (p = 0.145). On a logistic regression model, ALP > 350 and/or cholangitis were found to be independent predictive factors of CBD stones (odds ratio 6.1).If a policy of routine intra-operative cholangiography is not adopted, a history of cholangitis or a raised ALP immediately preoperatively should lead to a high suspicion of CBD stones.Clinical indications and accuracy of gray scale ultrasonography in the patient with suspected biliary tract disease.One hundred patients with suspected biliary tract disease underwent gray scale cholecystosonography (GSCS) and had diagnostic confirmation by oral cholecystogram (OCG) and/or operation. Ultrasonography demonstrated the gallbladder in 94 of the 100 patients; 2 patients had had previous cholecystectomy and 3 of the 4 remaining patients had documented stones with no confirmation of a nonvisualizing OCG in the other patient. Among the 88 patients with OCG, GSCS findings correlated in 91 per cent (2 per cent false-positive; 7 per cent false-negative). Among the 43 operative patients, GSCS was proven correct in 91 per cent (no false positive; 9 per cent false-negative). Of 12 patients with jaundice GSCS correlated with operative findings in 75 per cent (no false-positive; 25 per cent false-negative). Diagnostic errors occurred in patients with very small biliary calculi, particularly when a single stone was impacted in the cystic duct. Failure to identify the gallbladder with ultrasound signifies probable cholelithiasis in the patient without previous cholecystectomy. On the basis of this experience, we conclude that (1) GSCS is most useful when jaundice or acute illness precludes conventional studies; (2) GSCS provides an inexpensive, quick, accurate means of diagnosing cholelithiasis with a very high specificity (97 per cent) and moderate sensitivity (88 per cent); and (3) GSCS is the optimal diagnostic procedure for evaluating the biliary tract in the acutely ill, jaundiced, vomiting, allergic, and/or pregnant patient.Diagnosis of common bile duct stones by intravenous cholangiography: prediction by ultrasound and liver function tests compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography.Routine intravenous cholangiography using the safer contrast medium, meglumine iotroxate, may be a useful investigation prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for the detection of suspected common bile duct stones. We compared this with endoscopic cholangiography.Eighty-one consecutive nonjaundiced patients (mean age 62 years; range 20 to 90) with suspected common bile duct stones referred for endoscopic cholangiography to one center underwent intravenous cholangiography that was considered positive if it detected ductal stones. The ability of ultrasound scans and liver function tests to predict ductal stones was also assessed.Sixty patients had both endoscopic and intravenous cholangiograms performed. Thirteen out of 27 patients with ductal stones confirmed by endoscopic cholangiography had positive intravenous cholangiograms, and 29 out of 30 with no stones had negative intravenous cholangiograms. The sensitivity for intravenous cholangiography was 48%, specificity 97%, positive predictive value 93%, negative predictive value 67%, and accuracy 73%. For ultrasound scans the positive predictive value was 69%; negative predictive value was 78%. For liver function tests the positive predictive value was 68%; negative predictive value was 93%.Intravenous cholangiography cannot be recommended instead of endoscopic cholangiography except in situations where the latter is not readily available. Ultrasound and liver function tests are useful in predicting ductal stones.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the urgent diagnosis of common bile duct stones in acute pancreatitis.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria in predicting common bile duct (CBD) stones was analyzed in 76 patients with acute pancreatitis undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) during the same hospital admission. Forty patients had ERCP within 72 hours; cholangiography was successful in 92%. Fifty patients had biliary pancreatitis; 25 patients had CBD stones and all were successfully removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES). Twenty-six patients had nonbiliary pancreatitis. Two patients had complications from ERCP and/or ES; two patients died (no CBD stones) but ERCP was noncontributory. Significant differences were found between the biliary and nonbiliary disease groups with respect to age, and bilirubin. gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, alkaline phosphatase, alanine transaminase, and amylase levels. The first four factors also discriminated between those patients with and without CBD stones. Logistic discriminant functions were estimated providing probabilities for the presence of CBD stones for each patient but were too cumbersome for clinical use. A simple scoring system was devised on the basis of cut-off levels: bilirubin greater than or equal to 40 mumol/L, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase greater than or equal to 250 IU/L, alkaline phosphatase greater than or equal to 225 IU/L, and age greater than or equal to 70 years, indicating CBD stones. Bilirubin alone had a sensitivity and specificity of 80%; the specificity increased to 93% with all four factors. These results suggest that clinical and biochemical criteria and ERCP and/or ES may have important roles in the management of patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis.Comparative diagnostic evaluation with MR cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography and CT in patients with pancreatobiliary disease.The aim of this study was to directly compare the results of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) with those of ultrasonography (US) and multislice computed tomography (MSCT) in the diagnosis of pancreaticobiliary diseases.A total of 70 patients (41 men, 29 women) aged 22-89 years were studied either before (n=59) or after cholecystectomy (n=11) for biliary lithiasis. Clinical signs and symptoms were jaundice (n=15), abdominal pain (n=37) and proven biliary lithiasis (n=18). MRCP was performed in all patients, whereas abdominal US was performed in 55 (group 1) and MSCT in 37 (group 2) patients. A regional evaluation of the main structures of the pancreaticobiliary system was performed: gallbladder and cystic duct, intra- and extrahepatic bile ducts and main pancreatic duct. Histology (n=27), biopsy (n=5), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (n=28) and/or clinical-imaging follow-up (n=10) were considered standards of reference. In particular, patients were classified as showing benign (n=47) or malignant (n=12) lesions or normal biliary anatomy (n=11).In group 1, the results of MRCP and US were concordant in the majority (92%) of cases; however, statistically significant discordance (p<0.01) was found in the evaluation of the extrahepatic ducts, with nine cases (16%) of middle-distal common bile duct stones being detected on MRCP only. In group 2, the results of MRCP and MSCT were also concordant in most cases (87%). However, findings were significantly discordant when the intra- and extrahepatic ducts were analysed, with seven (19%) and six (16%) cases, respectively, of lithiasis being detected on MRCP only (p<0.01 for both).The results of our study confirm the diagnostic potential of MRCP in the study of the pancreaticobiliary duct system. In particular, the comparison between MRCP and US and MSCT indicates the superiority of MRCP in evaluating bile ducts and detecting stones in the common bile duct.Ultrasound diagnosis of bile duct calculi.Prediction of common bile duct stones in the earliest stages of acute biliary pancreatitis.Accurate prediction of common bile duct (CBD) stones in acute biliary pancreatitis is warranted to select patients for early therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). We evaluated commonly used biochemical and radiological predictors of CBD stones in a large prospective cohort of patients with acute biliary pancreatitis who were undergoing early ERCP.167 patients with acute biliary pancreatitis who were undergoing early ERCP (< 72 hours after symptom onset) in 15 Dutch hospitals in 2004 - 2007 were prospectively included. Abdominal ultrasonography and/or computed tomography (CT) was performed on admission and complete liver biochemistry determined daily. We used univariate logistic regression to assess associations between CBD stones found during ERCP (gold standard) and the following parameters: (1) clinical: age, sex, predicted severity; (2) radiological: dilated CBD, impacted stone in CBD; and (3) biochemical: bilirubin, γ-glutamyltransferase (GGT), alkaline phosphatase, alanine aminotransferase (ALT), and aspartate aminotransferase (AST).Out of 167 patients, 94 (56 %) had predicted severe acute biliary pancreatitis, 51 (31%) exhibited a dilated CBD and 15 (9%) had CBD stones on ultrasonography and/or CT. ERCP was performed at a median of 0 days (interquartile range 0 - 1) after admission. CBD stones were found during ERCP in 89/167 patients (53%). In univariate analysis, the only parameters significantly associated with CBD stones were GGT (per 10 units increase: odds ratio 1.02, 95% CI 1.01 - 1.03, P = 0.001) and alkaline phosphatase (per 10 units increase: odds ratio 1.03, 95% CI 1.00 - 1.05, P = 0.028). These and all other tested parameters, however, showed poor positive predictive value (ranging from 0.53 to 0.69) and poor negative predictive value (ranging from 0.46 to 0.67).The results of this study suggest that commonly used biochemical and radiological predictors of the presence of CBD stones during ERCP in the earliest stages of acute biliary pancreatitis are unreliable.[Ultrasonography and biliary calculi: a retrospective study on the diagnostic reliability].The Authors evaluated diagnostic reliability of echotomography in biliary tract lithiasis, reviewing a series of 130 patients (out of 171) who were surgically treated; 30 had proved to be affected with biliary main tract stones. A high rate of false negatives was documented as related to the diagnosis of lithiasis of the main biliary duct.[Alterations in laboratory tests as predictors of choledocholithiasis in patients who underwent ERCP: experience in a national private center].ERCP is very important in the management of common bile duct stones but it has associated morbidity.We analyze retrospectively records of 293 patients with suspected CBD stones to determine laboratory predictors of the pathology and improve the selection of patients for the examination. Sensitivity, specifity, predictive positive value and predictive negative value were calculated for alkaline phosphatase (FA), Total Bilirrubin (BT), TGO(AST) and TGO(ALT). We also compared values between patients with and without gallbladder suffering CBD stones confirmed by ERCP.293 patients had ERCP. 247 had CBD stones and 46 had no stones. OF the CBD stones group 58(23%) didn't have gallbladder and 187(77%) had gallbladder. Hepatic function tests FA, TGP y BT where all pronostic factors for CBD stones on univariate analysis with statistical value of p<0.01. Clinical presentation was not included in analysis. Age, TGO(AST) and GGTP didn't showed statistical significance.The predictors of CBD stones have better results when combined. The use of stricter selection criteria can reduce the number of normal exams and complications.Evaluation of the pattern of liver tests and yield of cholangiography in symptomatic choledocholithiasis: a prospective study.The role of ERCP in the management of choledocholithiasis in an era of minimally invasive therapy continues to be defined.We evaluated prospectively the pattern of liver test abnormalities and yield of cholangiography after presentation with illnesses suggesting choledocholithiasis. Ninety-four consecutive patients, all with liver test abnormalities (total bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, AST, and ALT) at presentation, had serial determinations to within 24 hours of cholangiography and were divided into four groups based on their patterns of rise or fall of liver test results as well as presenting clinical syndrome. Group I: normalized liver tests; Group II: falling liver tests, and alkaline phosphatase falling greater than 50% of the difference between presentation value and upper limit of normal; Group III: alkaline phosphatase falling less than 50%; and Group IV: any liver test with increasing levels. Clinical syndromes included cholangitis, pancreatitis, combined cholangitis and pancreatitis, and biliary pain with abnormal liver tests.Yields of choledocholithiasis were 13% (Group I), 50% (Group II), 67% (Group III), and 94% (Group IV). Yield by syndromes were 36% (biliary pancreatitis), 72% (biliary pain and abnormal liver tests), 87% (cholangitis), and 100% (cholangitis and pancreatitis).The degree of decline in liver test levels is inversely related to the yield of cholangiography in symptomatic choledocholithiasis; the yield of ERCP in these patients (with normalized liver tests) is low and they do not require ERCP. Pre-ERCP estimates of the likelihood of choledocholithiasis can be made on the basis of the pattern of liver tests, and biliary pancreatitis patients with normalized liver tests do not require ERCP.Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice.Fifty consecutive patients (32 males and 18 females) with cholestatic jaundice were examined by grey-scale ultrasound from June 1981 to June 1983. All patients were studied without access to case notes. All patients had a diagnosis established by subsequent liver biopsy, clinical course, surgery or autopsy. Using the presence or absence of a dilated biliary system as the criterion, intrahepatic or extrahepatic cholestasis was correctly differentiated in 48 of the 50 patients, giving an overall accuracy of 96%. All 16 patients with intrahepatic cholestasis were correctly identified. Two of the 34 patients with extrahepatic cholestasis, each of whom had biliary stones, were misdiagnosed as intrahepatic cholestasis. In the 34 patients with extra-hepatic cholestasis, site of obstruction was defined in 55.9%, and specific aetiology diagnosed in 44.1%. Ultrasound proves to be an accurate method for the evaluation of cholestatic jaundice, and would have a definite value as a screening test before proceeding to invasive studies.Factors predictive of bile duct stones in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis.The objective of the study was to investigate the accuracy of using preoperative data for the prediction of bile duct calculi in patients operated on for acute cholecystitis. 279 consecutive patients underwent cholecystectomy with peroperative cholangiography for acute calculous cholecystitis in the Department of Surgery, Lund University Hospital, between 1985 and 1991. The correlation between 13 preoperative clinical and laboratory variables, and the incidence of bile duct calculi was studied. Among the 13 variables tested, serum bilirubin concentration and serum gamma-glutamyltransferase activity were independent factors of predictive significance. These two factors were used for constructing an additive prognostic index for the presence of bile duct stones. Thus, three groups of patients could be identified having a 3, 7-9 or 59% risk of harboring bile duct stones, corresponding to a sensitivity of 61% and a specificity of 93% in predicting the presence of bile duct stones in the 'high-risk' group. Logistic regression analysis permits accurate preoperative identification of bile duct stones in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis.Rapid diagnosis of choledocholithiasis using biochemical tests in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The present study was designed to identify the biochemical tests which could detect the presence of common bile duct stones in patients with symptomatic gallstones, without other invasive investigations. The usefulness of biochemical tests may reduce the necessity of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy.3000 patients with symptomatic laparoscopic cholecystectomy scheduled for laparoscopic cholesystectomy were included in the study. 458 patients (201 men, 257 women; mean age, 57.7 +/- 14.6 yrs) were examined with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for suspected common bile duct stones. The serum tests for liver function, including a measurement of aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase, alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, direct bilirubin, gamma-glutamyltransferase and albumin were obtained on admission prior to the ultrasonography, and the endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The six significant factors, including alkaline phosphatase, direct bilirubin, total bilirubin, aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase and gamma-glutamyltransferase were identified by the univariate analysis and the multivariate logistic regression analysis which identified alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyltransferase, as the two significant independent factors. A statistical model was developed with a formula of [formula: see text] A curve of receiver operating characteristics was constructed to identify an alkaline phosphatase level greater than 300 U/L or a gamma-glutamyltransferase level greater than 420 mU/mL which would have both higher sensitivity and specificity.Biochemical tests can be a significant aid to the clinician's decision-making when predicting the presence of common bile duct stones in patients with gallstones.Useful predictors of bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. McGill Gallstone Treatment Group.The authors determined the most useful predictors of common bile duct (CBD) stones as diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Prospective and retrospective collection of historical, biochemical and ultrasonographic data was used. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis was used to determine optimal biochemical cut-off values. Multivariate analysis using logistic regression with generation of the best model identifying independent predictors of CBD stones also was employed. Prospective validation of the model was performed on an independent group of patients.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographies were performed before LC in 106 patients, and after LC in 33. Only four of ten clinical variables evaluated independently predicted the presence of CBD stones. The optimal model predicted a 94% probability of CBD stones in a patient older than 55 years of age who presented with an elevated bilirubin (over 30 mumol/L) and positive ultrasound findings (a dilated CBD, and a CBD stone seen on ultrasound). This model was validated prospectively in a subsequent series of 49 patients in which the probability of CBD stone was only 8% when all four predictors were absent.The identified independent clinical predictors of a CBD stone helps select a population of symptomatic gallstone bearers who benefit most from cholangiographic assessment.Grey scale ultrasonography: evaluating the jaundiced patient.Over a period of one year, 75 patients with jaundice were evaluated by grey scale ultrasonography. Intravenous cholangiography was attempted in 26 instances (bilirubin value greater than 4.3 mg/100 ml) and was diagnostic in only four. Ultrasound, on the other hand, was diagnostic for surgical jaundice in 62 of the 75 cases (82%). In 52 of the 62 patients a cause for the extrahepatic obstruction was demonstrated: 40 had cholelithiasis and choledocholithiasis, and 12 had tumors (11 pancreatic tumors, one lymphoma). In the remaining ten instances, obstruction was sonographically demonstrated but the cause was not. Of these, four patients were subsequently proven to have distal common duct stones, five had carcinoma of the pancreas and one had cholangiocarcinoma. This evidence indicates that ultrasound should be the noninvasive procedure of choice in the clinical assessment of obstructive jaundice.Abnormal liver function tests in acute cholecystitis; the predicting of common duct stones.In a prospective series of 155 patients with acute cholecystitis preoperative liver function tests were determined with the aim of predicting the presence of common duct stones. Elevated serum bilirubin, aminotransferases and alkaline phosphatase levels were observed in 32, 34 and 22% of cases, respectively. The frequency of common duct stones was 17.4%. The sensitivity of bilirubin and aminotransferases with regard to ductal stones was higher (70-81%), but alkaline phosphatase showed the best predictive values (46%). The probability of common duct stones increased with higher degrees of elevation in the case of alkaline phosphatase, but not in the case of bilirubin or aminotransferases, A frequency of 31-67% of choledocholithiasis was found when one or all of the tests were positive. After random assignment the patients were operated on early or after delay. In the delayed surgery group more failures occurred in the conservative treatment of acute cholecystitis if the tests were elevated (36%) than if normal (15%, p less than 0.05). The frequencies of common duct stones were 11 and one in these groups (p less than 0.001). There was no increase in postoperative morbidity after early surgery (15%) compared with delayed surgery (22%, p greater than 0.1), when liver function was disturbed. Liver function tests thus allow patients with common duct stones to be selected for early surgery in acute cholecystitis.Assessment of the common bile duct before cholecystectomy using ultrasound and biochemical measurements: validation based on follow-up.The selective use of operative cholangiography with cholecystectomy is controversial. We have combined measurement of the serum bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and alanine aminotransferase with ultrasound measurement of the bile duct diameter to assess the common bile duct before cholecystectomy. Direct contrast cholangiography was not performed if the results of these measurements were normal on the day before operation. There were 253 patients assessed in this way before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Patients with known bile duct stones were excluded, but those with a previous history of jaundice, pancreatitis or abnormal liver function tests were included. In 47 cases abnormalities were found and X-ray cholangiograms were performed; only six patients were found to have bile duct stones. Follow-up of all 253 patients, including repeating the preoperative measurements after 12 months in 93, found only two patients with evidence that common duct stones had been missed and these two stones passed spontaneously. No bile duct injuries have occurred. We conclude that preoperative assessment of the bile duct using ultrasound and liver function tests safely obviates the need for 'routine' operative cholangiography.Useful predictive factors of common bile duct stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for gallstones.The aim of this study was to determine useful predictive factors of common bile duct stones (CBDs) as diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) for gallstones.A total of 510 patients underwent ERCP prior to LC. Also reviewed in each were clinical data, laboratory data, and ultrasonographic findings. Data were evaluated by uni- and multivariate analysis to determine which of the useful predictive factors thus far reported might be in the concurrence of CBDs.Univariate analysis identified jaundice, pancreatitis, ALT, total bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, amylase, and CBD dilatation at ultrasonography as predictors. Multivariate analysis subsequently identified alkaline phosphatase (p<0.0001), total bilirubin (p=0.0008), amylase (p=0.0009), and CBD dilatation at ultrasonography (p=0.0012) as independent predictive factors of CBDs. The estimates for the detection of CBDs, when the indication of ERCP is determined on the basis of the four predictive factors, were found to be as follows: sensitivity 97.6%, positive predictive value 78.6%, and positive accuracy 95.3%.It is advisable to ascertain by preoperative ERCP whether there might be any CBDs in patients about to undergo an LC for treatment of cholelithiasis insofar as the patient has one or more of these factors. It is concluded that an LC may be performed by omitting the prior ERCP, conversely, on patients devoid of all of these factors.Prediction of common bile duct stones prior to cholecystectomy: a prospective validation of a discriminant analysis function.Selection routines for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients with symptomatic gallstone disease should give a low frequency of both false-negative ERCP results and residual common bile duct stones (CBDS).To validate a discriminant function (DF) based on retrospectively collected data, for characterization of patients with symptomatic gallstone disease as regards presence of CBDS, and to compare clinical, ultrasonographic, and DF characterization.Prospective registration of CBDS criteria in consecutive patients with symptomatic gallstone disease.A department of surgical gastroenterology in a Norwegian central hospital.One hundred ninety-two patients with gallbladder stones.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy or ERCP with or without endoscopic sphincterotomy.Sensitivity and specificity of the clinical, ultrasonographic, and DF characterizations, and test of the validity of the DF.Thirty-two patients had CBDS. The clinical criteria of CBDS were present in 152 patients (79.2%): 21.1% of these patients had CBDS and there were no false-negative results (sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 25%). The risk of CBDS in patients with normal bile ducts at ultrasonographic examination was 8 of 124, and in patients with dilated ducts or suspected CBDS, 17 of 47 (sensitivity, 68%; specificity, 80%). The DF was positive in 50 patients (26%): 60% of these had CBDS, and there were 2 false-negative results (sensitivity, 94%; specificity, 88%). A discriminant analysis of the prospectively registered data selected the same set of CBDS criteria, and a new DF did not alter the characterization of any patient.Clinical characterization had a higher sensitivity for CBDS detection than ultrasonography alone, but a lower specificity. The DF analysis was both more sensitive and specific than ultrasonography, and seemed efficient in selecting symptomatic gallstone patients for ERCP. It was reproducible and simple to use.Selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and preoperative bile duct stone removal in patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective study.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) has become the treatment of choice for patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis. About 10% of patients with symptomatic gallstones may bear associated common bile duct (CBD) stones. The preferred approach to these patients is the removal of CBD stones by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP) before LC. However, ERCP before LC should be performed only in patients with suspected choledocholithiasis. The aims of this study were to: 1) generate an efficacious predictive model for selecting patients with suspected choledocholithiasis to submit to preoperative ERCP, and 2) test the safety of the endoscopic/laparoscopic procedure.Historical, biochemical, and ultrasonographic data were collected prospectively. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis was adopted for determining optimal biochemical and ultrasonographic cut-off values. Multivariate analysis using logistic regression with generation of the best model identifying independent predictors of CBD stones was also employed.The optimal model predicted a 95% probability of CBD stones in a patient who presented with elevated ALP (over 300 IU/L) and ALT (over 40 IU/L) levels and CBD dilation > 8 mm at ultrasonography. Endoscopic removal of CBD stones was achieved in 95% of patients, with minimal morbidity and no mortality.The identified independent predictors of CBD stones are highly efficient selectors of patients with choledocholithiasis. Moreover, endoscopic removal of CBD stones before LC is a safe and efficacious procedure.Pre-operative ultrasound measurement of bile duct diameter: basis for selective cholangiography.In this prospective study, prior to cholecystectomy, the diameter of the common hepatic duct was measured; duct size was then compared with probability of finding stones at operation. Of 115 patients entering the study, 36 had stones removed from the common duct at the time of cholecystectomy but only three (8%) were demonstrated by ultrasonography. No stones were found in ducts less than or equal to 3 mm in size (31% patients). Only two of 26 patients with ducts measuring 4 mm had stones. As duct size increased, so did the probability of stones and all patients with ducts greater than or equal to 9 mm in diameter had stones. It is concluded that pre-operative ultrasound provides a reliable basis for a policy of selective cholangiography.Detection of choledocholithiasis: comparison of unenhanced spiral CT, US, and ERCP.ERCP is an established method for the diagnosis and treatment of common bile duct stones, however, it is invasive, time-consuming, and expensive. The purpose of this study was to determine whether unenhanced spiral CT and US, compared with ERCP, have sufficient sensitivity and negative predictive value to be useful screening techniques in patients suspected of having choledocholithiasis.Over a period of 2 years, 82 patients with clinically suspected choledocholithiasis underwent unenhanced spiral computed tomography and US immediately before undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. CT/US scans and ERCP images were evaluated for the presence of bile duct stones, ampullary stones, and extrahepatic biliary dilatation.Unenhanced spiral computed tomography (US) depicted common bile duct stones in 24 (23) of 28 patients found to have stones at endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Five patients had stones impacted at the ampulla, all (two) of which were detected with CT (US). Computed tomography (US) had a sensitivity of 86% (82%) and a specificity of 98% (98%) in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.Both unenhanced spiral CT and US are useful for evaluating suspected common bile duct stones. Unenhanced spiral CT is especially useful when the patient is likely to have ampullary stones and is a safe, more available and less expensive alternative to magnetic resonance cholangiography.[Selective intraoperative cholangiography].300 consecutive cholecystectomies performed from 1984 through 1986 were studied retrospectively to answer the following questions: which are suitable preoperative indicators for selective operative cholangiography, and which is the failure rate to detect biliary concrements by selective cholangiography? Patients with a history of jaundice, suspected concrements from preoperative intravenous cholangiography or ultrasound examination, a common bile duct wider than 8 mm, and elevated serum levels of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, ALAT (GPT) or ASAT (GOT) all had significantly higher rates of biliary concrements. Of these indicators, preoperative radiologic studies, serum levels of ALAT (GPT) and serum levels of alkaline phosphatase showed the best sensitivity, specificity as well as positive and negative predictive value. If two criteria, preoperative radiology and serum levels of ALAT (GPT), had been used, intraoperative cholangiography would have been performed in 34% of the cases. 82% of all biliary concrements would have been detected; in 3% of all cholecystectomies, the diagnosis of concrements would have been missed. We conclude that prospective studies should be performed to better define necessity and benefit of routine operative cholangiography still widely performed today.[The significance of preoperative and postoperative sonography for biliary tract surgery. A prospective study].112 patients with biliary calculi and destined for cholecystectomy were sonographically investigated in a prospective study carried immediately before the operation as well as between the third and fifth, and between the seventh and ninth postoperative day. Biliary calculi were sonographically detectable in 111 of the 112 patients (sensitivity 0.99). The sonographically measured bile duct diameter agreed well with the actual bile duct diameter (r = 0.898). There was a correlation between the bile duct diameter and the severity of the underlying biliary disease. A sonographic diagnosis was successful in 11 of 17 patients with choledocholithiasis (sensitivity 0.65) whereas 10 false positive diagnoses gave a specificity of 0.88. Gallbladder wall thickness above 4 mm had a sensitivity of 0.9 and a specificity of 0.72 for the detection of severe chronic or acute cholecystitis. A high rate (50%) of postoperative subhepatic fluid collections was a conspicuous finding but these were predominantly transient or only short-lived and attained clinical significance in only 7 out of 108 patients (6.5%).Ultrasound detection of choledocholithiasis: prospective comparison with ERCP in the postcholecystectomy patient.The role of ultrasound as a screening test for choledocholithiasis was prospectively assessed by comparing the results of upper abdominal ultrasound with direct cholangiography in 59 unselected symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 13 of 29 patients (sensitivity, 45%) and their absence in 29 of 30 (specificity, 97%). A positive ultrasound diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was correct 13 times out of 14 (predictive value, 93%) whereas a negative diagnosis was correct on only 29 of 45 occasions (predictive value, 64%). No significant learning effect was seen. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones. Duct stones were present in 25 of 35 patients shown to have a dilated common duct on ultrasound, and in 4 of 24 with nondilated ducts; the predictive value of duct dilatation at ultrasound for duct stones was therefore 71% and that of nondilatation in excluding stones was 83%. Dilated intrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated at ultrasound in only 17% of patients with choledocholithiasis. We conclude that ultrasound cannot reliably diagnose or exclude bile duct stones and is an inadequate screening test for the symptomatic postcholecystectomy patient.Common bile duct evaluation in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. 1050 cases later.The authors documented the evolution of common bile duct (CBD) evaluation after the development of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) and CBD exploration. Emphasis was placed on stratification of CBD stone risk so that subgroups could be selected appropriately for no further studies, preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiogram (ERC), or intraoperative intervention.Data were accumulated by the authors on presentation, findings, and outcomes of 1050 patients who underwent cholecystectomies. Risk stratification was based on the history, ultrasound findings, biochemical derangements, and operative findings.Fifty-seven per cent of patients met criteria to be "no/low" risk for CBD stones (CBD diameter < 5 mm, normal liver enzymes, and no history of acute cholecystitis, jaundice, or pancreatitis); in these patients, cholangiograms were not obtained, and there was no clinical evidence of CBD stones observed in follow-up at 45 months (sensitivity = 100%). As techniques developed for laparoscopic CBD exploration, there was a decreased incidence of open cholecystectomy (p < 0.05) and preoperative ERC (p < 0.05). The rate of operative cholangiogram increased from 13% to 23% during the series (p < 0.01). There were no CBD injuries or late strictures. The only bile leak occurred from a peripheral segmental duct in the gallbladder bed and was resolved with a laparotomy and suture. There were no transfusions. Three retained stones were documented in patients who had false-normal operative cholangiograms.Criteria were defined that delineate a "no/low" risk group of LC patients for whom operative cholangiograms were not indicated for excluding CBD stones. The routine use of operative cholangiography as a means of preventing CBD injury was not substantiated by this study. The indications for preoperative ERC should continue to decrease as laparoscopic techniques evolve.Comparison of ultrasound and E.R.C.P. in the detection of the cause of obstructive biliary disease.The value of ultrasound (US) in determining the cause and site of biliary obstruction was critically evaluated and compared to endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP), in a prospective study performed on 120 consecutive patients. The final diagnosis was based on surgery, endoscopic retrograde cholangiography or a combination of other examinations. Ultrasound successfully differentiated obstructive from non obstructive jaundice in 96% of the patients, comparing well with the results ERCP. US correctly defined the cause of obstruction in 71% of the patients with ductal stones, in 90% of the patients with tumoural bile duct obstruction, but only in 59% of the patients with chronic pancreatitis.Total bilirubin is a useful predictor of persisting common bile duct stone in gallstone pancreatitis.Accepted guidelines for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in gallstone pancreatitis are lacking. Our previous investigations suggested that serum total bilirubin on hospital Day 2 best predicts persisting common bile duct (CBD) stones. We aim to identify an optimal total bilirubin threshold on hospital Day 2 that would predict persisting CBD stones and guide obtaining preoperative ERCP. Prospective and retrospective data were available from 200 consecutive patients with gallstone pancreatitis at a public teaching hospital from 2003 through 2007. Charts were examined for persisting CBD stones on ERCP and/or intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Patients with cholangitis (n = 18) were excluded. Nineteen of the remaining 182 (10%) patients had CBD stones. Mean hospital Day 2 bilirubin was 3.7 mg/dL for patients with CBD stones versus 1.4 mg/dL for those without (P < 0.0001). Seventeen patients (9%) had total bilirubin 4 or greater on hospital Day 2. Of these, eight (4%) had CBD stones (specificity 94%). Of the 165 patients with total bilirubin less than 4, 11 (7%) had CBD stones (P < 0.0001). In gallstone pancreatitis, a serum total bilirubin level 4 mg/dL or greater on hospital Day 2 predicts persisting CBD stones with enough specificity to serve as a practical guideline for ERCP while minimizing unnecessary procedures.Value of sonography in obstructive jaundice. Limitations of bile duct caliber as an index of obstruction.The diagnostic value of sonography was assessed in 176 patients with jaundice who had a final diagnosis on the basis of surgery, autopsy, liver biopsy, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and serum tests positive for hepatitis A and B. Obstructive (n = 113) versus nonobstructive jaundice (n = 63) was diagnosed with a sensitivity of 91% and a specificity of 95%. Nine of the 10 false negatives had choledocholithiasis. Application of stricter criteria for common duct (CD) dilatation than the one used of CD greater than or equal to 8 mm to greater than or equal to 12 mm would have lowered the sensitivity from 91% to 84%. On the basis of these criteria the predicted level of obstruction would have shifted from distal to proximal in 36% of the patients. Choledocholithiasis was more often associated with decreasing bilirubin values than malignancy: 55% versus 9% (p less than 0.05). The present study indicates that intermittent obstruction, usually associated with choledocholithiasis, constitutes the main problem in detection of obstructive jaundice. Diameter criteria used for diagnosing dilatation of the CD may greatly influence sonographic accuracy.[Ultrasonic diagnosis of bile duct calculi. A prospective study regarding the effects and the objective and subjective factors on accuracy in choledocholithiasis].The reliability and diagnostic sensitivity of the sonographic identification of bile duct concrements is mainly determined by the examiner's competence and the size of the concrements, and secondly also by the diameter or patency of the bile ducts. Basing on the records of 175 patients on whom choledocholithiasis had been performed, a prospective study (reference: concrement removal after ERCP) showed that the sensitivity of the method is almost twice as high with an experienced examiner than with a less experienced physician (80% vs. 47%). In 231 other cases with extrahepatically conditioned cholestasis we found a 93% specificity of sonography in respect of excluding the presence of concrements. 93% of the concrements that were bigger than 10 mm were definitely diagnosed via sonography (71% sensitivity in case of concrements < 10 mm). If the proof of presence of concrements is differentiated according to bile duct width, it is seen that 85% of all concrements were visualised if the width of the ductus choledochus was > or = 8 mm and 71% in case of a width < 8 mm. The results of the study justify the use of sonography as a primary method in the diagnosis of concrements of the bile ducts; under certain conditions it is also possible to exclude the presence of stones. If findings do not agree with the clinical pattern of findings, or if the bile ducts cannot be visualised properly, diagnostic ERCP is indicated.Reliability of ultrasonography in diagnosis of biliary lithiasis.Preoperative B-mode ultrasonograms of the biliary system in 302 patients with cholelithiasis confirmed operatively between March 1981 and December 1986 were analyzed retrospectively in contrast to the operative findings. The results showed that during 1985-1986 the sensitivity of ultrasonography (US) to detect stones in gallbladder (GB), extrahepatic bile duct (EHD) and intrahepatic bile duct (IHD) was 98.4%, 68.2% and 82.4% respectively, each was much higher than its counterpart during the periods 1981-1982 and 1983-1984 (P less than 0.01). The specificity of US in detecting GB, EHD and IHD stones was all over 90% during the latter two years. The observations made in the present study suggest that the accuracy of US has risen so significantly that it should be used as the first modality in diagnosing cholelithiasis, particularly cholecystolithiasis. It, however, should be supplemented with such tests as oral cholecystography, intravenous cholangiography, percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (PTC), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) to establish a correct diagnosis when its interpretation is equivocal.Accuracy of abdominal ultrasonography and the role of a second investigation in surgical obstructive jaundice.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography (US) was evaluated in delineating the site and cause of biliary obstruction in 59 patients of surgical obstructive jaundice (SOJ). A final analysis of the ultrasonographic data was carried out in 42 patients on whom laparotomy or endoscopic papillotomy with removal of common bile duct stones, confirmed the diagnosis. Evaluation of the role of second investigation following ultrasound in 28 patients (side-viewing endoscopy in 13, ERCP in 12 and PTC in 3) was also done to determine whether they provide any additional information over ultrasonography in delineating the exact level and etiology of biliary obstruction. US was done by the clinician who interpreted the findings in conjunction with the clinical profile of the patient. US correctly diagnosed SOJ in all 42 patients. In 26 of the 28 patients with distal CBD block (specificity 87.5%; sensitivity 100%) and in 14 out of 16 patients with proximal CBD block (specificity 100%; sensitivity 87.5%) US provided and accurate diagnosis of the site of obstruction. US was correct in diagnosing a malignant etiology in 26 out of 27 malignant cases whereas it accurately indentified the benign nature of biliary obstruction in 14 of the 15 patients of SOJ due to benign obstruction (specificity and sensitivity range 93.3% to 96.3%). A second investigation could correctly change the etiology and site of biliary obstruction in only 5 patients (17.9%) whereas in the remaining 23 patients (82.1%) it did not add any additional information over the US findings. Six out of fifteen patients (40%) who underwent cholangiography had cholangitis and in one severe septicemia led to death.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.The evaluation and management of known or suspected stones of the common bile duct in the era of minimal access surgery.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) has rapidly become the procedure of choice for symptomatic cholelithiasis. The perioperative diagnosis and modern treatment of suspected stones of the common bile duct (CBD) remains controversial. A database of 573 patients undergoing LC was compiled during an 11 month period. Sixty-seven patients (47 females, 20 males) (13 percent) were suspected of having CBD stones based upon clinical, laboratory and roentgenographic evidence. Fifty-two patients underwent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ER-CP) (45 preoperative and seven postoperative). Seventeen patients were studied with intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC). The indications for cholangiography (either ERCP or IOC) included pancreatitis (group 1), clinical history suggestive of CBD stones, but normal preoperative liver function tests (LFT) (group 2), cholangitis (group 3), grossly abnormal LFT (group 4) and dilated CBD (greater than 7 millimeters on sonogram) (group 5). The incidence of CBD stones was three of 14 (21 percent) in group 1, six of 20 (30 percent) in group 2, two of three (67 percent) in group 3, 16 of 26 (62 percent) in group 4 and two of four (50 percent) in group 5. Overall, 29 patients (23 females and six males) had stones retrieved from the CBD. Of the 52 ERCP, 20 endoscopic sphincterotomies were performed for documented CBD stones. Of the group that had pre-LC ERCP, three (6 percent) ultimately required an open procedure. There were three instances of post-ERCP pancreatitis (6 percent) and ERCP was not able to opacify or clear the CBD in four instances. Seven patients had postoperative ERCP with successful retrieval of retained CBD stones (100 percent). Of the 17 IOC, eight were positive--two patients underwent laparoscopic clearance of the CBD and six required conversion to an open procedure. There were no deaths or extensive complications. Total and direct bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and serum glutamic pyruvic transaminase were independently related to the presence of a CBD stone, while demographic data, past medical history, preoperative symptoms, leukocyte count, vital signs, amylase, serum glutamic-oxalacetic transaminase nuclear scintigraphic visualization of the duodenum or size of CBD on sonography, were not. No patient with biliary pancreatitis had CBD stones without abnormalities in the LFT or the preoperative sonogram. ERCP is a useful technique to clear the CBD pre-LC. However, ERCP in patients with biliary pancreatitis, but otherwise normal preoperative tests, has a low yield. In this group of patients, IOC is an appropriate alternative to pre-LC ERCP.Yield of prospective, noninvasive evaluation of the common bile duct combined with selective ERCP/sphincterotomy in 1390 consecutive laparoscopic cholecystectomy patients.The role of noninvasive evaluation of the common bile duct combined with selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy was prospectively evaluated in 1390 consecutive patients subjected to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Preoperative common bile duct testing included liver chemistries, transcutaneous ultrasonography, and intravenous cholangiography. When indicated by various sets of abnormal studies, prelaparoscopic endoscopic retrograde cholangiography was attempted in 129 patients (9.3%) and successfully accomplished in 122 (94.6%). Seventy-six patients (62.3%) had duct stones or a papillary stenosis, and 73 of them (96%) were treated successfully by endoscopic duct clearance and subsequent laparoscopic cholecystectomy. No deaths occurred, and the morbidity rate was 6.2% (8/129), including 2 cases of pancreatitis and 1 case of a retained duct stone after sphincterotomy. Predicting the presence of common duct pathology was 60% accurate when based on abnormal laboratory test results alone, 69% when based on abnormal laboratory test results and concomitant radiologic abnormalities, and 42% when based on radiologic criteria alone (p < .05). We conclude that patients with altered serum liver chemistries with or without concomitant positive radiologic criteria should undergo endoscopic cholangiography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. However, in patients with radiologic duct dilatation as the sole indicator for duct stones, the frequency of normal findings in endoscopic examinations is high. This latter group is probably better managed with intraoperative cholangiography and postlaparoscopic sphincterotomy if needed.[Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones (an analysis of 112 cases)].[The value of various imaging technics in the preoperative diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].In a retrospective study different methods of detecting choledocholithiasis-sonography, intravenous cholangiography, computed tomography and transhepatic cholangiography-have been compared to evaluate their accuracy. A total of 130 investigations in 93 patients were analysed. Choledocholithiasis could be predicted by sonography in 42.9%, by intravenous cholangiography in 60% and by transhepatic cholangiography in 85.7%. The overall accuracy rate with a single investigation was 51.6%. The combination of different methods increased the accuracy rate of 81.6%. We use sonography as the screening examination. In unclear cases transhepatic cholangiography has proven helpful in demonstrating choledocholithiasis. Only cholangiography, together with cholangioscopy, is performed intraoperatively. Due to high cost and limited availability, computed tomography should not be used as a basic examination.Predicting the presence of choledocholithiasis in patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis.Accurate preoperative prediction of choledocholithiasis is essential in order to minimize patient risk and curtail health care expenditures. This study was designed to identify independent risk factors for choledocholithiasis in patients who had undergone cholecystectomy for symptomatic cholelithiasis and to develop a predictive model based on those factors.The charts of 1264 consecutive patients who had undergone cholecystectomy at one of three North Carolina hospitals between January 1, 1989 and December 31, 1991 were reviewed; 465 of these patients had confirmed presence or absence of choledocholithiasis by cholangiography and/or common bile duct exploration and were eligible for analysis. Candidate predictor variables included age and maximum preoperative values for each of the following: temperature, alkaline phosphatase, bilirubin, AST, amylase, white blood cell count, and common bile duct diameter. Model development and validation were conducted using standard data-splitting (60% "training," 40% "test") and logistic regression techniques.Choledocholithiasis was confirmed in 115 (25%) of the 465 eligible patients. Univariate analysis identified bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, temperature, alkaline phosphatase, and age as predictors. Multivariable analysis subsequently identified bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, alkaline phosphatase, and age as independent predictors of choledocholithiasis. A final model containing these variables (except age, whose contribution to the model was small) accurately predicted choledocholithiasis (c-index = 0.76).Accurate estimates of choledocholithiasis risk can be made using maximum preoperative bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, and alkaline phosphatase values. Use of the model may help physicians select those patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis who would most likely benefit from further investigation to exclude choledocholithiasis.Triple non-invasive diagnostic test for exclusion of common bile ducts stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To evaluate the impact of a preoperative "triple non-invasive diagnostic test" for diagnosis and/or exclusion of common bile duct stones.All patients with symptomatic gallstone disease, operated on by laparoscopic cholecystectomy from March 2004 to March 2006 were studied retrospectively. Two hundred patients were included and reviewed by using a triple diagnostic test including: patient's medical history, routine liver function tests and routine ultrasonography. All patients were followed up 2-24 mo after surgery to evaluate the impact of triple diagnostic test.Twenty-five patients were identified to have common bile duct stones. Lack of history of stones, negative laboratory tests and normal ultrasonography alone was proven to exclude common bile duct stones in some patients. However, a combination of these three components (triple diagnostic), was proven to be the most statistically significant test to exclude common bile duct stones in patients with gallstone disease.Using a combination of routinely used diagnostic components as triple diagnostic modality would increase the diagnostic accuracy of common bile duct stones preoperatively. This triple non-invasive test is recommended for excluding common bile duct stones and to identify patients in need for other investigations.[Choledocolithiasis predictors in high-risk population subjected to endoscopic retrograde pancreatocholangiography at "Hospital Nacional Arzobispo Loayza"].The choledocholithiasis is a frequent complication of gallstone disease. The endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is suitable for its diagnosis and treatment. That approach has both significative morbility and mortality so others methods of diagnosis have been proposed such as intraoperatorycholangiography (IOC) and magnetic resonance cholangiography (MRC), reserving ERCP only for therapy purpose.Verify the utility of choledocholithiasis predictors described in literatureThis study is a correlational observational transversal prospective approach. It was performed at the Arzobispo Loayza Hospital from August 2004 to January 2005. Many clinical, biochemical and ecographyc predictors of choledocholithiasis were analyzed in 151 patient underwent to ERCP. In all peopleunder study and analyzing separately patients underwent to cholecystectomy or not previous to ERCP, it was identified some risk factors for choledocholithiasis by means of both univariate and multivariate analysis.The univariate analysis showed a relationships among age, icterus, cholangytis, direct bilirrubin, amylase, lactic deshidrogenasa, ductal dilatation (>8 mm) and choledocholithiasis. In all groups, the multivariate analysis determined that ductal dilatation by ecography was the unique predictor for choledocholithiasis in the group of patients postoperated.None single indicator was able to predict with accuracy the choledocholithiasis. However, the parameters described in the literature are useful in our country.Predictive ability of choledocholithiasis indicators.[Upper-abdominal ultrasonography and ERCP? (author's transl)].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as well as upper-abdominal ultrasonography were performed on 134 patients. Organ structure was optimally demonstrated by ultrasonography in 94 patients (70.2%) and partially in 29 (21.6%) Comparing the diagnostic assessment in 62 patients who had undergone 73 tests and had subsequently been operated on (57) or examined post-mortem (5) there was a statistically significant advantage of ERCP in diseases in which the choledochal duct had been involved. The method was successful in 95% of cases of choledocholithiasis (20 cases) compared with 45% by ultrasound and in 85% of cases of gall-bladder carcinoma which also involved the choledochal duct (38% by ultrasound). In clinically manifest carcinoma of the head of the pancreas (9 cases) and cholecystolithiasis (19 cases) ultrasonography provided the correct diagnosis in 89%, while the results for ERCP were 56% and 74%, respectively.Prospective evaluation of ultrasonography and liver function tests for preoperative assessment of the bile duct.Current means of predicting the presence of bile duct stones are sensitive but produce a large number of false-positive results, potentially leading to added morbidity from unnecessary invasive investigation. This study prospectively assessed 545 patients with gallbladder stones, including 55 patients with bile duct stones, to refine criteria for further investigation of the bile duct. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated for bile duct dilatation (diameter abnormal if larger than 5 mm below age 50 years, normal value increasing by 1 mm per decade) and elevation of three liver function tests, singly or in combination. Depending on the number of abnormalities used the sensitivity ranged from 46 to 96 per cent and the positive predictive value from 35 to 77 per cent. All groupings gave at least 96 per cent negative predictive value for the absence of stones but none combined both high sensitivity and positive predictive value. The specificity was improved if the tests were done on the working day before operation. Refining criteria for predicting bile duct stones allows the selective use of cholangiography and may reduce the number of negative cholangiograms.Indication of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography by noninvasive predictive factors of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective clinical study.To evaluate the reliability of a screening method in patients with common bile duct (CBD) stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) based on predictive factors, and to determine the cases for which preoperative therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) is indicated.Alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, amylase, and dilation of CBD results were defined as predictive factors for CBD stones. In cases in which all these 4 factors were negative, preoperative ERC was omitted, and in cases in which 1 of the 4 factors was positive, ERC was performed before LC.A total of 323 patients (83.7%) in whom all 4 factors were negative, ERC was omitted. In all the 63 patients (16.3%) in whom 1 of the 4 factors was positive, ERC was performed. In 52 (82.5%) of them, CBD stones were present and in 43 of them, LC was performed after endoscopic choledocholithotomy.For cases in which any 1 of the 4 factors was positive before LC, it was strongly recommended to perform preoperative ERC.Assessment of the common bile duct before cholecystectomy: a direct comparison between ultrasonography and intravenous cholangiography.Sixty-seven consecutive patients undergoing cholecystectomy for symptomatic gallstones were investigated by both ultrasonography (US) and intravenous cholangiography (IVC). This provided the opportunity to compare these methods for assessing the common bile duct (CBD) preoperatively for stones. The results were correlated with a subsequent definitive procedure that formed the diagnostic standard in each case. The CBD diameters of 8 (12%) patients with stones was significantly greater than those without stones (t = 10.96, P < 0.001). Sensitivities of US and IVC were 87.5% and 100% respectively, but there were three unsuccessful IVC investigations that had to be excluded from the calculations. Specificities and overall accuracy of both methods were greater than 95%. The positive and negative predictive value of each test was similar and no difference using McNemar's test was found between US and IVC for providing information relating to CBD stones. Performing both procedures as routine assessment of the CBD is thus unnecessary as US, in conjunction with clinical history and liver biochemistry profile, provide an adequate preoperative screen of the CBD.[The importance and value of pre-, intra- and postoperative roentgenologic biliary tract diagnosis].Preoperative abdominal ultrasound may be misleading in risk stratification for presence of common bile duct abnormalities.Following the advent of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC), the preoperative predictors of common bile duct (CBD) abnormalities became more important in perioperative decision making. Preoperative transabdominal ultrasound (US) is used to assess the preoperative risks associated with CBD abnormalities. This study attempts to determine the sensitivity and specificity of US in determining CBD abnormalities in patients prior to LC.US measurements of the CBD diameter and presence of stones were ascertained from radiology reports in 100 patients who had LC with a routine intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC). The same information was obtained from the patients' IOC. A supraduodenal CBD diameter of >8 mm was considered dilated.US demonstrated a sensitivity of 25% and a specificity of 70% for the detection of CBD dilatation compared to IOC. The sensitivity of US for predicting CBD dilatation was 55% when the IOC-derived diameter was >10 mm and 100% when it was >15 mm. The overall sensitivity of US for detection of stones was 10%; it improved to 17% in patients with a dilated CBD on US.Preoperative ultrasound is neither sensitive nor specific for detecting CBD dilatation or presence of stones. A negative preoperative US report may be misleading in risk stratification for the presence of these CBD abnormalities. In order to avoid missing any CBD pathology, we recommend the routine use of intraoperative cholangiography.Preoperative assessment of choledocholithiasis in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In order to determine the predictive value of noninvasive investigations for choledocholithiasis, we conducted a prospective preoperative study on 82 patients with symptomatic gallstones who received laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Ultrasonography (US), liver function tests and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) were routinely performed in all cases prior to operation. The results showed a strong correlation between noninvasive procedures (liver function tests and US) and the presence of choledocholithiasis as shown by ERC. Using ERC as a reference, the sensitivity and selectivity of ductal dilatation at US and the elevation of alkaline phosphatase (ALP), gamma-glutamyltransferase and total bilirubin in the serum were studied for the detection of common bile duct (CBD) stones. The values of the combination of these tests were also calculated. From receiver operator characteristics curves, the best cut-off point for US in conjunction with ALP was chosen. ERC should be restricted to patients with possible CBD stones, suspected after a combination of the noninvasive US and ALP tests. This study emphasized the necessity and timing of performing ERC as a preoperative modality in the detection of choledocholithiasis in patients who are to undergo laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Comparative accuracy of operative ultrasonography and cholangiography in detecting common duct calculi.Operative ultrasonography and operative radiographic cholangiography were compared for diagnostic effectiveness with regard to their ability to screen the common bile duct for the presence of calculi. We performed real-time B-mode ultrasonography and cholangiography using two injections of contrast material. In 350 patients, 349 ultrasonic and 285 cholangiographic examinations were performed with technically satisfactory results. The sensitivity, specificity, efficiency, and predictability of a negative test were at a high and comparable level for the two diagnostic procedures. However, the predictability of a positive test for ultrasonography of 91.8% was significantly greater (P less than 0.02) than the predictability of 73.2% for cholangiography. Since predictability of a positive test is based on common duct exploration rather than presumptive evidence of a clinical course, this test may be more valid than the other measures to determine diagnostic effectiveness. The advantages of ultrasonography, which are superior accuracy, favorable image qualities, reduced invasiveness, increased safety, avoidance of contrast material, and lower cost, were contrasted with the problems of ultrasonography, which included a slow learning curve for performance and interpretation of the technique and the limited availability of dedicated ultrasound equipment for surgical operations. We concluded that the advantages outweighed the problems and that operative ultrasonography of the common duct warrants wider application in clinical surgery.[The importance of sonography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy].The increasing use of minimally invasive techniques for the treatment of symptomatic cholecystitis requires exact preoperative diagnosis. The significant sonographic findings are stones in the biliary system or indirect evidence of stones, consisting in dilatation of the bile duct to more than 10 mm, as well as free mobility of the abdominal wall to exclude peri-umbilical adhesions. Amongst 100 patients who had laparoscopic cholecystectomies there were 7 with bile ducts wider than 10 mm. In two of these cases calculi could also be demonstrated. ERCP was performed on the remaining five and in 3 of these stones were seen. Peri-umbilical adhesions were seen in 6 Patients, resulting in alternative placing of the incision. The sonographic findings which are of relevance to the surgeon were analysed in these 100 cases. A standardised examination protocol is an important feature for proper patient selection.Abnormal common bile duct sonography. The best predictor of choledocholithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.We conducted a prospective study to determine the most reliable indicator of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. One hundred thirty-seven patients were referred for endoscopic retrograde cholangiography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy for suspected choledocholithiasis due to one or more of the following abnormalities: (a) altered liver function tests, (b) increased serum amylase levels, or (c) a dilated common bile duct (> 7 mm) with or without evidence of stones on sonography. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and the likelihood of the presence or absence of morbidity were calculated for 25 different variables. Common bile duct stones were detected in 63 (46%) patients. Abnormal result of sonography of the common bile duct was the best predictor of choledocholithiasis (p < 0.0001). Abnormalities of the combined liver function tests were statistically significant predictors only when combined with abnormal sonographic results. Improving liver function tests before endoscopy had a significant negative predictive value (p = 0.01). Stepwise logistic regression analysis showed that abnormal ultrasound and the presence of common bile duct stones on ultrasound were significant (p = 0.009 and p = 0.049, respectively). Abnormal result of sonography of the common bile duct is the best predictor of choledocholithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Role of selective intra-operative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The use of routine intra-operative cholangiography (IOC) remains controversial. This prospective study was carried out to determine whether to perform selective or routine IOC in patients undergoing cholecystectomy for gallstones.All consecutive patients undergoing open cholecystectomy over a 16-month period were included in the present study. They were divided into two groups based on the absence (n = 79) or presence (n = 55) of indicators of choledocholithiasis. All patients were subjected to cholangiography. Each indicator, subsets of indicators and all indicators combined were evaluated for their ability to predict choledocholithiasis.There would be only two missed stones (1.5%) if selective cholangiography was to be practised. Intra-operative cholangiography had a positive predictive value of 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of all the indicators combined were 93.5%, 84.6%, 74.5%, 97.5% and 88.0%, respectively. The best indicators in each subset were jaundice, common bile duct diameter as assessed by ultrasonography, and a palpable stone during surgery with NPV of 82.7%, 91.1% and 96.8%, respectively.Routine IOC during cholecystectomy is not essential for the prevention of retained stones. A combination of the various indicators of choledocholithiasis can be used to select patients for cholangiography.Preoperative ultrasonic of common bile duct stones and its importance to surgical management--result of a prospective controlled trial.The biliary tract was examined by sonography in 192 nonselected surgical patients with clinically suspected gallbladder stone disease. This study was carried out to assess the potentiality of ultrasonic examination in the detection of common bile duct stones. All patients were operated on with sonographic monitoring during surgery. Common bile duct stones can be detected with high accuracy only in patients with an obstructive jaundice and a dilated common duct. In these, the sensitivity was found to be 70%, whereas that for the whole group of patients was as low as 28%. Accuracy in the ultrasonic detection of common bile duct stones is limited, and operative cholangiography seems to retain its position as the most reliable method of exploring common bile duct stones.Role of liver function tests in predicting common bile duct stones in acute calculous cholecystitis.The role of liver function tests (LFTs) in evaluating common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients with cholelithiasis has been studied widely. However, it is not clear whether these predictive models are useful in inflammatory gallstone disease.A review was undertaken of 385 consecutive patients admitted as an emergency for acute calculous gallbladder disease. The diagnosis of calculous cholecystitis was confirmed by ultrasonography or histological confirmation of acute or chronic inflammation of the gallbladder. Patients with obvious jaundice, defined as a bilirubin level above 80 micromol/l, and gallstone pancreatitis were excluded.Some 216 patients met the inclusion criteria, of whom 28 (13.0 per cent) were found to have CBD stones. LFT results were not significantly different in patients with chronic, acute or complicated acute cholecystitis. Using several cut-off levels, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT) had the highest specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value, comparable to a scoring system that combined all LFTs. Bilirubin was the least specific and predictive. A cut-off point for GGT at 90 units/l produced a sensitivity of 86 per cent (24 of 28), specificity of 74.5 per cent (140 of 188), and positive and negative predictive values of 33 per cent (24 of 72) and 97.2 per cent (140 of 144) respectively. This represented a one in three chance of CBD stones when the GGT level was above 90 units/l and a one in 30 chance when the level was less than 90 units/l.Selection criteria based on GGT can be used in acute calculous cholecystitis to identify high-risk patients who would benefit most from further imaging to exclude choledocholithiasis.[VALUE OF THE LIVER FUNCTION TESTS IN SURGERY OF THE BILIARY TRACT].[Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and its complications].The author presents the results of ultrasound investigation (USI) of 419 patients with cholecystocholedocholithiasis. The diagnostic accuracy of USI methods in patients with calculous cholecystitis was 98.8%. Direct signs of visualization of concrements in the common bile duct (CBD) were found but in 68.5% of patients. On the basis of USI results the common bile stones were found in 287 (68.5%) patients. The concrements omitted in transabdominal USI were diagnosed using endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography, magnetic resonance cholangio-pancreaticography, endoscopic ultrasonography as well as in operative intervention.[Value of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of distal choledocolithiasis].We performed real time echotomographic studies in 203 patients with a clinical diagnosis of obstructive jaundice. All patients were operated on and a diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was established in 125. The same diagnosis had been made by echo in 69 of them for a 63% sensitivity rate. The specificity was 92% and the positive predictive value 93%. An improvement in sensitivity from 52 to 80% and in specificity from 91 to 94% along the 3 year study period was detected. This high yield of the echographic study, not widespread in the literature, may be attributed to a careful study of the intrapancreatic section of the common duct were 92% of the stones were found. Also, the experience and training of the radiologist performing the examination is essential.Routine preoperative laboratory analyses are unnecessary before elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy.We formulated a clinical pathway (CP) for elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC), which included the following preoperative evaluation: history and physical (H&P), right upper quadrant ultrasound (US), and liver function tests (LFTs). We hypothesized that routine LFTs did not alter management beyond that dictated by H&P and US, and could be excluded from the CP.The study involved 387 consecutive patients undergoing elective LC. Abnormalities in the preoperative evaluation were compared with the finding of choledocholithiasis or other unexpected outcomes.In 187 (48%) patients, abnormalities were found by H&P (n = 7), US (n = 13), and LFTs (n = 177). Seven patients (2%) had documented choledocholithiasis; two had abnormal H & P; three had abnormal US; and four had abnormal LFTs. No patient with choledocholithiasis had abnormal LFTs but normal H&P and US.Routine LFTs before elective LC are not cost effective. Before LC H&P and US are warranted, but LFTs do not add any useful information and should not be routinely measured.Preoperative clinical and paraclinical predictors of choledocholithiasis.Choledocholithiasis is the most common cause of obstructive jaundice and cholangitis and occurs in about 10% of patients with symptomatic gallstone. The aim of this study was to find preoperative and non-invasive tests for predicting common bile duct stones (CBDs).Findings of clinical examination, history, laboratory tests and ultrasound (US) in 60 patients with CBDs were compared retrospectively, with 60 patients with gallstones. The data were collected from medical charts. The sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value (PPV) were determined.The comparison between the two groups showed significant differences in anorexia, itching, dark urine, subicterus (slightly elevated serum bilirubin without clinical evidence of jaundice) and jaundice appearance, increased bilirubin level, aspartate aminotransferase (AST) and alanine aminotranferase (ALT), CBD diameter >6 mm and stone observation under US (P<0.05). The highest specificity (100%) and PPV (100%) were found in dark urine and pale colored stool, history of cholangitis, and icterus. Among paraclinical tests, alkaline phosphatase (ALP) had the highest specificity (72.1%) and PPV (12.5%). Under US, stone observation in CBD was the most important factor with a sensitivity of 94.5%, a specificity of 100% and a PPV of 100%.The most important factors for predicting CBDs are history of cholangitis and pancreatitis, presence of icterus, dark urine, pale colored stool, elevation of ALP, and sonographic evidence of chledocholithiasis.Selection criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy and endoscopic treatment of bile duct stones: results of a retrospective, single center study between 1996-2002.The optimal treatment for bile duct stones (in terms of cost, complications and accuracy) is unclear. The aim of our study was to determine the predictive factors for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Patients undergoing preoperative ERCP (< or =90 d before laparoscopic cholecystectomy) were evaluated in this retrospective study from the 1st of January 1996 to the 31st of December 2002. The indications for ERCP were elevated serum bilirubin, elevated liver function tests (LFT), dilated bile duct (> or =8 mm) and/or stone at US examination, coexisting acute pancreatitis and/or acute pancreatitis or jaundice in patient's history. Suspected prognostic factors and the combination of factors were compared to the result of ERCP.Two hundred and six preoperative ERCPs were performed during the observed period. The rate of successful cannulation for ERC was (97.1%). Bile duct stones were detected in 81 patients (39.3%), and successfully removed in 79 (97.5%). The number of prognostic factors correlated with the presence of bile duct stones. The positive predictive value for one prognostic factor was 1.2%, for two 43%, for three 72.5%, for four or more 91.4%.Based on our data preoperative ERCP is highly recommended in patients with three or more positive factors (high risk patients). In contrast, ERCP is not indicated in patients with zero or one factor (low risk patients). Preoperative ERCP should be offered to patients with two positive factors (moderate risk patients), however the practice should also be based on the local conditions (e.g. skill of the endoscopist, other diagnostic tools).Common bile duct stones after laparoscopic cholecystectomy and its treatment. The role of ultrasound and intravenous and intraoperative cholangiography.In the present work we recount our experience in handling common bile duct stones (CBDS) in our first 100 cases of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. In the first 50 cases our diagnostic procedures involved the use of ultrasound exploration and intravenous cholangiotomography 48 h before laparoscopic surgery. We found three cases of residual CBDS. One of the cases was treated by means of ERCP. The other two cases were resolved by carrying out a transparietohepatic cholangiography after the ERCP procedure failed. After this experience, we changed our strategy, introducing the intraoperative cholangiography in the cases with an unclear diagnosis. With this new approach, no residual CBDS occurred in the following 50 cases. These findings demonstrate the following: (1) In our hands, intravenous cholangiography is not more effective than ultrasound exploration in resolving dubious cases. (2) These dubious cases are more effectively diagnosed by means of selective intraoperative cholangiography. (3) When CBDS is treated by transparietohepatic cholangiography it proves to be less uncomfortable for the patient than ERCP and, as we found, even more efficient in removing the stones, although our experience is based on only two cases.The sensitivity and role of ultrasound in the evaluation of biliary obstruction.Ultrasound is widely advocated as the initial noninvasive imaging study in evaluating suspected biliary obstruction. Some have suggested using ultrasound as the sole diagnostic test before exploratory laparotomy. To evaluate the accuracy of ultrasound in determining the level and etiology of biliary obstruction in patients with biliary dilatation, and to define its role in the evaluation of these patients, we performed a retrospective review of all patients from August 1986 to August 1991 who had biliary dilatation by ultrasound and subsequent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and/or a percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography. Forty-two patients were included in this study, and ultrasound delineated the level of obstruction in 88 per cent, defined the etiology of the obstruction in 48 per cent, and diagnosed choledocholithiasis in 33 per cent of patients with this condition. A literature review revealed that ultrasound has a sensitivity of 71 per cent in delineating the level of obstruction, a sensitivity of 57 per cent in defining the etiology of biliary obstruction, and detects choledocholithiasis in 32 per cent of patients with this condition. We conclude that ultrasound is a highly accurate diagnostic test for delineating the level of biliary obstruction. Ultrasound should be the initial radiographic test in the evaluation of the patient with suspected biliary obstruction to guide further radiographic evaluation.Endoscopic ultrasonography for diagnosing choledocholithiasis: a prospective comparative study with ultrasonography and computed tomography.We assessed the diagnostic usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for choledocholithiasis.A prospective series of 155 patients with suspected choledocholithiasis all underwent EUS, conventional ultrasonography, CT, and ERCP. In 142 patients with a clear cholangiogram on ERCP, we analyzed the capability of EUS to image the extrahepatic bile duct and to identify choledocholithiasis, compared with ultrasonography and CT.No complications were encountered in performing EUS. In 51 patients, ERCP demonstrated bile duct stones, which were confirmed at endoscopic sphincterotomy or surgery. The extrahepatic bile duct was wholly displayed in 96% by EUS, in 60% by ultrasonography, and in 80% by CT. EUS (96%) was more sensitive than ultrasonography (63%) and CT (71%) for detecting choledocholithiasis (p < 0.001). Although ultrasonography and CT were poorly diagnostic for choledocholithiasis in patients with small stones or those with a nondilated common bile duct, EUS was able to accurately detect choledocholithiasis regardless of the size of stones or the diameter of the bile duct. The specificity of EUS (100%) was higher than those of ultrasonography (95%) and CT (97%).EUS, a safe imaging procedure, is more accurate than ultrasonography and CT and may be as accurate as ERCP for diagnosing choledocholithiasis.Biochemical predictors for absence of common bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To provide optimal selection of patients for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography or intraoperative cholangiography, we evaluated simple, noninvasive biochemical parameters as screening tests to predict the absence of common bile duct stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A total of 1002 patients underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Five biochemical parameters were measured preoperatively: gamma glutamyl transferase (GGT), alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, alanine aminotransferase, and aspartate aminotransferase. Conventional diagnostic tests, including ultrasound imaging, computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, common bile duct diameter, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and serum amylase were performed. Along with the five biochemical tests above, these diagnostic tests were scrutinized and compared as potential predictors for common bile duct stones.Eighty-eight (8.8%) patients with gallstone disease who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy had concurrent common bile duct stones. Among all diagnostic tests, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography had the highest sensitivity (96.0%), specificity (99.1%), probability ratio (107.3), accuracy (98.0%), and positive predictive value (98.8%) in detecting common bile duct stones. At least one abnormal elevation among the five biochemical parameters had the highest sensitivity (87.5%). Total bilirubin had the highest specificity (87.5%), highest probability ratio (3.9), highest accuracy (84.1%), and highest positive predictive value (27.4%). All five biochemical predictors had high negative predictive values; gamma glutamyl transferase was highest (97.9%), while the lowest was total bilirubin (94.7%). Multivariate analysis showed only gamma glutamyl transferase, alkaline phosphatase, and total bilirubin to be independent predictors; gamma glutamyl transferase appeared to be the most powerful predictor (odds ratio 3.20).Biochemical tests, especially gamma glutamyl transferase with 97.9% negative predictive value, are ideal noninvasive predictors for the absence of common bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. We suggest that unnecessary, costly, or risky procedures such as endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography can be omitted prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy in patients without abnormal elevation of these biochemical values.Ultrasonic evaluation of common bile duct stones: prospective comparison with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Ultrasound is the modality of choice for the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and for the evaluation of the intra- and extrahepatic biliary tree in the patient with jaundice, but its role in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis is less certain. We prospectively examined 90 patients who were to undergo endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) by performing right upper quadrant sonography immediately prior to ERCP. We assessed the size of the intra- and extrahepatic ducts and the presence or absence of calculi. ERCP, which was successfully performed in 77 of 94 attempted examinations, percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography, or surgical follow-up composed the diagnostic standard for comparison. Ultrasound was not accurate in the diagnosis (sensitivity, 25%) or exclusion (value of a negative study, 73%) of choledocholithiasis. Furthermore, in the postcholecystectomy patient population, ultrasound assessment of biliary duct size is not a useful predictor of biliary disease. For symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients, we recommend ERCP as the initial diagnostic modality.[Ultrasonography and retrograde transpapillary cholangiopancreatography combined with sphincterotomy in the diagnosis of choledochal lithiasis. Our experience with 87 patients].We retrospectively reviewed the US findings of 87 patients to assess US sensitivity in the detection of choledochal (CBD) stones. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) with endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES) was used as the diagnostic standard, except for 1 patient who underwent surgical exploration. First, the distal CBD was studied with transverse and parasagittal US scans through the head and uncinate portions of the pancreas. CBD stones usually appeared as hyperechoic lesions, most of them with acoustic shadowing. In some cases, the stone moves during real-time scanning, which further confirms the diagnosis. Fifty-four of 87 patients had CBD stones and US detected them in 46 cases. The absence of a stone was diagnosed correctly in 28 of 33 patients. In our series, US sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 85%, positive predictive value 88% and negative predictive value 78%. If the distal duct cannot be demonstrated adequately or if duct size is normal, US sensitivity in detecting stones decreases and other examinations, such as ERCP, should be performed. We conclude that US can be used as the diagnostic method of choice to examine the patients with suspected biliary tract disease. Although ERCP is the gold standard for diagnosis and therapeutic purposes in choledochal stones, it remains an invasive technique and must therefore be held in reserve.[Value of echotomography for the diagnosis of lithiasis of the common bile duct].The accuracy of ultrasonography (US) for the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and for dilatation of the intra- and extra-hepatic biliary tree is well known. However, the value of US for the diagnosis of common bile duct stones remains poorly defined. We performed a prospective study in 100 patients who were referred for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP); all the examinations were carried out by the same sonographist in the 24 h preceding the ERCP. Fifty patients had choledocholithiasis, 20 patients had obstruction of the bile ducts without lithiasis and the common bile duct (CBD) was free in 30 patients. The sensitivity of US for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was 40 p. 100, the specificity 90 p. 100. The positive and negative predictive values of the "CBD stone" sign was 80 p. 100 and 60 p. 100 respectively. In a total of 30 false negatives, the CBD could not be explored in 4 cases, dilatation of the CBD was missed in one case, and obstruction of the CBD by an other disease was diagnosed in 2; in all the other cases, US was able to appreciate the CBD size as well as the ERCP. In the 20 patients with an obstructed CBD but without choledocholithiasis, US diagnosed a stone in 5 cases. Age, serum bilirubin, existence of a previous cholecystectomy, technical difficulties, stone size were comparable in patients with true positive tests and in patients with false negative tests. However the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was more frequently achieved in patients with dilated CBD over 10 mm (p less than 0.05) and in patients with multiple stones.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[Value of sonography and intravenous cholangiography in preoperative choledochus diagnosis].[Results of sonographic diagnosis of choledochal calculi].To evaluate sonographic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledochal calculi 44 patients were examined prospectively with a mechanical sector scanner before endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC). Calculi with a diameter of more than 1.5 cm could be detected in all cases. Smaller stones (less than 1 cm) were missed in 50% of cases. To quantitate sensitivity in daily clinical practice, the data of 229 patients, suspected to have common bile duct stones, were analysed retrospectively. The overall accuracy was 76%, 90% when an experienced sonographer performed the examination and 47% if the examiner was less experienced. From these data it is concluded that the sonographic detection of choledochal calculi is influenced by the examination technique, experience of the examiner and diameter of the stones.The detection of bile duct stones in suspected biliary pancreatitis: comparison of MRCP, ERCP, and intraductal US.Early ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy for stone extraction can benefit the prognosis in patients with severe biliary pancreatitis, but are associated with complications. The ability to identify choledocholithiasis by noninvasive means in biliary pancreatitis is limited. The aim of this study was evaluation of the ability of MRCP to detect choledocholithiasis in patients with acute biliary pancreatitis. In addition, we investigated whether intraductal US (IDUS) could help manage these patients.Thirty-two patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis were studied prospectively. MRCP was performed immediately before ERCP by separate blinded examiners within 24 h of admission. Wire-guided IDUS was performed during ERCP within 72 h of admission, regardless of the results of MRCP. Using endoscopic extraction of a stone as the reference standard, the diagnostic yield of MRCP was compared with transabdominal US, CT, ERCP, and IDUS.The sensitivity of US, CT, MRCP, ERCP, and IDUS for identifying choledocholithiasis was 20.0%, 40.0%, 80.0%, 90.0%, and 95.0%, respectively. The overall agreement between MRCP and ERCP was 90.6% for choledocholithiasis (kappa= 0.808, p < 0.01). The sensitivity of MRCP for detecting choledocholithiasis decreased with dilated bile ducts (bile duct diameter > 10 mm, 72.7% vs 88.9%). The combination of ERCP and IDUS improved accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.MRCP can be used to select patients with biliary pancreatitis who require ERCP. IDUS may be applied in the management of biliary pancreatitis if ERCP is performed.[Conventional ultrasound in the diagnosis of bile duct calculi].Transabdominal ultrasound (US) is one of the most useful methods in the diagnosis of biliary stones.To appreciate the value of US in the diagnosis of bile duct stones.989 patients, explored in the Institute of Gastroenterology and Hepatology Iaşi by US compared with ERCP, MRCP, operative diagnosis and the final diagnostic.The sensitivity of US in the detection of bile duct stones was 78.39% and specificity was 72.22% in the first group of 650 patients, and bile duct stones were identified in 139 cases of 339 of the second group where US could not identify the cause of bile duct dilatations.The results were comparable with the most recent studies in the literature.US is an efficient method for the diagnosis of bile duct stones in many cases and remains the first step in the diagnosis.Are liver function tests, pancreatitis and cholecystitis predictors of common bile duct stones? Results of a prospective, population-based, cohort study of 1171 patients undergoing cholecystectomy.The purpose of this study was to explore the accuracy of elevated liver function values, age, gender, pancreatitis and cholecystitis as predictors of common bile duct stones (CBDS).All patients operated on for gallstone disease over a period of 3 years in a Swedish county of 302,564 citizens were registered prospectively. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was used to detect CBDS.A total of 1171 patients were registered; 95% of these patients underwent IOC. Common bile duct stones were found in 42% of patients with elevated liver function values, 20% of patients with a history of pancreatitis and 9% of patients with cholecystitis. The presence of CBDS was significantly predicted by elevated liver function values, but not by age, gender, history of acute pancreatitis or cholecystitis. A total of 93% of patients with normal liver function tests had a normal IOC. The best agreement between elevated liver function values and CBDS was seen in patients undergoing elective surgery without a history of acute pancreatitis or cholecystitis.Although alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and bilirubin levels represented the most reliable predictors of CBDS, false positive and false negative values were common, especially in patients with a history of cholecystitis or pancreatitis, which indicates that other mechanisms were responsible for elevated liver function values in these patients.Diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasound compared with direct cholangiography in the detection of choledocholithiasis.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and trans-abdominal ultrasound in the detection of choledocholithiasis, and to compare bile duct stone characteristics using endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), MRCP and ultrasound.Of 191 consecutive patients referred for diagnostic ERCP, choledocholithiasis was diagnosed in 34 patients using direct cholangiography. The latter took the form of ERCP (n = 29), intraoperative cholangiography (n = 3) or percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (n = 2). All patients underwent MRCP and ultrasound examinations and their findings for choledocholitiasis were compared with those at direct cholangiography. Finally, in the 29 patients with choledocholithiasis diagnosed under ERCP, stone characteristics were compared across the three investigations of ERCP, MRCP and ultrasound.Compared with direct cholangiography, MRCP showed a sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of 91%, 98% and 97%, respectively, in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. MRCP resulted in three false-negative and three false-positive findings, four of which occurred due to confusion with lesions at the ampulla. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of 38%, 100% and 89%, respectively, in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. ERCP revealed a greater number of stones and these were more proximally distributed within the bile ducts when compared to MRCP.MRCP is highly accurate in the diagnosis of choloedocholithiasis and has the potential to replace diagnostic ERCP. MRCP underestimates the number of bile duct stones present.Endoscopic sphincterotomy in 100 patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: ultrasound evaluation.The aim of the study was to determine to what extent ultrasonography may monitor the process of sphincterotomy and its effectiveness. The study also aimed at determining the sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detecting choledocholithiasis, in comparison with the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Between January 1995 and June 2001, endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed on 100 patients with suspected synchronous choledocholithiasis in preparation for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The main parameters evaluated in the ultrasonography image included the breadth of the common bile duct and absence or presence of concrements in bile ducts before and after sphincterotomy.Applied before the endoscopic operation, ultrasonography revealed choledocholithiasis in 58 patients and dilatation of the common bile duct in 95 patients. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography confirmed choledocholithiasis in 74 patients, after sphincterotomy concrements were removed in 63 persons. In 26 patients sphincterotomy was performed for stenosis of Vater's papilla. Patients with the breadth of the duct > 10 mm, were referred to a check-up examination.Compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography correctly specifies the breadth of the bile duct and properly monitors the process of endoscopic sphincterotomy, but is less accurate in determining the occurrence of choledocholithiasis, and sensitivity in the test amounted to 73%, and specificity of the examination--84.5%.[Sonographic diagnosis of bile duct calculi. Results of a prospective study of 222 cases of choledocholithiasis].To evaluate sonographic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledochal calculi 490 patients with cholestasis were examined prospectively with real-time scanner before ERCP or surgery. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 177 of 222 patients (sensibility 80%) and their absence in 242 of 268 (specificity 90%). Dilated extrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated via ultrasound in 84% of cases with choledocholithiasis, dilated intrahepatic bile ducts in 57%. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones.The role of serum liver enzymes in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.The introduction of laparoscopic cholecystectomy has increased the need for preoperative diagnosis of common bile duct stones. The purpose of this study is to verify the sensitivity of the liver function tests in the detection of duct stones.We evaluated 438 patients (223 retrospectively and 215 prospectively) who underwent endoscopic papillotomy for bile duct stones in two different services. In every case, blood samples for liver function tests levels were collected prior to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The most sensitive test was gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, that was abnormal in 92.2% of the cases. Alkaline phosphatase was elevated in 74.7% of the patients with choledocholithiasis. The least sensitive parameter was AST, altered in only 50.8% of times. The sensitivity of all liver tests for the diagnosis of choledochal stones taken together was 94.3%.Liver function tests are very sensitive in the detection of common bile duct stones, however these blood tests are in the normal range of about 5% of endoscopically treated patients.A prospective evaluation of the diagnostic work-up before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prerequisite for successful laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the exclusion of potential risks such as cholangiolithiasis or anatomical malformations. As there is no general agreement regarding the appropriate preoperative diagnostic work-up, a comparative study of different diagnostic methods was carried out.In 180 consecutive patients admitted to a community hospital for cholecystectomy due to symptomatic cholecystolithiasis, a prospective comparison was carried out of the diagnostic accuracy of patient history, physical examination, laboratory tests, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, intravenous cholangiography, ultrasonography, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Measurement of the diameter of the common bile duct was found to be a reliable method as a single noninvasive parameter for diagnosing cholangiolithiasis (sensitivity 100%, specificity 93%), with good predictive power (positive predictive value 0.7, negative predictive value 1.0). The best accuracy achieved noninvasively and without sonography was with a combination of positive patient history and gamma-glutamyl transferase findings (sensitivity 58%, specificity 84%, positive predictive value 0.37, negative predictive value 0.93). ERCP detected additional cholangiolithiasis in 19 of 139 patients (13.7%) and anatomical malformations in three patients. In all 19 patients, the bile ducts were cleared of stones endoscopically within 24 hours, prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Among the 163 patients primarily assigned to laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the protocol diagnostic work-up, including ERCP, allocated three patients (1.8%) to open surgery. Conversion from laparoscopic cholecystectomy to open cholecystectomy occurred in a further two of 158 patients (1.3%).These results show that routine ultrasonography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be recommended in order to determine the diameter of the common bile duct. In patients with a ductal diameter of more than 6 mm, ERCP should be performed. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be carried out within 24 hours after ERCP and papillotomy.Liver test patterns in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis and/or choledocholithiasis.Liver tests are utilized to determine the presence of biliary obstruction.To examine our hypothesis that liver tests aid in elucidating whether patients have simple calculous cholecystitis (ACC) or choledocholithiasis (CDL).We performed a retrospective study of patients admitted to two University of Texas Southwestern teaching hospitals with a clinical picture consistent with 'acute gallstone disease', i.e. cholecystitis +/- choledocolithiasis. The presence of ACC and CDL was based on defined clinical criteria.The cohort consisted of 154 patients meeting specific entry criteria, primarily with right upper quadrant pain; 62 ACC, 79 both ACC and CDL and 13 CDL alone. Approximately 30% of patients with ACC had abnormal alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and/or bilirubin level and approximately 50% had abnormal aminotransferase levels. Among patients with ACC/CDL, 77% had abnormal ALP, 60% had abnormal bilirubin and 90% had abnormal aminotransferase levels. By multivariate analysis, increasing common bile duct size and an abnormal ALP and alanine aminotransferase (ALT) were excellent predictors of having ACC with CDL.Liver test patterns can aid in elucidating CDL, including in ACC patients. Fundamentally, patients with CDL were more likely to have more abnormal liver tests, whether they had CDL only, or CDL and ACC. A dilated CBD, and abnormal ALP and ALT had modest sensitivity and high specificity for identification of patients with ACC and CDL.Selective per-operative cholangiography and scoring method for selection.A prospective clinical study was undertaken over a period of 3 years on a series of 210 consecutive cases of gall stones to review a selective policy for per-operative cholangiography (PC). All patients had elective cholecystectomy and routine PC. A scoring method (SM) based on pre and per-operative surgical criteria was adopted to determine the necessity of PC before this was attempted. The study revealed that PC was indicated in 64 cases (30.5%) only. Of these 64 patients 20 had abnormal cholangiograms of which 18 proved positive on exploration. There were two false positive results (0.95%) of PC but no false negative result. Of 146 patients (69.5%) not clinically indicated for routine PC, 145 had normal cholangiograms and one had a small (5 mm diameter) silent stone (0.47%) in the Common Bile Duct (CBD). The scoring method failed to predict this case of silent stone. PC was technically unsatisfactory in 4 cases (1.9%). Thus by adopting the selective policy X-rays could have been avoided in 69.5% cases in which only a small silent stone would have been overlooked. However, this stone could have passed into the duodenum spontaneously or else it could have been removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy had it caused any symptoms. It is concluded that routine PC is not always necessary, a selective policy may be preferred and a scoring method may be used as a guide for selection of the cases.[Ultrasonics and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Correlation in biliopancreatic pathology].Diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Relations between historical, laboratory, operative, and peroperative roentgen data.[Value of ultrasonic examination for detection of biliary calculi].[The role of clinical, biochemical and echographic data in identifying the biliary pathogenesis of acute pancreatitis].The role of clinical (biliary pain and/or jaundice), laboratory (discriminant function (DF) calculated using AST, ALT, AlkPh and GGT serum values) and ultrasonographic (US)(dilation and/or stone of common bile duct (CBD)) findings in identification of the biliary etiology of acute pancreatitis (AP) was studied in 60 patients. AP biliary etiology was defined by ERCP executed in the early phase of the disease (lithiasis and/or stenosis of CBD; endoscopic features of forced papilla in patients with gallstone). US showed the best values of sensitivity (84.6%) and diagnostic efficacy (76.7%); DF showed the best results of specificity (62.5%) and of test positive predictive value (92.8%). The statistical evaluation (McNemar test) showed a significant increase of sensitivity for US vs clinical findings and of specificity for DS vs clinical findings (p less than 0.05). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, test negative and positive predictive value were improved to 96.1, 87.5, 96.6, 77.1 and 92% by the combination of US and DF. Therefore the association of US and DF can provide the best non invasive method in rapidly detecting CBD pathology as an etiological factor in AP and then the enough accurate indication to early operative ERCP.[The role of intravenous cholangiography in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy: is there a renaissance?].The preoperative investigation for choledocholithiasis in patients undergoing elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy is still a matter of debate.In a prospective clinical trial the accuracy of intravenous cholangiography (IVC), ultrasonography and liver function tests in the preoperative diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was assessed in 98 patients undergoing elective cholecystectomy. Only patients with uncomplicated cholecystolithiasis considered to be at low risk for having bile duct stones were investigated. A 2-year follow-up clinical survey (mean) was performed in 92 of the 98 patients to investigate the occurrence of postoperative choledocholithiasis (gold standard: clinically manifest choledocholithiasis).In this patient cohort the incidence of choledocholithiasis was found to be 5.1%. Among the three diagnostic tests IVC proved to be more accurate with higher sensitivity and a better positive predictive value than ultrasonography and liver function tests. The sensitivity for IVC was 100% compared to 20% for ultrasonography and 40% for liver function tests, respectively. The positive predictive value for IVC was 83.3% in comparison to 20% for ultrasonography and 25% for liver function tests. Mild side effects caused by intravenous contrast media were observed in 2.0%. During a mean postoperative follow-up of 2 years no clinically manifest and initially overlooked choledocholithiasis could be detected in the 92 investigated patients.IVC is a reliable method to detect unsuspected common bile duct stones and should be used in the preoperative diagnosis prior to elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy. IVC may play a role in decreasing the rate of preoperative ERCP or intraoperative cholangiography in these patients.[Critical evaluation of echography in the diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice].Seventy one patients affected by cholestasis and jaundice were studied by means of ultrasound between september 1980 and february 1983 in order to evaluate the accuracy of this procedure in the investigation of the site of obstruction and its ethiology. The ultrasound findings were correlated with those obtained by opacification of the bile ducts, either endoscopic or percutaneous, and by surgery. The sonographic diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice was based on the size of the biliary tract taking in account that the intrahepatic branches are not evident in normal conditions and considering 4-5 mm and 7-8 mm as the upper limits for the proximal and distal segments of the common bile duct respectively. The accuracy of ultrasound in establishing the common bile duct size was 98%. Forty eight patients had extrahepatic obstruction, 45 of whom had a dilated common bile duct (94%), while 3 were normal (6%). Twenty two patients had an intrahepatic cholestasis, 20 of whom had a normal size of the common bile duct (91%) while 2 showed a dilatation (9%). Thus, the sensitivity was 95.7% and the specificity 86.9%. The ethiologic diagnosis was available in 31 patients with extrahepatic obstruction (65%) and in 7 with intrahepatic cholestasis (32%). Dilated common bile duct with stones and pancreas and gallbladder carcinoma were the most common causes of obstructions we have found in this group of patients. In patients with cholestasis and jaundice the ultrasonic diagnosis should establish the site of obstruction and, if it is possible, the ethiology.Proposed criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There has been a dramatic increase in the number of endoscopic retrograde cholangiograms (ERC) performed on patients who are candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The majority of these procedures result in normal findings. This study is an attempt to determine useful clinical criteria and strategy for predicting the presence or absence of common bile duct stones (CBDS) and the need for ERC in patients who are candidates for LC.The observational portion of this study explored laboratory and ultrasound data from 134 consecutive patients who had undergone preoperative ERC, followed by LC, over a 4-year period. The data were then analyzed by multivariate logistic regression to determine the best models for predicting the presence or absence of stones in the common bile duct. Models using gamma glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT), alkaline phophatase (AP), common bile duct diameter (CBDIA), and amylase (AMY) were then evaluated retrospectively in 36 additional patients (validation group).A model based on GGT and common bile duct diameter as positive predictors and amylase as a negative predictor correctly classified 78% of the patients in the validation group. This model resulted in a negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), sensitivity, and specificity of 0.88, 0.68, 0.87, and 0.71, respectively. The model utilizing AP was almost as effective. This model resulted in a NPV, PPV, sensitivity, and specificity of 0.83, 0.67, 0.80, and 0.71, respectively.Although a number of laboratory values and imaging techniques correlate with the presence or absence of CBDS, our study confirms that individually they have poor predictive value. Our data and models suggest that elevated serum amylase is a negative predictor for CBDS. Elevated GGT and/or AP with widened CBDIA and normal AMY strongly suggest the presence of CBDS and the need for preoperative ERC. Elevated GGT, AP, or widened CBDIA with elevated amylase, in the absence of clinical pancreatitis, may suggest that small stones have passed through the ampulla of Vater and that the CBD is generally cleared of stones.[Comparative study of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in common duct stones].To compare the diagnostic value study the technique of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in common duct stones.Three hundreds and eighty-four patients suspected common duct stones from August 2005 to October 2007 were undergone abdominal ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP.There was stone in common duct in 370 and no stones in 14 of 384 patients. Ultrasonography indicated stones 268 cases, 8 false positive result was among them. MRCP diagnosed stones in 362 cases and false positive result in 6 cases, ERCP diagnosed stones 370 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP was 70.3% (260/370), 96.2% (356/370) and 100% respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography for common duct stone was little higher, US should be used as a primary checking method. There was higher concordance between MRCP and ERCP for common duct stone. Combination of MRCP and ERCP can improve diagnostic accuracy of common duct stone.Preoperative bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and amylase levels as predictors of common duct stones.The predictive value of the preoperative level of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and amylase as indicators of choledocholithiasis was determined by prospectively evaluating 304 consecutive patients undergoing cholecystectomy. Elevated levels of bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase are associated with an increased incidence of common duct stones, and the percentage incidence of stones increases with rising bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels. Alkaline phosphatase levels as great as 200 are associated with common duct stones in a low percentage of instances, being equivalent to that for unsuspected stones. Levels of 200 or greater are associated with a marked increase in the incidence of common duct stones. An elevated serum or urine amylase level, or both, is of little, if any, value as a predictor of common duct stones. Alkaline phosphatase appears to be a better indicator of common duct stones than does bilirubin, but neither bilirubin nor alkaline phosphatase in themselves are statistically significant indicators. Bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase in combination is a statistically significant predictor of common duct stones at all levels. The combination of a bilirubin level of greater than 3.0 and an alkaline phosphatase level of greater than 250 has a 76.2 per cent probability of an associated common duct stone. The quite important role of operative cholangiography in demonstrating unsuspected stones and in preventing unnecessary common duct explorations is reinforced.[Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and its complications].The author presents the results of ultrasound investigation (USI) of 419 patients with cholecystocholedocholithiasis. The diagnostic accuracy of USI methods in patients with calculous cholecystitis was 98.8%. Direct signs of visualization of concrements in the common bile duct (CBD) were found but in 68.5% of patients. On the basis of USI results the common bile stones were found in 287 (68.5%) patients. The concrements omitted in transabdominal USI were diagnosed using endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography, magnetic resonance cholangio-pancreaticography, endoscopic ultrasonography as well as in operative intervention.Are liver function tests, pancreatitis and cholecystitis predictors of common bile duct stones? Results of a prospective, population-based, cohort study of 1171 patients undergoing cholecystectomy.The purpose of this study was to explore the accuracy of elevated liver function values, age, gender, pancreatitis and cholecystitis as predictors of common bile duct stones (CBDS).All patients operated on for gallstone disease over a period of 3 years in a Swedish county of 302,564 citizens were registered prospectively. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was used to detect CBDS.A total of 1171 patients were registered; 95% of these patients underwent IOC. Common bile duct stones were found in 42% of patients with elevated liver function values, 20% of patients with a history of pancreatitis and 9% of patients with cholecystitis. The presence of CBDS was significantly predicted by elevated liver function values, but not by age, gender, history of acute pancreatitis or cholecystitis. A total of 93% of patients with normal liver function tests had a normal IOC. The best agreement between elevated liver function values and CBDS was seen in patients undergoing elective surgery without a history of acute pancreatitis or cholecystitis.Although alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and bilirubin levels represented the most reliable predictors of CBDS, false positive and false negative values were common, especially in patients with a history of cholecystitis or pancreatitis, which indicates that other mechanisms were responsible for elevated liver function values in these patients.Indication of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography by noninvasive predictive factors of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective clinical study.To evaluate the reliability of a screening method in patients with common bile duct (CBD) stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) based on predictive factors, and to determine the cases for which preoperative therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) is indicated.Alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, amylase, and dilation of CBD results were defined as predictive factors for CBD stones. In cases in which all these 4 factors were negative, preoperative ERC was omitted, and in cases in which 1 of the 4 factors was positive, ERC was performed before LC.A total of 323 patients (83.7%) in whom all 4 factors were negative, ERC was omitted. In all the 63 patients (16.3%) in whom 1 of the 4 factors was positive, ERC was performed. In 52 (82.5%) of them, CBD stones were present and in 43 of them, LC was performed after endoscopic choledocholithotomy.For cases in which any 1 of the 4 factors was positive before LC, it was strongly recommended to perform preoperative ERC.Prediction of common bile duct stones in the earliest stages of acute biliary pancreatitis.Accurate prediction of common bile duct (CBD) stones in acute biliary pancreatitis is warranted to select patients for early therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). We evaluated commonly used biochemical and radiological predictors of CBD stones in a large prospective cohort of patients with acute biliary pancreatitis who were undergoing early ERCP.167 patients with acute biliary pancreatitis who were undergoing early ERCP (< 72 hours after symptom onset) in 15 Dutch hospitals in 2004 - 2007 were prospectively included. Abdominal ultrasonography and/or computed tomography (CT) was performed on admission and complete liver biochemistry determined daily. We used univariate logistic regression to assess associations between CBD stones found during ERCP (gold standard) and the following parameters: (1) clinical: age, sex, predicted severity; (2) radiological: dilated CBD, impacted stone in CBD; and (3) biochemical: bilirubin, γ-glutamyltransferase (GGT), alkaline phosphatase, alanine aminotransferase (ALT), and aspartate aminotransferase (AST).Out of 167 patients, 94 (56 %) had predicted severe acute biliary pancreatitis, 51 (31%) exhibited a dilated CBD and 15 (9%) had CBD stones on ultrasonography and/or CT. ERCP was performed at a median of 0 days (interquartile range 0 - 1) after admission. CBD stones were found during ERCP in 89/167 patients (53%). In univariate analysis, the only parameters significantly associated with CBD stones were GGT (per 10 units increase: odds ratio 1.02, 95% CI 1.01 - 1.03, P = 0.001) and alkaline phosphatase (per 10 units increase: odds ratio 1.03, 95% CI 1.00 - 1.05, P = 0.028). These and all other tested parameters, however, showed poor positive predictive value (ranging from 0.53 to 0.69) and poor negative predictive value (ranging from 0.46 to 0.67).The results of this study suggest that commonly used biochemical and radiological predictors of the presence of CBD stones during ERCP in the earliest stages of acute biliary pancreatitis are unreliable.[Diagnostic performance of biliary ultrasound vs. magnetic resonance cholangiogram in patients with recurrent biliary obstruction.].Obstructive jaundice in patients with previous cholecystectomy requires a precise diagnosis. In the diagnostic algorithm, biliary ultrasound (BUS) and magnetic resonance cholangiogram (MRC) are used, although the accuracy of each method is unknown in our setting. No previous comparison of US and MRC in subjects with cholecystectomy has been made.To determine diagnostic accuracy of BUS and MRC in patients with recurrent biliary obstruction.Patients with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopacreatography (ERCP) demonstrating recurrent biliary obstruction by stones were included. All patients underwent BUS and MRC. We determined the diagnostic performance of each image study compared with ERCP.Twenty-seven patients with a mean age of 62.9 +/- 17.3 years-old were included. Sensitivity and specificity of BUS were 0.12 and 0.58, respectively. Figures for MRC were 0.88 and 0.82. Diagnostic agreement between ERCP and MRC was k= 0.66 whereas BUS had a k of only 0.26.MRC had good diagnostic performance for recurrent choledocolithiasis. BUS demonstrated lower accuracy compared with previous reports, so should not be considered in the initial approach of recurrent choledocus obstruction.Comparative diagnostic evaluation with MR cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography and CT in patients with pancreatobiliary disease.The aim of this study was to directly compare the results of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) with those of ultrasonography (US) and multislice computed tomography (MSCT) in the diagnosis of pancreaticobiliary diseases.A total of 70 patients (41 men, 29 women) aged 22-89 years were studied either before (n=59) or after cholecystectomy (n=11) for biliary lithiasis. Clinical signs and symptoms were jaundice (n=15), abdominal pain (n=37) and proven biliary lithiasis (n=18). MRCP was performed in all patients, whereas abdominal US was performed in 55 (group 1) and MSCT in 37 (group 2) patients. A regional evaluation of the main structures of the pancreaticobiliary system was performed: gallbladder and cystic duct, intra- and extrahepatic bile ducts and main pancreatic duct. Histology (n=27), biopsy (n=5), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (n=28) and/or clinical-imaging follow-up (n=10) were considered standards of reference. In particular, patients were classified as showing benign (n=47) or malignant (n=12) lesions or normal biliary anatomy (n=11).In group 1, the results of MRCP and US were concordant in the majority (92%) of cases; however, statistically significant discordance (p<0.01) was found in the evaluation of the extrahepatic ducts, with nine cases (16%) of middle-distal common bile duct stones being detected on MRCP only. In group 2, the results of MRCP and MSCT were also concordant in most cases (87%). However, findings were significantly discordant when the intra- and extrahepatic ducts were analysed, with seven (19%) and six (16%) cases, respectively, of lithiasis being detected on MRCP only (p<0.01 for both).The results of our study confirm the diagnostic potential of MRCP in the study of the pancreaticobiliary duct system. In particular, the comparison between MRCP and US and MSCT indicates the superiority of MRCP in evaluating bile ducts and detecting stones in the common bile duct.Liver test patterns in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis and/or choledocholithiasis.Liver tests are utilized to determine the presence of biliary obstruction.To examine our hypothesis that liver tests aid in elucidating whether patients have simple calculous cholecystitis (ACC) or choledocholithiasis (CDL).We performed a retrospective study of patients admitted to two University of Texas Southwestern teaching hospitals with a clinical picture consistent with 'acute gallstone disease', i.e. cholecystitis +/- choledocolithiasis. The presence of ACC and CDL was based on defined clinical criteria.The cohort consisted of 154 patients meeting specific entry criteria, primarily with right upper quadrant pain; 62 ACC, 79 both ACC and CDL and 13 CDL alone. Approximately 30% of patients with ACC had abnormal alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and/or bilirubin level and approximately 50% had abnormal aminotransferase levels. Among patients with ACC/CDL, 77% had abnormal ALP, 60% had abnormal bilirubin and 90% had abnormal aminotransferase levels. By multivariate analysis, increasing common bile duct size and an abnormal ALP and alanine aminotransferase (ALT) were excellent predictors of having ACC with CDL.Liver test patterns can aid in elucidating CDL, including in ACC patients. Fundamentally, patients with CDL were more likely to have more abnormal liver tests, whether they had CDL only, or CDL and ACC. A dilated CBD, and abnormal ALP and ALT had modest sensitivity and high specificity for identification of patients with ACC and CDL.[Comparative study of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in common duct stones].To compare the diagnostic value study the technique of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in common duct stones.Three hundreds and eighty-four patients suspected common duct stones from August 2005 to October 2007 were undergone abdominal ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP.There was stone in common duct in 370 and no stones in 14 of 384 patients. Ultrasonography indicated stones 268 cases, 8 false positive result was among them. MRCP diagnosed stones in 362 cases and false positive result in 6 cases, ERCP diagnosed stones 370 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP was 70.3% (260/370), 96.2% (356/370) and 100% respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography for common duct stone was little higher, US should be used as a primary checking method. There was higher concordance between MRCP and ERCP for common duct stone. Combination of MRCP and ERCP can improve diagnostic accuracy of common duct stone.Total bilirubin is a useful predictor of persisting common bile duct stone in gallstone pancreatitis.Accepted guidelines for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in gallstone pancreatitis are lacking. Our previous investigations suggested that serum total bilirubin on hospital Day 2 best predicts persisting common bile duct (CBD) stones. We aim to identify an optimal total bilirubin threshold on hospital Day 2 that would predict persisting CBD stones and guide obtaining preoperative ERCP. Prospective and retrospective data were available from 200 consecutive patients with gallstone pancreatitis at a public teaching hospital from 2003 through 2007. Charts were examined for persisting CBD stones on ERCP and/or intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Patients with cholangitis (n = 18) were excluded. Nineteen of the remaining 182 (10%) patients had CBD stones. Mean hospital Day 2 bilirubin was 3.7 mg/dL for patients with CBD stones versus 1.4 mg/dL for those without (P < 0.0001). Seventeen patients (9%) had total bilirubin 4 or greater on hospital Day 2. Of these, eight (4%) had CBD stones (specificity 94%). Of the 165 patients with total bilirubin less than 4, 11 (7%) had CBD stones (P < 0.0001). In gallstone pancreatitis, a serum total bilirubin level 4 mg/dL or greater on hospital Day 2 predicts persisting CBD stones with enough specificity to serve as a practical guideline for ERCP while minimizing unnecessary procedures.Preoperative clinical and paraclinical predictors of choledocholithiasis.Choledocholithiasis is the most common cause of obstructive jaundice and cholangitis and occurs in about 10% of patients with symptomatic gallstone. The aim of this study was to find preoperative and non-invasive tests for predicting common bile duct stones (CBDs).Findings of clinical examination, history, laboratory tests and ultrasound (US) in 60 patients with CBDs were compared retrospectively, with 60 patients with gallstones. The data were collected from medical charts. The sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value (PPV) were determined.The comparison between the two groups showed significant differences in anorexia, itching, dark urine, subicterus (slightly elevated serum bilirubin without clinical evidence of jaundice) and jaundice appearance, increased bilirubin level, aspartate aminotransferase (AST) and alanine aminotranferase (ALT), CBD diameter >6 mm and stone observation under US (P<0.05). The highest specificity (100%) and PPV (100%) were found in dark urine and pale colored stool, history of cholangitis, and icterus. Among paraclinical tests, alkaline phosphatase (ALP) had the highest specificity (72.1%) and PPV (12.5%). Under US, stone observation in CBD was the most important factor with a sensitivity of 94.5%, a specificity of 100% and a PPV of 100%.The most important factors for predicting CBDs are history of cholangitis and pancreatitis, presence of icterus, dark urine, pale colored stool, elevation of ALP, and sonographic evidence of chledocholithiasis.Biochemical predictors for absence of common bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To provide optimal selection of patients for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography or intraoperative cholangiography, we evaluated simple, noninvasive biochemical parameters as screening tests to predict the absence of common bile duct stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A total of 1002 patients underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Five biochemical parameters were measured preoperatively: gamma glutamyl transferase (GGT), alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, alanine aminotransferase, and aspartate aminotransferase. Conventional diagnostic tests, including ultrasound imaging, computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, common bile duct diameter, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and serum amylase were performed. Along with the five biochemical tests above, these diagnostic tests were scrutinized and compared as potential predictors for common bile duct stones.Eighty-eight (8.8%) patients with gallstone disease who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy had concurrent common bile duct stones. Among all diagnostic tests, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography had the highest sensitivity (96.0%), specificity (99.1%), probability ratio (107.3), accuracy (98.0%), and positive predictive value (98.8%) in detecting common bile duct stones. At least one abnormal elevation among the five biochemical parameters had the highest sensitivity (87.5%). Total bilirubin had the highest specificity (87.5%), highest probability ratio (3.9), highest accuracy (84.1%), and highest positive predictive value (27.4%). All five biochemical predictors had high negative predictive values; gamma glutamyl transferase was highest (97.9%), while the lowest was total bilirubin (94.7%). Multivariate analysis showed only gamma glutamyl transferase, alkaline phosphatase, and total bilirubin to be independent predictors; gamma glutamyl transferase appeared to be the most powerful predictor (odds ratio 3.20).Biochemical tests, especially gamma glutamyl transferase with 97.9% negative predictive value, are ideal noninvasive predictors for the absence of common bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. We suggest that unnecessary, costly, or risky procedures such as endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography can be omitted prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy in patients without abnormal elevation of these biochemical values.Triple non-invasive diagnostic test for exclusion of common bile ducts stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To evaluate the impact of a preoperative "triple non-invasive diagnostic test" for diagnosis and/or exclusion of common bile duct stones.All patients with symptomatic gallstone disease, operated on by laparoscopic cholecystectomy from March 2004 to March 2006 were studied retrospectively. Two hundred patients were included and reviewed by using a triple diagnostic test including: patient's medical history, routine liver function tests and routine ultrasonography. All patients were followed up 2-24 mo after surgery to evaluate the impact of triple diagnostic test.Twenty-five patients were identified to have common bile duct stones. Lack of history of stones, negative laboratory tests and normal ultrasonography alone was proven to exclude common bile duct stones in some patients. However, a combination of these three components (triple diagnostic), was proven to be the most statistically significant test to exclude common bile duct stones in patients with gallstone disease.Using a combination of routinely used diagnostic components as triple diagnostic modality would increase the diagnostic accuracy of common bile duct stones preoperatively. This triple non-invasive test is recommended for excluding common bile duct stones and to identify patients in need for other investigations.[Alterations in laboratory tests as predictors of choledocholithiasis in patients who underwent ERCP: experience in a national private center].ERCP is very important in the management of common bile duct stones but it has associated morbidity.We analyze retrospectively records of 293 patients with suspected CBD stones to determine laboratory predictors of the pathology and improve the selection of patients for the examination. Sensitivity, specifity, predictive positive value and predictive negative value were calculated for alkaline phosphatase (FA), Total Bilirrubin (BT), TGO(AST) and TGO(ALT). We also compared values between patients with and without gallbladder suffering CBD stones confirmed by ERCP.293 patients had ERCP. 247 had CBD stones and 46 had no stones. OF the CBD stones group 58(23%) didn't have gallbladder and 187(77%) had gallbladder. Hepatic function tests FA, TGP y BT where all pronostic factors for CBD stones on univariate analysis with statistical value of p<0.01. Clinical presentation was not included in analysis. Age, TGO(AST) and GGTP didn't showed statistical significance.The predictors of CBD stones have better results when combined. The use of stricter selection criteria can reduce the number of normal exams and complications.Preoperative determinants of common bile duct stones during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The aim of this study is to determine whether there are any clinical or biochemical predictors of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prospective database of nearly 1000 laparoscopic cholecystectomies performed under the care of a single surgeon with a standardised technique between 1999 and 2006, was analysed. Clinical presentation, ultrasound and immediate preoperative biochemical results as well as the operative cholangiogram findings were reviewed. Routine cholangiography was attempted in most patients and the primary outcome variable was the detection of bile duct stones. The data was analysed using chi-squared test for categorical variables. The significant variables on univariate analysis were further characterised to identify the independent predictors of bile duct stones using a logistic regression model (significance p < 0.05).A total of 757 of 988 patients (77%) underwent cholangiography. Male-to-female ratio was 1 : 3 with a median age of 54 years (range: 17-93). Ten per cent of patients had bile duct stones identified on cholangiography. On univariate analysis, jaundice (p = 0.019), cholangitis (p < 0.001), alanine transaminase > 100 (p = 0.024), alkaline phosphatase (ALP) > 350 (p < 0.001) and CBD > 10 mm (p = 0.01) were significant markers for predicting bile duct stones. Bilirubin > 30 (x2 normal) was found not to be significant (p = 0.145). On a logistic regression model, ALP > 350 and/or cholangitis were found to be independent predictive factors of CBD stones (odds ratio 6.1).If a policy of routine intra-operative cholangiography is not adopted, a history of cholangitis or a raised ALP immediately preoperatively should lead to a high suspicion of CBD stones.[Choledocolithiasis predictors in high-risk population subjected to endoscopic retrograde pancreatocholangiography at "Hospital Nacional Arzobispo Loayza"].The choledocholithiasis is a frequent complication of gallstone disease. The endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is suitable for its diagnosis and treatment. That approach has both significative morbility and mortality so others methods of diagnosis have been proposed such as intraoperatorycholangiography (IOC) and magnetic resonance cholangiography (MRC), reserving ERCP only for therapy purpose.Verify the utility of choledocholithiasis predictors described in literatureThis study is a correlational observational transversal prospective approach. It was performed at the Arzobispo Loayza Hospital from August 2004 to January 2005. Many clinical, biochemical and ecographyc predictors of choledocholithiasis were analyzed in 151 patient underwent to ERCP. In all peopleunder study and analyzing separately patients underwent to cholecystectomy or not previous to ERCP, it was identified some risk factors for choledocholithiasis by means of both univariate and multivariate analysis.The univariate analysis showed a relationships among age, icterus, cholangytis, direct bilirrubin, amylase, lactic deshidrogenasa, ductal dilatation (>8 mm) and choledocholithiasis. In all groups, the multivariate analysis determined that ductal dilatation by ecography was the unique predictor for choledocholithiasis in the group of patients postoperated.None single indicator was able to predict with accuracy the choledocholithiasis. However, the parameters described in the literature are useful in our country.[Conventional ultrasound in the diagnosis of bile duct calculi].Transabdominal ultrasound (US) is one of the most useful methods in the diagnosis of biliary stones.To appreciate the value of US in the diagnosis of bile duct stones.989 patients, explored in the Institute of Gastroenterology and Hepatology Iaşi by US compared with ERCP, MRCP, operative diagnosis and the final diagnostic.The sensitivity of US in the detection of bile duct stones was 78.39% and specificity was 72.22% in the first group of 650 patients, and bile duct stones were identified in 139 cases of 339 of the second group where US could not identify the cause of bile duct dilatations.The results were comparable with the most recent studies in the literature.US is an efficient method for the diagnosis of bile duct stones in many cases and remains the first step in the diagnosis.Impact of the operator's experience on value of high-resolution transabdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis: a prospective comparison using endoscopic retrograde cholangiography as the gold standard.Transabdominal ultrasound (US) is the most frequently used imaging method for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of high-resolution US in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones depending on the operator's experience and in comparison with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) as the gold standard.From April 2003 through November 2004, 126 patients referred because of clinically and biochemically suspected common bile duct stones were included in the study. Two patients were excluded because they refused to undergo ERC. Consequently, the study comprised 124 patients (86 F, 38 M, mean age 63.2 years, range 21-91 years). High-resolution US was performed (2-5 MHz sector scanner; Siemens Elegra, Erlangen, Germany) by operators who were unaware of the results of other imaging procedures. The definitive diagnosis was established by means of ERC.Thirty-five out of 124 patients were investigated by experienced examiners. Twenty-seven of 35 patients (77%) were found to have stones at ERC. Bile duct stones were correctly found by US in 22 out of 27 patients (sensitivity 82%, 95% CI: 63-92). Of the 8 patients without stones at ERC, one false-positive diagnosis was made with US (specificity 88%, 95% CI: 53-98). Correct diagnoses were made in 29 out of 35 (accuracy 83%, 95% CI: 67-92) patients investigated by experienced examiners. Eighty-nine out of 124 patients were investigated by less-experienced examiners. Fifty-four of 89 patients (61%) were found to have stones at ERC. Choledocholithiasis was found correctly in only 25 out of 54 patients (sensitivity 46%, 95% CI: 34-59). Of the 35 patients without stones at ERC, three false-positive diagnoses were made with US (specificity 91%, 95% CI: 78-97). In conclusion, correct diagnoses were observed in 57 of 89 patients (accuracy 64%, 95% CI: 54-73) investigated by less-experienced examiners (p<0.05 in comparison with the results of experienced examiners).High-resolution US carried out by experienced examiners has a high diagnostic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Therefore, good training and continued experience are prerequisites for successful sonographic detection of bile duct stones using US. Under these conditions, further expensive and invasive methods such as ERC, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic ultrasonography may not be necessary in cases with a clear sonographic diagnosis.Useful predictive factors of common bile duct stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for gallstones.The aim of this study was to determine useful predictive factors of common bile duct stones (CBDs) as diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) for gallstones.A total of 510 patients underwent ERCP prior to LC. Also reviewed in each were clinical data, laboratory data, and ultrasonographic findings. Data were evaluated by uni- and multivariate analysis to determine which of the useful predictive factors thus far reported might be in the concurrence of CBDs.Univariate analysis identified jaundice, pancreatitis, ALT, total bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, amylase, and CBD dilatation at ultrasonography as predictors. Multivariate analysis subsequently identified alkaline phosphatase (p<0.0001), total bilirubin (p=0.0008), amylase (p=0.0009), and CBD dilatation at ultrasonography (p=0.0012) as independent predictive factors of CBDs. The estimates for the detection of CBDs, when the indication of ERCP is determined on the basis of the four predictive factors, were found to be as follows: sensitivity 97.6%, positive predictive value 78.6%, and positive accuracy 95.3%.It is advisable to ascertain by preoperative ERCP whether there might be any CBDs in patients about to undergo an LC for treatment of cholelithiasis insofar as the patient has one or more of these factors. It is concluded that an LC may be performed by omitting the prior ERCP, conversely, on patients devoid of all of these factors.Validity of ultrasonography in diagnosing obstructive jaundice.To evaluate the validity of ultrasonography in patients who have obstructive jaundice.A descriptive retrospective study.Surgical Department, Tikur Anbessa Teaching Hospital, Addis-Ababa, Ethiopia.A total of 49 patients; 15 male and 34 female underwent operation for obstructive jaundice.The cause of obstructive jaundice identified by ultrasonography with reasonable sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 79% for choledocholithiasis and sensitivity of 50% and specificity of 90% for pancreatic head tumours. The degree of common bile duct enlargement was significantly higher when the cause for obstruction was malignant, originating from the head of pancreas or distal end of the common bile duct.Ultrasonography should be the first and best initial imaging procedure in patients who have obstructive jaundice and shows reasonable sensitivity and specificity to identify causes of obstruction in obstructive jaundice. These findings may act also as a base for which further studies on validity of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of obstructive jaundice could be carried out.Role of liver function tests in predicting common bile duct stones in acute calculous cholecystitis.The role of liver function tests (LFTs) in evaluating common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients with cholelithiasis has been studied widely. However, it is not clear whether these predictive models are useful in inflammatory gallstone disease.A review was undertaken of 385 consecutive patients admitted as an emergency for acute calculous gallbladder disease. The diagnosis of calculous cholecystitis was confirmed by ultrasonography or histological confirmation of acute or chronic inflammation of the gallbladder. Patients with obvious jaundice, defined as a bilirubin level above 80 micromol/l, and gallstone pancreatitis were excluded.Some 216 patients met the inclusion criteria, of whom 28 (13.0 per cent) were found to have CBD stones. LFT results were not significantly different in patients with chronic, acute or complicated acute cholecystitis. Using several cut-off levels, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT) had the highest specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value, comparable to a scoring system that combined all LFTs. Bilirubin was the least specific and predictive. A cut-off point for GGT at 90 units/l produced a sensitivity of 86 per cent (24 of 28), specificity of 74.5 per cent (140 of 188), and positive and negative predictive values of 33 per cent (24 of 72) and 97.2 per cent (140 of 144) respectively. This represented a one in three chance of CBD stones when the GGT level was above 90 units/l and a one in 30 chance when the level was less than 90 units/l.Selection criteria based on GGT can be used in acute calculous cholecystitis to identify high-risk patients who would benefit most from further imaging to exclude choledocholithiasis.[Ultrasonic diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].Potential of ultrasonic examination for diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was analyzed in 47 patients. Ultrasonic scanners Acuson 128XP and SONOLINE Elegra with 2-9 MHz sensors were used. Choledocholithisis was diagnosed during transabdominal echography in 38 (80.9%) patients. Method of ultrasound-assisted "vibratory" palpation for diagnosis of mobile concrements of the common bile duct is presented. Causes of 2 (4.3%) false-positive and 7 (14.9%) false-negative results of examination are analyzed.Predictors of common bile duct lithiasis in laparoscopic era.To analyze retrospectively the records of 294 consecutive patients operated upon for gallbladder stones, to determine the predictive factors of synchronous common bile duct (CBD) stones and validate prospectively the generated model.The prognostic estimation of a biochemical test and ultrasonography alone to differentiate between the absence and presence of choledocholithiasis was assessed using receiver operating characteristics curve analysis. Multivariate analysis was employed using discriminant analysis for establishment of a best model. Prospective validation of the model was made.Discriminant forward stepwise analysis disclosed that high values (> or = 2 x normal) of SGOT, ALP, conjugated bilirubin and CBD diameter on ultrasound > or = 10 mm were all prognostic factors of CBD lithiasis in univariate and multivariate analysis, P< 0.01. History was not included in the model. Prospective validation of the model was performed by multivariate analysis using Visual General Stepwise Regression. Positive predictive value, when considering all these predictors, was 93.3%, while the negative predictive value was 88.8%. Sensitivity of the model was 96.5% and specificity 80%.The above model can be objectively applied to predict the presence of CBD stones.The detection of bile duct stones in suspected biliary pancreatitis: comparison of MRCP, ERCP, and intraductal US.Early ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy for stone extraction can benefit the prognosis in patients with severe biliary pancreatitis, but are associated with complications. The ability to identify choledocholithiasis by noninvasive means in biliary pancreatitis is limited. The aim of this study was evaluation of the ability of MRCP to detect choledocholithiasis in patients with acute biliary pancreatitis. In addition, we investigated whether intraductal US (IDUS) could help manage these patients.Thirty-two patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis were studied prospectively. MRCP was performed immediately before ERCP by separate blinded examiners within 24 h of admission. Wire-guided IDUS was performed during ERCP within 72 h of admission, regardless of the results of MRCP. Using endoscopic extraction of a stone as the reference standard, the diagnostic yield of MRCP was compared with transabdominal US, CT, ERCP, and IDUS.The sensitivity of US, CT, MRCP, ERCP, and IDUS for identifying choledocholithiasis was 20.0%, 40.0%, 80.0%, 90.0%, and 95.0%, respectively. The overall agreement between MRCP and ERCP was 90.6% for choledocholithiasis (kappa= 0.808, p < 0.01). The sensitivity of MRCP for detecting choledocholithiasis decreased with dilated bile ducts (bile duct diameter > 10 mm, 72.7% vs 88.9%). The combination of ERCP and IDUS improved accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.MRCP can be used to select patients with biliary pancreatitis who require ERCP. IDUS may be applied in the management of biliary pancreatitis if ERCP is performed.Selective endoscopic cholangiography for the detection of common bile duct stones in patients with cholelithiasis.The detection and management of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy continues to be controversial. Several diagnostic and therapeutic strategies have been suggested. These include intraoperative cholangiography, selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography. The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of selective ERCP in detecting CBD stones in patients with cholelithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In a prospective study, patients with cholelithiasis who presented during a 6-year period were assessed on a selective basis with ERCP for suspected CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. ERCP was carried out if the patient had any of the following criteria: a dilated CBD on ultrasound, gallstone pancreatitis, or abnormal liver function tests. Intraoperative cholangiography was not performed in any of the patients. Long-term follow-up was undertaken.The study included 427 patients. On the basis of selective criteria, ERCP was carried out in 41 patients (9.6 %), with confirmed CBD stones in 22 cases (53.7 %). The most useful predictor of CBD stones on ERCP was the presence of a dilated CBD in association with abnormal liver function tests. In this situation, CBD stones were identified in 14 of 17 cases (82 %). Abnormal liver function tests alone had a sensitivity of 50 % (four of eight). All other parameters used in isolation had a lower detection rate. During a median follow-up period of 6 years (range 1-10 years), six of 386 patients (1.6 %) with initially normal imaging and biochemical tests presented again with retained stones. All were successfully managed by ERCP and sphincterotomy. There were no major complications.Preoperative selective ERCP is effective in detecting clinically significant CBD stones. However, there is a high false-negative rate when a single criterion is used to guide therapy. Multivariate analysis of preoperative parameters for risk stratification, in conjunction with other imaging modalities, may make it possible to minimize unnecessary ERCPs.Selection criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy and endoscopic treatment of bile duct stones: results of a retrospective, single center study between 1996-2002.The optimal treatment for bile duct stones (in terms of cost, complications and accuracy) is unclear. The aim of our study was to determine the predictive factors for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Patients undergoing preoperative ERCP (< or =90 d before laparoscopic cholecystectomy) were evaluated in this retrospective study from the 1st of January 1996 to the 31st of December 2002. The indications for ERCP were elevated serum bilirubin, elevated liver function tests (LFT), dilated bile duct (> or =8 mm) and/or stone at US examination, coexisting acute pancreatitis and/or acute pancreatitis or jaundice in patient's history. Suspected prognostic factors and the combination of factors were compared to the result of ERCP.Two hundred and six preoperative ERCPs were performed during the observed period. The rate of successful cannulation for ERC was (97.1%). Bile duct stones were detected in 81 patients (39.3%), and successfully removed in 79 (97.5%). The number of prognostic factors correlated with the presence of bile duct stones. The positive predictive value for one prognostic factor was 1.2%, for two 43%, for three 72.5%, for four or more 91.4%.Based on our data preoperative ERCP is highly recommended in patients with three or more positive factors (high risk patients). In contrast, ERCP is not indicated in patients with zero or one factor (low risk patients). Preoperative ERCP should be offered to patients with two positive factors (moderate risk patients), however the practice should also be based on the local conditions (e.g. skill of the endoscopist, other diagnostic tools).Endoscopic sphincterotomy in 100 patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: ultrasound evaluation.The aim of the study was to determine to what extent ultrasonography may monitor the process of sphincterotomy and its effectiveness. The study also aimed at determining the sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detecting choledocholithiasis, in comparison with the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Between January 1995 and June 2001, endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed on 100 patients with suspected synchronous choledocholithiasis in preparation for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The main parameters evaluated in the ultrasonography image included the breadth of the common bile duct and absence or presence of concrements in bile ducts before and after sphincterotomy.Applied before the endoscopic operation, ultrasonography revealed choledocholithiasis in 58 patients and dilatation of the common bile duct in 95 patients. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography confirmed choledocholithiasis in 74 patients, after sphincterotomy concrements were removed in 63 persons. In 26 patients sphincterotomy was performed for stenosis of Vater's papilla. Patients with the breadth of the duct > 10 mm, were referred to a check-up examination.Compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography correctly specifies the breadth of the bile duct and properly monitors the process of endoscopic sphincterotomy, but is less accurate in determining the occurrence of choledocholithiasis, and sensitivity in the test amounted to 73%, and specificity of the examination--84.5%.Prospective evaluation of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in patients with biliary disease: comparative study with conventional ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography diagnostic algorithm.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is an accurate technique that can replace invasive diagnostic methods of the biliary and pancreatic duct.Our aim was to assess sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasonography using the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography as reference, and to establish a diagnostic algorithm under which circumstances magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography can replace endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Eighty-three patients with suspicion of biliary disease based on clinical, biochemical and ultrasonography findings were studied.Ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were performed, comparing the results of the techniques for the determination of their sensitivity and specificity.Sensitivity and specificity results obtained by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography were: 100 and 92.8% when dilated ducts were detected (n=61); 97.4 and 97.2% in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis (n=38); 100 and 96.7% in malignant lesions (n=14) and 81.8 and 98.4% when biliary ducts were normal. The percentage of images of diagnostic quality was 97.6%. Sensitivity and specificity achieved by ultrasonography was: 100 and 57.1% in detection of dilatation, 71 and 97.2% in choledocholithiasis, 92.8 and 96.7% in malignancy and 66.6 and 96.8% in normal ducts.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is a technique with high sensitivity and specificity in the evaluation of biliary ducts. Thus, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography may replace diagnostic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for purely diagnostic purposes, following an initial clinical and ultrasonographic exam.Routine preoperative laboratory analyses are unnecessary before elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy.We formulated a clinical pathway (CP) for elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC), which included the following preoperative evaluation: history and physical (H&P), right upper quadrant ultrasound (US), and liver function tests (LFTs). We hypothesized that routine LFTs did not alter management beyond that dictated by H&P and US, and could be excluded from the CP.The study involved 387 consecutive patients undergoing elective LC. Abnormalities in the preoperative evaluation were compared with the finding of choledocholithiasis or other unexpected outcomes.In 187 (48%) patients, abnormalities were found by H&P (n = 7), US (n = 13), and LFTs (n = 177). Seven patients (2%) had documented choledocholithiasis; two had abnormal H & P; three had abnormal US; and four had abnormal LFTs. No patient with choledocholithiasis had abnormal LFTs but normal H&P and US.Routine LFTs before elective LC are not cost effective. Before LC H&P and US are warranted, but LFTs do not add any useful information and should not be routinely measured.Rapid diagnosis of choledocholithiasis using biochemical tests in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The present study was designed to identify the biochemical tests which could detect the presence of common bile duct stones in patients with symptomatic gallstones, without other invasive investigations. The usefulness of biochemical tests may reduce the necessity of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy.3000 patients with symptomatic laparoscopic cholecystectomy scheduled for laparoscopic cholesystectomy were included in the study. 458 patients (201 men, 257 women; mean age, 57.7 +/- 14.6 yrs) were examined with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for suspected common bile duct stones. The serum tests for liver function, including a measurement of aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase, alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, direct bilirubin, gamma-glutamyltransferase and albumin were obtained on admission prior to the ultrasonography, and the endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The six significant factors, including alkaline phosphatase, direct bilirubin, total bilirubin, aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase and gamma-glutamyltransferase were identified by the univariate analysis and the multivariate logistic regression analysis which identified alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyltransferase, as the two significant independent factors. A statistical model was developed with a formula of [formula: see text] A curve of receiver operating characteristics was constructed to identify an alkaline phosphatase level greater than 300 U/L or a gamma-glutamyltransferase level greater than 420 mU/mL which would have both higher sensitivity and specificity.Biochemical tests can be a significant aid to the clinician's decision-making when predicting the presence of common bile duct stones in patients with gallstones.Evaluation of the predictors of choledocholithiasis: comparative analysis of clinical, biochemical, radiological, radionuclear, and intraoperative parameters.This prospective study was performed to assess the predictive ability of the various indicators of common bile duct (CBD) calculi, individually or in combination, by analyzing 88 patients with gallstone disease. The patients were classified into two groups according to the presence of 10 predefined criteria. Of 53 patients with one or more risk factors (group 2), 26 harbored CBD calculi; none of 35 patients with no risk factors (group 1) had CBD stones. Jaundice correlated best, with a sensitivity of 69%; and pancreatitis had the lowest sensitivity (12%). Elevated serum bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels correlated better than liver enzymes and serum amylase. The sensitivity and negative predictive value of cholescintigraphy scanning for diagnosing CBD calculi were better than those of ultrasonography, the sensitivity being 84% versus 50% and the negative predictive value 95% versus 82%. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography was successful in 94% of the patients, and CBD calculi were diagnosed in 74%. Moreover, peroperative cholangiography was 100% sensitive with no false-positive results. Ultimately, a palpable stone at surgery was the best predictor. When all the criteria were analyzed, it was found that as the number of criteria increased so did the percentage of patients harboring CBD calculi.The role of serum liver enzymes in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.The introduction of laparoscopic cholecystectomy has increased the need for preoperative diagnosis of common bile duct stones. The purpose of this study is to verify the sensitivity of the liver function tests in the detection of duct stones.We evaluated 438 patients (223 retrospectively and 215 prospectively) who underwent endoscopic papillotomy for bile duct stones in two different services. In every case, blood samples for liver function tests levels were collected prior to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The most sensitive test was gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, that was abnormal in 92.2% of the cases. Alkaline phosphatase was elevated in 74.7% of the patients with choledocholithiasis. The least sensitive parameter was AST, altered in only 50.8% of times. The sensitivity of all liver tests for the diagnosis of choledochal stones taken together was 94.3%.Liver function tests are very sensitive in the detection of common bile duct stones, however these blood tests are in the normal range of about 5% of endoscopically treated patients.Detection of choledocholithiasis: comparison of unenhanced spiral CT, US, and ERCP.ERCP is an established method for the diagnosis and treatment of common bile duct stones, however, it is invasive, time-consuming, and expensive. The purpose of this study was to determine whether unenhanced spiral CT and US, compared with ERCP, have sufficient sensitivity and negative predictive value to be useful screening techniques in patients suspected of having choledocholithiasis.Over a period of 2 years, 82 patients with clinically suspected choledocholithiasis underwent unenhanced spiral computed tomography and US immediately before undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. CT/US scans and ERCP images were evaluated for the presence of bile duct stones, ampullary stones, and extrahepatic biliary dilatation.Unenhanced spiral computed tomography (US) depicted common bile duct stones in 24 (23) of 28 patients found to have stones at endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Five patients had stones impacted at the ampulla, all (two) of which were detected with CT (US). Computed tomography (US) had a sensitivity of 86% (82%) and a specificity of 98% (98%) in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.Both unenhanced spiral CT and US are useful for evaluating suspected common bile duct stones. Unenhanced spiral CT is especially useful when the patient is likely to have ampullary stones and is a safe, more available and less expensive alternative to magnetic resonance cholangiography.Preoperative abdominal ultrasound may be misleading in risk stratification for presence of common bile duct abnormalities.Following the advent of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC), the preoperative predictors of common bile duct (CBD) abnormalities became more important in perioperative decision making. Preoperative transabdominal ultrasound (US) is used to assess the preoperative risks associated with CBD abnormalities. This study attempts to determine the sensitivity and specificity of US in determining CBD abnormalities in patients prior to LC.US measurements of the CBD diameter and presence of stones were ascertained from radiology reports in 100 patients who had LC with a routine intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC). The same information was obtained from the patients' IOC. A supraduodenal CBD diameter of >8 mm was considered dilated.US demonstrated a sensitivity of 25% and a specificity of 70% for the detection of CBD dilatation compared to IOC. The sensitivity of US for predicting CBD dilatation was 55% when the IOC-derived diameter was >10 mm and 100% when it was >15 mm. The overall sensitivity of US for detection of stones was 10%; it improved to 17% in patients with a dilated CBD on US.Preoperative ultrasound is neither sensitive nor specific for detecting CBD dilatation or presence of stones. A negative preoperative US report may be misleading in risk stratification for the presence of these CBD abnormalities. In order to avoid missing any CBD pathology, we recommend the routine use of intraoperative cholangiography.Role of selective intra-operative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The use of routine intra-operative cholangiography (IOC) remains controversial. This prospective study was carried out to determine whether to perform selective or routine IOC in patients undergoing cholecystectomy for gallstones.All consecutive patients undergoing open cholecystectomy over a 16-month period were included in the present study. They were divided into two groups based on the absence (n = 79) or presence (n = 55) of indicators of choledocholithiasis. All patients were subjected to cholangiography. Each indicator, subsets of indicators and all indicators combined were evaluated for their ability to predict choledocholithiasis.There would be only two missed stones (1.5%) if selective cholangiography was to be practised. Intra-operative cholangiography had a positive predictive value of 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of all the indicators combined were 93.5%, 84.6%, 74.5%, 97.5% and 88.0%, respectively. The best indicators in each subset were jaundice, common bile duct diameter as assessed by ultrasonography, and a palpable stone during surgery with NPV of 82.7%, 91.1% and 96.8%, respectively.Routine IOC during cholecystectomy is not essential for the prevention of retained stones. A combination of the various indicators of choledocholithiasis can be used to select patients for cholangiography.Diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasound compared with direct cholangiography in the detection of choledocholithiasis.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and trans-abdominal ultrasound in the detection of choledocholithiasis, and to compare bile duct stone characteristics using endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), MRCP and ultrasound.Of 191 consecutive patients referred for diagnostic ERCP, choledocholithiasis was diagnosed in 34 patients using direct cholangiography. The latter took the form of ERCP (n = 29), intraoperative cholangiography (n = 3) or percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (n = 2). All patients underwent MRCP and ultrasound examinations and their findings for choledocholitiasis were compared with those at direct cholangiography. Finally, in the 29 patients with choledocholithiasis diagnosed under ERCP, stone characteristics were compared across the three investigations of ERCP, MRCP and ultrasound.Compared with direct cholangiography, MRCP showed a sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of 91%, 98% and 97%, respectively, in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. MRCP resulted in three false-negative and three false-positive findings, four of which occurred due to confusion with lesions at the ampulla. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of 38%, 100% and 89%, respectively, in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. ERCP revealed a greater number of stones and these were more proximally distributed within the bile ducts when compared to MRCP.MRCP is highly accurate in the diagnosis of choloedocholithiasis and has the potential to replace diagnostic ERCP. MRCP underestimates the number of bile duct stones present.[The role of intravenous cholangiography in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy: is there a renaissance?].The preoperative investigation for choledocholithiasis in patients undergoing elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy is still a matter of debate.In a prospective clinical trial the accuracy of intravenous cholangiography (IVC), ultrasonography and liver function tests in the preoperative diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was assessed in 98 patients undergoing elective cholecystectomy. Only patients with uncomplicated cholecystolithiasis considered to be at low risk for having bile duct stones were investigated. A 2-year follow-up clinical survey (mean) was performed in 92 of the 98 patients to investigate the occurrence of postoperative choledocholithiasis (gold standard: clinically manifest choledocholithiasis).In this patient cohort the incidence of choledocholithiasis was found to be 5.1%. Among the three diagnostic tests IVC proved to be more accurate with higher sensitivity and a better positive predictive value than ultrasonography and liver function tests. The sensitivity for IVC was 100% compared to 20% for ultrasonography and 40% for liver function tests, respectively. The positive predictive value for IVC was 83.3% in comparison to 20% for ultrasonography and 25% for liver function tests. Mild side effects caused by intravenous contrast media were observed in 2.0%. During a mean postoperative follow-up of 2 years no clinically manifest and initially overlooked choledocholithiasis could be detected in the 92 investigated patients.IVC is a reliable method to detect unsuspected common bile duct stones and should be used in the preoperative diagnosis prior to elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy. IVC may play a role in decreasing the rate of preoperative ERCP or intraoperative cholangiography in these patients.Proposed criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There has been a dramatic increase in the number of endoscopic retrograde cholangiograms (ERC) performed on patients who are candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The majority of these procedures result in normal findings. This study is an attempt to determine useful clinical criteria and strategy for predicting the presence or absence of common bile duct stones (CBDS) and the need for ERC in patients who are candidates for LC.The observational portion of this study explored laboratory and ultrasound data from 134 consecutive patients who had undergone preoperative ERC, followed by LC, over a 4-year period. The data were then analyzed by multivariate logistic regression to determine the best models for predicting the presence or absence of stones in the common bile duct. Models using gamma glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT), alkaline phophatase (AP), common bile duct diameter (CBDIA), and amylase (AMY) were then evaluated retrospectively in 36 additional patients (validation group).A model based on GGT and common bile duct diameter as positive predictors and amylase as a negative predictor correctly classified 78% of the patients in the validation group. This model resulted in a negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), sensitivity, and specificity of 0.88, 0.68, 0.87, and 0.71, respectively. The model utilizing AP was almost as effective. This model resulted in a NPV, PPV, sensitivity, and specificity of 0.83, 0.67, 0.80, and 0.71, respectively.Although a number of laboratory values and imaging techniques correlate with the presence or absence of CBDS, our study confirms that individually they have poor predictive value. Our data and models suggest that elevated serum amylase is a negative predictor for CBDS. Elevated GGT and/or AP with widened CBDIA and normal AMY strongly suggest the presence of CBDS and the need for preoperative ERC. Elevated GGT, AP, or widened CBDIA with elevated amylase, in the absence of clinical pancreatitis, may suggest that small stones have passed through the ampulla of Vater and that the CBD is generally cleared of stones.Relative merits of ultrasonography, computed tomography and cholangiography in patients of surgical obstructive jaundice.Fifty consecutive patients with surgical obstructive jaundice were evaluated prospectively with ultrasonography (US), computed tomographic scans (CT scan) and cholangiography-percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (PTC) or endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreaticography (ERCP). The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound in defining the level of obstruction was 86% as compared to 86% and 94.8% for CT scan and cholangiography, respectively. To measure the etiology of the obstruction, the accuracy of ultrasound, CT scan and cholangiography were 84%, 86% and 75%, respectively. The sensitivity of CT scans and cholangiography in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was 100%, 81.8% and 90%, respectively, whereas specificity was 97%, 100% and 100%, respectively. Sensitivity for a diagnosis of malignant disease was 100% for both US and CT scans whereas specificity was 90% and 81%, respectively. Ultrasonography as a single radiological investigation is sufficient in the evaluation of the majority of patients with surgical obstructive jaundice. CT scan and cholangiography should be done only when US gives equivocal findings or if concomitant therapeutic procedures like basketing and stenting are also planned.Factors predictive of bile duct stones in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis.The objective of the study was to investigate the accuracy of using preoperative data for the prediction of bile duct calculi in patients operated on for acute cholecystitis. 279 consecutive patients underwent cholecystectomy with peroperative cholangiography for acute calculous cholecystitis in the Department of Surgery, Lund University Hospital, between 1985 and 1991. The correlation between 13 preoperative clinical and laboratory variables, and the incidence of bile duct calculi was studied. Among the 13 variables tested, serum bilirubin concentration and serum gamma-glutamyltransferase activity were independent factors of predictive significance. These two factors were used for constructing an additive prognostic index for the presence of bile duct stones. Thus, three groups of patients could be identified having a 3, 7-9 or 59% risk of harboring bile duct stones, corresponding to a sensitivity of 61% and a specificity of 93% in predicting the presence of bile duct stones in the 'high-risk' group. Logistic regression analysis permits accurate preoperative identification of bile duct stones in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis.A prospective experience with selective cholangiography.A prospective study of patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis was undertaken to determine the effectiveness of identifying clinically significant choledocholithiasis with selective cholangiography. Between 1991 and 1995, 262 patients presented to the senior author (K.W.M.) with acute or chronic cholecystitis. Sixteen patients had a preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) for an elevated alkaline phosphatase or total bilirubin greater than twice the normal value or an ultrasound finding suspecting choledocholithiasis. Ten of the ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis, with eight patients having successful clearance by ERCP. Ninety other patients had intraoperative cholangiography for abnormal serum liver biochemistries, a history of jaundice or pancreatitis, or a dilated common bile duct (CBD) (>6 mm) on ultrasound. Fourteen of the intraoperative cholangiography patients and the two remaining ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis requiring CBD exploration for clearance of their stones. There were no false-positive cholangiograms, and there were no bile duct injuries in this series. With 100 per cent follow-up of at least 2 years, only one patient required ERCP clearance of a retained CBD stone 13 months after cholecystectomy. The positive predictive value and the negative predictive value for the selective cholangiography criteria are 23 per cent and 99 per cent, respectively. In conclusion, clinically significant choledocholithiasis can be found effectively with selective cholangiography. Also, utilizing selective cholangiography reduces the number of routine cholangiograms by 60 per cent.Gallstone pancreatitis: a prospective study on the incidence of cholangitis and clinical predictors of retained common bile duct stones.The aim of this study was to define the incidence of cholangitis in gallstone pancreatitis, in the absence of cholangitis, to identify the clinical predictors of persistent common bile duct (CBD) stones at endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP) or at intraoperative cholangiography (IOC).A total of 122 consecutive patients with acute gallstone pancreatitis were prospectively evaluated for the presence of CBD stones as determined by elective ERCP or IOC. Urgent ERCP was restricted to patients with concomitant cholangitis. APACHE II scores and serial laboratory data were obtained.Four (3%) patients had cholangitis and all underwent urgent ERCP successfully. Eighteen (15%) patients without cholangiogram were excluded. The remaining 100 patients underwent elective ERCP or IOC on a mean of hospital day 6.8. Twenty-one (21%) patients had persistent CBD stones. Univariate analysis detected significant differences in serum total bilirubin, ALT, and alkaline phosphatase levels between patients with and without persistent CBD stones. On multivariate analysis, serum total bilirubin on hospital day 2 was the best predictor of CBD stones. A serum total bilirubin level > 1.35 mg/dl had a sensitivity of 90.5% and specificity of 63%. Age, gender, mean APACHE II score, amylase, and presence of CBD dilation on ultrasound were not predictive of CBD stones.In patients with gallstone pancreatitis, 1) cholangitis is uncommon, and 2) the best clinical predictor of persistent CBD stones is serum total bilirubin on hospital day 2.Prediction of common bile duct stones prior to cholecystectomy: a prospective validation of a discriminant analysis function.Selection routines for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients with symptomatic gallstone disease should give a low frequency of both false-negative ERCP results and residual common bile duct stones (CBDS).To validate a discriminant function (DF) based on retrospectively collected data, for characterization of patients with symptomatic gallstone disease as regards presence of CBDS, and to compare clinical, ultrasonographic, and DF characterization.Prospective registration of CBDS criteria in consecutive patients with symptomatic gallstone disease.A department of surgical gastroenterology in a Norwegian central hospital.One hundred ninety-two patients with gallbladder stones.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy or ERCP with or without endoscopic sphincterotomy.Sensitivity and specificity of the clinical, ultrasonographic, and DF characterizations, and test of the validity of the DF.Thirty-two patients had CBDS. The clinical criteria of CBDS were present in 152 patients (79.2%): 21.1% of these patients had CBDS and there were no false-negative results (sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 25%). The risk of CBDS in patients with normal bile ducts at ultrasonographic examination was 8 of 124, and in patients with dilated ducts or suspected CBDS, 17 of 47 (sensitivity, 68%; specificity, 80%). The DF was positive in 50 patients (26%): 60% of these had CBDS, and there were 2 false-negative results (sensitivity, 94%; specificity, 88%). A discriminant analysis of the prospectively registered data selected the same set of CBDS criteria, and a new DF did not alter the characterization of any patient.Clinical characterization had a higher sensitivity for CBDS detection than ultrasonography alone, but a lower specificity. The DF analysis was both more sensitive and specific than ultrasonography, and seemed efficient in selecting symptomatic gallstone patients for ERCP. It was reproducible and simple to use.Abnormal common bile duct sonography. The best predictor of choledocholithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.We conducted a prospective study to determine the most reliable indicator of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. One hundred thirty-seven patients were referred for endoscopic retrograde cholangiography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy for suspected choledocholithiasis due to one or more of the following abnormalities: (a) altered liver function tests, (b) increased serum amylase levels, or (c) a dilated common bile duct (> 7 mm) with or without evidence of stones on sonography. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and the likelihood of the presence or absence of morbidity were calculated for 25 different variables. Common bile duct stones were detected in 63 (46%) patients. Abnormal result of sonography of the common bile duct was the best predictor of choledocholithiasis (p < 0.0001). Abnormalities of the combined liver function tests were statistically significant predictors only when combined with abnormal sonographic results. Improving liver function tests before endoscopy had a significant negative predictive value (p = 0.01). Stepwise logistic regression analysis showed that abnormal ultrasound and the presence of common bile duct stones on ultrasound were significant (p = 0.009 and p = 0.049, respectively). Abnormal result of sonography of the common bile duct is the best predictor of choledocholithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prospective evaluation of the diagnostic work-up before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prerequisite for successful laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the exclusion of potential risks such as cholangiolithiasis or anatomical malformations. As there is no general agreement regarding the appropriate preoperative diagnostic work-up, a comparative study of different diagnostic methods was carried out.In 180 consecutive patients admitted to a community hospital for cholecystectomy due to symptomatic cholecystolithiasis, a prospective comparison was carried out of the diagnostic accuracy of patient history, physical examination, laboratory tests, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, intravenous cholangiography, ultrasonography, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Measurement of the diameter of the common bile duct was found to be a reliable method as a single noninvasive parameter for diagnosing cholangiolithiasis (sensitivity 100%, specificity 93%), with good predictive power (positive predictive value 0.7, negative predictive value 1.0). The best accuracy achieved noninvasively and without sonography was with a combination of positive patient history and gamma-glutamyl transferase findings (sensitivity 58%, specificity 84%, positive predictive value 0.37, negative predictive value 0.93). ERCP detected additional cholangiolithiasis in 19 of 139 patients (13.7%) and anatomical malformations in three patients. In all 19 patients, the bile ducts were cleared of stones endoscopically within 24 hours, prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Among the 163 patients primarily assigned to laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the protocol diagnostic work-up, including ERCP, allocated three patients (1.8%) to open surgery. Conversion from laparoscopic cholecystectomy to open cholecystectomy occurred in a further two of 158 patients (1.3%).These results show that routine ultrasonography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be recommended in order to determine the diameter of the common bile duct. In patients with a ductal diameter of more than 6 mm, ERCP should be performed. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be carried out within 24 hours after ERCP and papillotomy.Reliability of ultrasounds in detecting common bile duct stones before biliary surgery. A retrospective analysis.The aim of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic benefit of US in the preoperative screening for CBD stones in patients submitted to surgery for biliary lithiasis.We analyzed the data of 135 patients admitted for biliary lithiasis, jaundice or biliary pancreatitis in the last three years. Mean age was 63 years (54.8% females), 48% of the cases had an urgent admission. US of the liver and biliary ducts was the first examination performed and the patients were divided in 2 groups on the bases of the results: those with the diameter of the CBD < 1 cm (101 pts-group A) and those with a diameter > 1 cm (34 pts-group B).In group A were subsequently performed: 35 IV cholangiographies (6 showed CBD stones, 1 was a false negative for CBD stones), 15 intraoperative (I.O.) cholangiographies (1 positive for CBD stones), 9 ERCP for jaundice or pancreatitis (2 positive for CBD stones). The incidence of CBD stones was 8.9% in this group. In group B were performed: 7 IV cholangiographies (2 showed CBD stones), 12 I.O. cholangiographies (6 showed CBD stones), 10 ERCP for jaundice or pancreatitis (7 showed CBD stones). The incidence of CBD stones was 44% in this group. CBD stones were detected by US in 2 cases (22%) in group A and in 6 cases (40%) in group B.In our patients there is a relatively high incidence of CBD stones (8.9%) in spite of a normal CBD at US. Considering that the minimally invasive approach for the gallbladder stones is becoming the "gold standard" and the laparoscopic treatment of the CBD stones is not widely diffused, it is important to know the presence of CBD stones before surgery. With this in mind US does not seem to be a reliable diagnostic tool and we suggest that before surgery an IV cholangiography (sensitivity > 95% in our experience) should be performed together with US and ERCP in selected cases. Moreover this could reduce the number of preoperative ERCP leaving the possibility to treat more selectively by endoscopic papillosphincterotomy the patients with CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Evaluation of the pattern of liver tests and yield of cholangiography in symptomatic choledocholithiasis: a prospective study.The role of ERCP in the management of choledocholithiasis in an era of minimally invasive therapy continues to be defined.We evaluated prospectively the pattern of liver test abnormalities and yield of cholangiography after presentation with illnesses suggesting choledocholithiasis. Ninety-four consecutive patients, all with liver test abnormalities (total bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, AST, and ALT) at presentation, had serial determinations to within 24 hours of cholangiography and were divided into four groups based on their patterns of rise or fall of liver test results as well as presenting clinical syndrome. Group I: normalized liver tests; Group II: falling liver tests, and alkaline phosphatase falling greater than 50% of the difference between presentation value and upper limit of normal; Group III: alkaline phosphatase falling less than 50%; and Group IV: any liver test with increasing levels. Clinical syndromes included cholangitis, pancreatitis, combined cholangitis and pancreatitis, and biliary pain with abnormal liver tests.Yields of choledocholithiasis were 13% (Group I), 50% (Group II), 67% (Group III), and 94% (Group IV). Yield by syndromes were 36% (biliary pancreatitis), 72% (biliary pain and abnormal liver tests), 87% (cholangitis), and 100% (cholangitis and pancreatitis).The degree of decline in liver test levels is inversely related to the yield of cholangiography in symptomatic choledocholithiasis; the yield of ERCP in these patients (with normalized liver tests) is low and they do not require ERCP. Pre-ERCP estimates of the likelihood of choledocholithiasis can be made on the basis of the pattern of liver tests, and biliary pancreatitis patients with normalized liver tests do not require ERCP.Endoscopic ultrasonography for diagnosing choledocholithiasis: a prospective comparative study with ultrasonography and computed tomography.We assessed the diagnostic usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for choledocholithiasis.A prospective series of 155 patients with suspected choledocholithiasis all underwent EUS, conventional ultrasonography, CT, and ERCP. In 142 patients with a clear cholangiogram on ERCP, we analyzed the capability of EUS to image the extrahepatic bile duct and to identify choledocholithiasis, compared with ultrasonography and CT.No complications were encountered in performing EUS. In 51 patients, ERCP demonstrated bile duct stones, which were confirmed at endoscopic sphincterotomy or surgery. The extrahepatic bile duct was wholly displayed in 96% by EUS, in 60% by ultrasonography, and in 80% by CT. EUS (96%) was more sensitive than ultrasonography (63%) and CT (71%) for detecting choledocholithiasis (p < 0.001). Although ultrasonography and CT were poorly diagnostic for choledocholithiasis in patients with small stones or those with a nondilated common bile duct, EUS was able to accurately detect choledocholithiasis regardless of the size of stones or the diameter of the bile duct. The specificity of EUS (100%) was higher than those of ultrasonography (95%) and CT (97%).EUS, a safe imaging procedure, is more accurate than ultrasonography and CT and may be as accurate as ERCP for diagnosing choledocholithiasis.Diagnosis of common bile duct stones by intravenous cholangiography: prediction by ultrasound and liver function tests compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography.Routine intravenous cholangiography using the safer contrast medium, meglumine iotroxate, may be a useful investigation prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for the detection of suspected common bile duct stones. We compared this with endoscopic cholangiography.Eighty-one consecutive nonjaundiced patients (mean age 62 years; range 20 to 90) with suspected common bile duct stones referred for endoscopic cholangiography to one center underwent intravenous cholangiography that was considered positive if it detected ductal stones. The ability of ultrasound scans and liver function tests to predict ductal stones was also assessed.Sixty patients had both endoscopic and intravenous cholangiograms performed. Thirteen out of 27 patients with ductal stones confirmed by endoscopic cholangiography had positive intravenous cholangiograms, and 29 out of 30 with no stones had negative intravenous cholangiograms. The sensitivity for intravenous cholangiography was 48%, specificity 97%, positive predictive value 93%, negative predictive value 67%, and accuracy 73%. For ultrasound scans the positive predictive value was 69%; negative predictive value was 78%. For liver function tests the positive predictive value was 68%; negative predictive value was 93%.Intravenous cholangiography cannot be recommended instead of endoscopic cholangiography except in situations where the latter is not readily available. Ultrasound and liver function tests are useful in predicting ductal stones.Selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and preoperative bile duct stone removal in patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective study.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) has become the treatment of choice for patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis. About 10% of patients with symptomatic gallstones may bear associated common bile duct (CBD) stones. The preferred approach to these patients is the removal of CBD stones by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP) before LC. However, ERCP before LC should be performed only in patients with suspected choledocholithiasis. The aims of this study were to: 1) generate an efficacious predictive model for selecting patients with suspected choledocholithiasis to submit to preoperative ERCP, and 2) test the safety of the endoscopic/laparoscopic procedure.Historical, biochemical, and ultrasonographic data were collected prospectively. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis was adopted for determining optimal biochemical and ultrasonographic cut-off values. Multivariate analysis using logistic regression with generation of the best model identifying independent predictors of CBD stones was also employed.The optimal model predicted a 95% probability of CBD stones in a patient who presented with elevated ALP (over 300 IU/L) and ALT (over 40 IU/L) levels and CBD dilation > 8 mm at ultrasonography. Endoscopic removal of CBD stones was achieved in 95% of patients, with minimal morbidity and no mortality.The identified independent predictors of CBD stones are highly efficient selectors of patients with choledocholithiasis. Moreover, endoscopic removal of CBD stones before LC is a safe and efficacious procedure.Predicting the presence of choledocholithiasis in patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis.Accurate preoperative prediction of choledocholithiasis is essential in order to minimize patient risk and curtail health care expenditures. This study was designed to identify independent risk factors for choledocholithiasis in patients who had undergone cholecystectomy for symptomatic cholelithiasis and to develop a predictive model based on those factors.The charts of 1264 consecutive patients who had undergone cholecystectomy at one of three North Carolina hospitals between January 1, 1989 and December 31, 1991 were reviewed; 465 of these patients had confirmed presence or absence of choledocholithiasis by cholangiography and/or common bile duct exploration and were eligible for analysis. Candidate predictor variables included age and maximum preoperative values for each of the following: temperature, alkaline phosphatase, bilirubin, AST, amylase, white blood cell count, and common bile duct diameter. Model development and validation were conducted using standard data-splitting (60% "training," 40% "test") and logistic regression techniques.Choledocholithiasis was confirmed in 115 (25%) of the 465 eligible patients. Univariate analysis identified bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, temperature, alkaline phosphatase, and age as predictors. Multivariable analysis subsequently identified bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, alkaline phosphatase, and age as independent predictors of choledocholithiasis. A final model containing these variables (except age, whose contribution to the model was small) accurately predicted choledocholithiasis (c-index = 0.76).Accurate estimates of choledocholithiasis risk can be made using maximum preoperative bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, and alkaline phosphatase values. Use of the model may help physicians select those patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis who would most likely benefit from further investigation to exclude choledocholithiasis.Selection criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the laparoscopic era.Indicators for cholangiography were originally designed to select patients at risk for common bile duct (CBD) stones for intraoperative cholangiography.To refine these criteria to apply to the much more invasive procedure of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Retrospective review of selection criteria for ERCP in consecutive patients referred over 18 months following the introduction of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Two ERCP units in adjacent teaching hospitals.Three hundred seventeen patients with gallstones and in situ gallbladders.Common bile duct imaging at ERCP.Abnormalities justifying ERCP.Abnormalities justifying ERCP were found in 66% of patients. This group differed significantly from those with normal ducts, with more being referred with abnormal results of all liver function tests (P < .001), jaundice (P < = .001), a dilated CBD on ultrasound (P < .001), or CBD stones on ultrasound (P < .001). On the other hand, patients with normal ducts were significantly more likely to have been referred with pancreatitis (P = .003) or elevated results of individual liver function tests (P < .001). A logistic regression model using age, presence of jaundice at ERCP, levels of alkaline phosphatase and albumin, and ultrasonography showing dilated ducts or visible CBD stones was found to have a specificity of 75% and a sensitivity of 89%. Past pancreatitis or elevated results of individual liver function tests were not predictive factors.The use of such a model rather than individual criteria would improve the selection of patients for preoperative ERCP, optimizing its role in the laparoscopic era.Prospective evaluation of ultrasonography and liver function tests for preoperative assessment of the bile duct.Current means of predicting the presence of bile duct stones are sensitive but produce a large number of false-positive results, potentially leading to added morbidity from unnecessary invasive investigation. This study prospectively assessed 545 patients with gallbladder stones, including 55 patients with bile duct stones, to refine criteria for further investigation of the bile duct. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated for bile duct dilatation (diameter abnormal if larger than 5 mm below age 50 years, normal value increasing by 1 mm per decade) and elevation of three liver function tests, singly or in combination. Depending on the number of abnormalities used the sensitivity ranged from 46 to 96 per cent and the positive predictive value from 35 to 77 per cent. All groupings gave at least 96 per cent negative predictive value for the absence of stones but none combined both high sensitivity and positive predictive value. The specificity was improved if the tests were done on the working day before operation. Refining criteria for predicting bile duct stones allows the selective use of cholangiography and may reduce the number of negative cholangiograms.Yield of prospective, noninvasive evaluation of the common bile duct combined with selective ERCP/sphincterotomy in 1390 consecutive laparoscopic cholecystectomy patients.The role of noninvasive evaluation of the common bile duct combined with selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy was prospectively evaluated in 1390 consecutive patients subjected to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Preoperative common bile duct testing included liver chemistries, transcutaneous ultrasonography, and intravenous cholangiography. When indicated by various sets of abnormal studies, prelaparoscopic endoscopic retrograde cholangiography was attempted in 129 patients (9.3%) and successfully accomplished in 122 (94.6%). Seventy-six patients (62.3%) had duct stones or a papillary stenosis, and 73 of them (96%) were treated successfully by endoscopic duct clearance and subsequent laparoscopic cholecystectomy. No deaths occurred, and the morbidity rate was 6.2% (8/129), including 2 cases of pancreatitis and 1 case of a retained duct stone after sphincterotomy. Predicting the presence of common duct pathology was 60% accurate when based on abnormal laboratory test results alone, 69% when based on abnormal laboratory test results and concomitant radiologic abnormalities, and 42% when based on radiologic criteria alone (p < .05). We conclude that patients with altered serum liver chemistries with or without concomitant positive radiologic criteria should undergo endoscopic cholangiography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. However, in patients with radiologic duct dilatation as the sole indicator for duct stones, the frequency of normal findings in endoscopic examinations is high. This latter group is probably better managed with intraoperative cholangiography and postlaparoscopic sphincterotomy if needed.Preoperative assessment of choledocholithiasis in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In order to determine the predictive value of noninvasive investigations for choledocholithiasis, we conducted a prospective preoperative study on 82 patients with symptomatic gallstones who received laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Ultrasonography (US), liver function tests and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) were routinely performed in all cases prior to operation. The results showed a strong correlation between noninvasive procedures (liver function tests and US) and the presence of choledocholithiasis as shown by ERC. Using ERC as a reference, the sensitivity and selectivity of ductal dilatation at US and the elevation of alkaline phosphatase (ALP), gamma-glutamyltransferase and total bilirubin in the serum were studied for the detection of common bile duct (CBD) stones. The values of the combination of these tests were also calculated. From receiver operator characteristics curves, the best cut-off point for US in conjunction with ALP was chosen. ERC should be restricted to patients with possible CBD stones, suspected after a combination of the noninvasive US and ALP tests. This study emphasized the necessity and timing of performing ERC as a preoperative modality in the detection of choledocholithiasis in patients who are to undergo laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Assessment of the common bile duct before cholecystectomy: a direct comparison between ultrasonography and intravenous cholangiography.Sixty-seven consecutive patients undergoing cholecystectomy for symptomatic gallstones were investigated by both ultrasonography (US) and intravenous cholangiography (IVC). This provided the opportunity to compare these methods for assessing the common bile duct (CBD) preoperatively for stones. The results were correlated with a subsequent definitive procedure that formed the diagnostic standard in each case. The CBD diameters of 8 (12%) patients with stones was significantly greater than those without stones (t = 10.96, P < 0.001). Sensitivities of US and IVC were 87.5% and 100% respectively, but there were three unsuccessful IVC investigations that had to be excluded from the calculations. Specificities and overall accuracy of both methods were greater than 95%. The positive and negative predictive value of each test was similar and no difference using McNemar's test was found between US and IVC for providing information relating to CBD stones. Performing both procedures as routine assessment of the CBD is thus unnecessary as US, in conjunction with clinical history and liver biochemistry profile, provide an adequate preoperative screen of the CBD.[The importance of sonography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy].The increasing use of minimally invasive techniques for the treatment of symptomatic cholecystitis requires exact preoperative diagnosis. The significant sonographic findings are stones in the biliary system or indirect evidence of stones, consisting in dilatation of the bile duct to more than 10 mm, as well as free mobility of the abdominal wall to exclude peri-umbilical adhesions. Amongst 100 patients who had laparoscopic cholecystectomies there were 7 with bile ducts wider than 10 mm. In two of these cases calculi could also be demonstrated. ERCP was performed on the remaining five and in 3 of these stones were seen. Peri-umbilical adhesions were seen in 6 Patients, resulting in alternative placing of the incision. The sonographic findings which are of relevance to the surgeon were analysed in these 100 cases. A standardised examination protocol is an important feature for proper patient selection.[Ultrasonography and retrograde transpapillary cholangiopancreatography combined with sphincterotomy in the diagnosis of choledochal lithiasis. Our experience with 87 patients].We retrospectively reviewed the US findings of 87 patients to assess US sensitivity in the detection of choledochal (CBD) stones. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) with endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES) was used as the diagnostic standard, except for 1 patient who underwent surgical exploration. First, the distal CBD was studied with transverse and parasagittal US scans through the head and uncinate portions of the pancreas. CBD stones usually appeared as hyperechoic lesions, most of them with acoustic shadowing. In some cases, the stone moves during real-time scanning, which further confirms the diagnosis. Fifty-four of 87 patients had CBD stones and US detected them in 46 cases. The absence of a stone was diagnosed correctly in 28 of 33 patients. In our series, US sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 85%, positive predictive value 88% and negative predictive value 78%. If the distal duct cannot be demonstrated adequately or if duct size is normal, US sensitivity in detecting stones decreases and other examinations, such as ERCP, should be performed. We conclude that US can be used as the diagnostic method of choice to examine the patients with suspected biliary tract disease. Although ERCP is the gold standard for diagnosis and therapeutic purposes in choledochal stones, it remains an invasive technique and must therefore be held in reserve.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy: laboratory predictors of choledocholithiasis.Liver function tests (LFTs) are most often employed to select patients for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and therapeutic sphincterotomy. Although ERC accurately detects CBD stones, the associated financial costs and potential morbidity argue against its indiscriminate use. We analyzed the value of LFTs to predict CBD stones in patients treated by laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). CBD stones were identified in 41 of 660 patients (6.2%) treated by LC during the study period (January 1991 to May 1993). CBD stones were identified by preoperative ERC in 19 of 33 patients (57.6%); by operative cholangiography in 18 of 289 patients (6.2%), and by postoperative ERC in 4 patients. In patients with CBD stones, there was a significant difference in alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, SGPT, and SGOT (P < 0.001). The positive predictive value (PPV) of a value > normal at admission was 5%-19%; and immediately before operation was 9%-36%. The PPV of a value > 2X normal was 30%-47%. Alkaline phosphatase and total bilirubin were independent predictors of CBD stones. If both were greater than twice normal, there was a 55 per cent incidence of CBD stones. Our analysis suggests that patients with greater than twice normal liver function tests have a sufficient incidence of CBD stones to warrant ERC. Patients without both these criteria should be managed by laparoscopic CBDE, with postoperative endoscopic stone retrieval for the failures of laparoscopic CBDE.Common bile duct stones after laparoscopic cholecystectomy and its treatment. The role of ultrasound and intravenous and intraoperative cholangiography.In the present work we recount our experience in handling common bile duct stones (CBDS) in our first 100 cases of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. In the first 50 cases our diagnostic procedures involved the use of ultrasound exploration and intravenous cholangiotomography 48 h before laparoscopic surgery. We found three cases of residual CBDS. One of the cases was treated by means of ERCP. The other two cases were resolved by carrying out a transparietohepatic cholangiography after the ERCP procedure failed. After this experience, we changed our strategy, introducing the intraoperative cholangiography in the cases with an unclear diagnosis. With this new approach, no residual CBDS occurred in the following 50 cases. These findings demonstrate the following: (1) In our hands, intravenous cholangiography is not more effective than ultrasound exploration in resolving dubious cases. (2) These dubious cases are more effectively diagnosed by means of selective intraoperative cholangiography. (3) When CBDS is treated by transparietohepatic cholangiography it proves to be less uncomfortable for the patient than ERCP and, as we found, even more efficient in removing the stones, although our experience is based on only two cases.Radiology in laparoscopic cholecystectomy. A retrospective study.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is attempted in all our patients scheduled for cholecystectomy. The related standard radiologic procedures are preoperative ultrasonography (US) and preoperative cholangiography (PCA). In a retrospective study of 214 patients scheduled for LC over a 2-year period we have reviewed the radiologic and clinical records. Preoperative US revealed stones in the common bile duct (CBD) in 8 patients, all treated with endoscopic papillotomy before or after operation. PCA was successful in 176 patients (82%) and gave crucial information in 22 patients including 8 with stones in the CBD not preoperatively diagnosed, 6 with anomalous anatomy, and 8 with malpositioned surgical clip on the cystic duct. In 26 patients LC was converted into open surgery, but in only one case due to CBD stone revealed at PCA. Seventeen patients had minor postoperative complications, all managed conservatively. We consider preoperative US and PCA appropriate radiologic investigations in conjunction with LC.The sensitivity and role of ultrasound in the evaluation of biliary obstruction.Ultrasound is widely advocated as the initial noninvasive imaging study in evaluating suspected biliary obstruction. Some have suggested using ultrasound as the sole diagnostic test before exploratory laparotomy. To evaluate the accuracy of ultrasound in determining the level and etiology of biliary obstruction in patients with biliary dilatation, and to define its role in the evaluation of these patients, we performed a retrospective review of all patients from August 1986 to August 1991 who had biliary dilatation by ultrasound and subsequent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and/or a percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography. Forty-two patients were included in this study, and ultrasound delineated the level of obstruction in 88 per cent, defined the etiology of the obstruction in 48 per cent, and diagnosed choledocholithiasis in 33 per cent of patients with this condition. A literature review revealed that ultrasound has a sensitivity of 71 per cent in delineating the level of obstruction, a sensitivity of 57 per cent in defining the etiology of biliary obstruction, and detects choledocholithiasis in 32 per cent of patients with this condition. We conclude that ultrasound is a highly accurate diagnostic test for delineating the level of biliary obstruction. Ultrasound should be the initial radiographic test in the evaluation of the patient with suspected biliary obstruction to guide further radiographic evaluation.Assessment of the common bile duct before cholecystectomy using ultrasound and biochemical measurements: validation based on follow-up.The selective use of operative cholangiography with cholecystectomy is controversial. We have combined measurement of the serum bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and alanine aminotransferase with ultrasound measurement of the bile duct diameter to assess the common bile duct before cholecystectomy. Direct contrast cholangiography was not performed if the results of these measurements were normal on the day before operation. There were 253 patients assessed in this way before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Patients with known bile duct stones were excluded, but those with a previous history of jaundice, pancreatitis or abnormal liver function tests were included. In 47 cases abnormalities were found and X-ray cholangiograms were performed; only six patients were found to have bile duct stones. Follow-up of all 253 patients, including repeating the preoperative measurements after 12 months in 93, found only two patients with evidence that common duct stones had been missed and these two stones passed spontaneously. No bile duct injuries have occurred. We conclude that preoperative assessment of the bile duct using ultrasound and liver function tests safely obviates the need for 'routine' operative cholangiography.Useful predictors of bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. McGill Gallstone Treatment Group.The authors determined the most useful predictors of common bile duct (CBD) stones as diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Prospective and retrospective collection of historical, biochemical and ultrasonographic data was used. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis was used to determine optimal biochemical cut-off values. Multivariate analysis using logistic regression with generation of the best model identifying independent predictors of CBD stones also was employed. Prospective validation of the model was performed on an independent group of patients.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographies were performed before LC in 106 patients, and after LC in 33. Only four of ten clinical variables evaluated independently predicted the presence of CBD stones. The optimal model predicted a 94% probability of CBD stones in a patient older than 55 years of age who presented with an elevated bilirubin (over 30 mumol/L) and positive ultrasound findings (a dilated CBD, and a CBD stone seen on ultrasound). This model was validated prospectively in a subsequent series of 49 patients in which the probability of CBD stone was only 8% when all four predictors were absent.The identified independent clinical predictors of a CBD stone helps select a population of symptomatic gallstone bearers who benefit most from cholangiographic assessment.Common bile duct evaluation in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. 1050 cases later.The authors documented the evolution of common bile duct (CBD) evaluation after the development of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) and CBD exploration. Emphasis was placed on stratification of CBD stone risk so that subgroups could be selected appropriately for no further studies, preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiogram (ERC), or intraoperative intervention.Data were accumulated by the authors on presentation, findings, and outcomes of 1050 patients who underwent cholecystectomies. Risk stratification was based on the history, ultrasound findings, biochemical derangements, and operative findings.Fifty-seven per cent of patients met criteria to be "no/low" risk for CBD stones (CBD diameter < 5 mm, normal liver enzymes, and no history of acute cholecystitis, jaundice, or pancreatitis); in these patients, cholangiograms were not obtained, and there was no clinical evidence of CBD stones observed in follow-up at 45 months (sensitivity = 100%). As techniques developed for laparoscopic CBD exploration, there was a decreased incidence of open cholecystectomy (p < 0.05) and preoperative ERC (p < 0.05). The rate of operative cholangiogram increased from 13% to 23% during the series (p < 0.01). There were no CBD injuries or late strictures. The only bile leak occurred from a peripheral segmental duct in the gallbladder bed and was resolved with a laparotomy and suture. There were no transfusions. Three retained stones were documented in patients who had false-normal operative cholangiograms.Criteria were defined that delineate a "no/low" risk group of LC patients for whom operative cholangiograms were not indicated for excluding CBD stones. The routine use of operative cholangiography as a means of preventing CBD injury was not substantiated by this study. The indications for preoperative ERC should continue to decrease as laparoscopic techniques evolve.The evaluation and management of known or suspected stones of the common bile duct in the era of minimal access surgery.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) has rapidly become the procedure of choice for symptomatic cholelithiasis. The perioperative diagnosis and modern treatment of suspected stones of the common bile duct (CBD) remains controversial. A database of 573 patients undergoing LC was compiled during an 11 month period. Sixty-seven patients (47 females, 20 males) (13 percent) were suspected of having CBD stones based upon clinical, laboratory and roentgenographic evidence. Fifty-two patients underwent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ER-CP) (45 preoperative and seven postoperative). Seventeen patients were studied with intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC). The indications for cholangiography (either ERCP or IOC) included pancreatitis (group 1), clinical history suggestive of CBD stones, but normal preoperative liver function tests (LFT) (group 2), cholangitis (group 3), grossly abnormal LFT (group 4) and dilated CBD (greater than 7 millimeters on sonogram) (group 5). The incidence of CBD stones was three of 14 (21 percent) in group 1, six of 20 (30 percent) in group 2, two of three (67 percent) in group 3, 16 of 26 (62 percent) in group 4 and two of four (50 percent) in group 5. Overall, 29 patients (23 females and six males) had stones retrieved from the CBD. Of the 52 ERCP, 20 endoscopic sphincterotomies were performed for documented CBD stones. Of the group that had pre-LC ERCP, three (6 percent) ultimately required an open procedure. There were three instances of post-ERCP pancreatitis (6 percent) and ERCP was not able to opacify or clear the CBD in four instances. Seven patients had postoperative ERCP with successful retrieval of retained CBD stones (100 percent). Of the 17 IOC, eight were positive--two patients underwent laparoscopic clearance of the CBD and six required conversion to an open procedure. There were no deaths or extensive complications. Total and direct bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and serum glutamic pyruvic transaminase were independently related to the presence of a CBD stone, while demographic data, past medical history, preoperative symptoms, leukocyte count, vital signs, amylase, serum glutamic-oxalacetic transaminase nuclear scintigraphic visualization of the duodenum or size of CBD on sonography, were not. No patient with biliary pancreatitis had CBD stones without abnormalities in the LFT or the preoperative sonogram. ERCP is a useful technique to clear the CBD pre-LC. However, ERCP in patients with biliary pancreatitis, but otherwise normal preoperative tests, has a low yield. In this group of patients, IOC is an appropriate alternative to pre-LC ERCP.A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.[Ultrasonic diagnosis of bile duct calculi. A prospective study regarding the effects and the objective and subjective factors on accuracy in choledocholithiasis].The reliability and diagnostic sensitivity of the sonographic identification of bile duct concrements is mainly determined by the examiner's competence and the size of the concrements, and secondly also by the diameter or patency of the bile ducts. Basing on the records of 175 patients on whom choledocholithiasis had been performed, a prospective study (reference: concrement removal after ERCP) showed that the sensitivity of the method is almost twice as high with an experienced examiner than with a less experienced physician (80% vs. 47%). In 231 other cases with extrahepatically conditioned cholestasis we found a 93% specificity of sonography in respect of excluding the presence of concrements. 93% of the concrements that were bigger than 10 mm were definitely diagnosed via sonography (71% sensitivity in case of concrements < 10 mm). If the proof of presence of concrements is differentiated according to bile duct width, it is seen that 85% of all concrements were visualised if the width of the ductus choledochus was > or = 8 mm and 71% in case of a width < 8 mm. The results of the study justify the use of sonography as a primary method in the diagnosis of concrements of the bile ducts; under certain conditions it is also possible to exclude the presence of stones. If findings do not agree with the clinical pattern of findings, or if the bile ducts cannot be visualised properly, diagnostic ERCP is indicated.Value of ultrasound and liver function tests in determining the need for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in unexplained abdominal pain.The value of serum liver function tests and abdominal ultrasound as screening tests of the need for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was determined in patients with unexplained abdominal pain without associated jaundice. In 1989 and 1990 1005 ERCPs were undertaken, of which 138 (14%) were for this indication. The duct or ducts of interest were delineated by ERCP in 95% of patients. The lesions found were bile duct stones in 10 patients, chronic pancreatitis in five, pancreatic carcinoma in one, peptic ulcer or duodenitis in four. A satisfactory ultrasound examination had been performed in 94% of patients. For chronic pancreatitis, its sensitivity was 60% and specificity 95%. For choledocholithiasis, the ultrasonic detection of duct dilatation or stones had a sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 86%. Of the liver function tests, the alkaline phosphatase was more sensitive (67%) than the transaminases (44%) in indicating the presence of bile duct stones and had a high specificity (95%). None of the 10 patients with duct stones had normal ultrasound and normal alkaline phosphatase. Thus it was found that demonstration of a normal common bile duct by abdominal ultrasound and normal serum alkaline phosphatase together have 100% specificity in excluding bile duct stones. Using such knowledge over the two year period of this study would have spared 36 patients the need for ERCP.[The role of clinical, biochemical and echographic data in identifying the biliary pathogenesis of acute pancreatitis].The role of clinical (biliary pain and/or jaundice), laboratory (discriminant function (DF) calculated using AST, ALT, AlkPh and GGT serum values) and ultrasonographic (US)(dilation and/or stone of common bile duct (CBD)) findings in identification of the biliary etiology of acute pancreatitis (AP) was studied in 60 patients. AP biliary etiology was defined by ERCP executed in the early phase of the disease (lithiasis and/or stenosis of CBD; endoscopic features of forced papilla in patients with gallstone). US showed the best values of sensitivity (84.6%) and diagnostic efficacy (76.7%); DF showed the best results of specificity (62.5%) and of test positive predictive value (92.8%). The statistical evaluation (McNemar test) showed a significant increase of sensitivity for US vs clinical findings and of specificity for DS vs clinical findings (p less than 0.05). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, test negative and positive predictive value were improved to 96.1, 87.5, 96.6, 77.1 and 92% by the combination of US and DF. Therefore the association of US and DF can provide the best non invasive method in rapidly detecting CBD pathology as an etiological factor in AP and then the enough accurate indication to early operative ERCP.Comparison of ultrasound and E.R.C.P. in the detection of the cause of obstructive biliary disease.The value of ultrasound (US) in determining the cause and site of biliary obstruction was critically evaluated and compared to endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP), in a prospective study performed on 120 consecutive patients. The final diagnosis was based on surgery, endoscopic retrograde cholangiography or a combination of other examinations. Ultrasound successfully differentiated obstructive from non obstructive jaundice in 96% of the patients, comparing well with the results ERCP. US correctly defined the cause of obstruction in 71% of the patients with ductal stones, in 90% of the patients with tumoural bile duct obstruction, but only in 59% of the patients with chronic pancreatitis.Reliability of ultrasonography in diagnosis of biliary lithiasis.Preoperative B-mode ultrasonograms of the biliary system in 302 patients with cholelithiasis confirmed operatively between March 1981 and December 1986 were analyzed retrospectively in contrast to the operative findings. The results showed that during 1985-1986 the sensitivity of ultrasonography (US) to detect stones in gallbladder (GB), extrahepatic bile duct (EHD) and intrahepatic bile duct (IHD) was 98.4%, 68.2% and 82.4% respectively, each was much higher than its counterpart during the periods 1981-1982 and 1983-1984 (P less than 0.01). The specificity of US in detecting GB, EHD and IHD stones was all over 90% during the latter two years. The observations made in the present study suggest that the accuracy of US has risen so significantly that it should be used as the first modality in diagnosing cholelithiasis, particularly cholecystolithiasis. It, however, should be supplemented with such tests as oral cholecystography, intravenous cholangiography, percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (PTC), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) to establish a correct diagnosis when its interpretation is equivocal.[Selective intraoperative cholangiography].300 consecutive cholecystectomies performed from 1984 through 1986 were studied retrospectively to answer the following questions: which are suitable preoperative indicators for selective operative cholangiography, and which is the failure rate to detect biliary concrements by selective cholangiography? Patients with a history of jaundice, suspected concrements from preoperative intravenous cholangiography or ultrasound examination, a common bile duct wider than 8 mm, and elevated serum levels of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, ALAT (GPT) or ASAT (GOT) all had significantly higher rates of biliary concrements. Of these indicators, preoperative radiologic studies, serum levels of ALAT (GPT) and serum levels of alkaline phosphatase showed the best sensitivity, specificity as well as positive and negative predictive value. If two criteria, preoperative radiology and serum levels of ALAT (GPT), had been used, intraoperative cholangiography would have been performed in 34% of the cases. 82% of all biliary concrements would have been detected; in 3% of all cholecystectomies, the diagnosis of concrements would have been missed. We conclude that prospective studies should be performed to better define necessity and benefit of routine operative cholangiography still widely performed today.Pre-operative ultrasound measurement of bile duct diameter: basis for selective cholangiography.In this prospective study, prior to cholecystectomy, the diameter of the common hepatic duct was measured; duct size was then compared with probability of finding stones at operation. Of 115 patients entering the study, 36 had stones removed from the common duct at the time of cholecystectomy but only three (8%) were demonstrated by ultrasonography. No stones were found in ducts less than or equal to 3 mm in size (31% patients). Only two of 26 patients with ducts measuring 4 mm had stones. As duct size increased, so did the probability of stones and all patients with ducts greater than or equal to 9 mm in diameter had stones. It is concluded that pre-operative ultrasound provides a reliable basis for a policy of selective cholangiography.Ultrasound imaging of pancreas and biliary tract.Ultrasound and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) have been compared in the investigation of abnormalities of the pancreas and biliary tract. 208 patients undergoing ERCP were studied prospectively and all had an ultrasound examination in the 24 hours before ERCP. 15 patients had dilated bile-ducts for which no cause was seen on both ultrasound and ERCP; these patients were excluded. 120 of the remaining patients had an abnormal ERCP. In 101 ultrasound findings were in agreement (sensitivity 84%). 73 patients had a normal ERCP with ultrasound agreement in 70 (specificity 95%). The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasound is now such that patients can proceed directly to ERCP for diagnostic confirmation and papillotomy or endoprosthesis insertion where appropriate.Selective per-operative cholangiography and scoring method for selection.A prospective clinical study was undertaken over a period of 3 years on a series of 210 consecutive cases of gall stones to review a selective policy for per-operative cholangiography (PC). All patients had elective cholecystectomy and routine PC. A scoring method (SM) based on pre and per-operative surgical criteria was adopted to determine the necessity of PC before this was attempted. The study revealed that PC was indicated in 64 cases (30.5%) only. Of these 64 patients 20 had abnormal cholangiograms of which 18 proved positive on exploration. There were two false positive results (0.95%) of PC but no false negative result. Of 146 patients (69.5%) not clinically indicated for routine PC, 145 had normal cholangiograms and one had a small (5 mm diameter) silent stone (0.47%) in the Common Bile Duct (CBD). The scoring method failed to predict this case of silent stone. PC was technically unsatisfactory in 4 cases (1.9%). Thus by adopting the selective policy X-rays could have been avoided in 69.5% cases in which only a small silent stone would have been overlooked. However, this stone could have passed into the duodenum spontaneously or else it could have been removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy had it caused any symptoms. It is concluded that routine PC is not always necessary, a selective policy may be preferred and a scoring method may be used as a guide for selection of the cases.[Value of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of distal choledocolithiasis].We performed real time echotomographic studies in 203 patients with a clinical diagnosis of obstructive jaundice. All patients were operated on and a diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was established in 125. The same diagnosis had been made by echo in 69 of them for a 63% sensitivity rate. The specificity was 92% and the positive predictive value 93%. An improvement in sensitivity from 52 to 80% and in specificity from 91 to 94% along the 3 year study period was detected. This high yield of the echographic study, not widespread in the literature, may be attributed to a careful study of the intrapancreatic section of the common duct were 92% of the stones were found. Also, the experience and training of the radiologist performing the examination is essential.Accuracy of abdominal ultrasonography and the role of a second investigation in surgical obstructive jaundice.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography (US) was evaluated in delineating the site and cause of biliary obstruction in 59 patients of surgical obstructive jaundice (SOJ). A final analysis of the ultrasonographic data was carried out in 42 patients on whom laparotomy or endoscopic papillotomy with removal of common bile duct stones, confirmed the diagnosis. Evaluation of the role of second investigation following ultrasound in 28 patients (side-viewing endoscopy in 13, ERCP in 12 and PTC in 3) was also done to determine whether they provide any additional information over ultrasonography in delineating the exact level and etiology of biliary obstruction. US was done by the clinician who interpreted the findings in conjunction with the clinical profile of the patient. US correctly diagnosed SOJ in all 42 patients. In 26 of the 28 patients with distal CBD block (specificity 87.5%; sensitivity 100%) and in 14 out of 16 patients with proximal CBD block (specificity 100%; sensitivity 87.5%) US provided and accurate diagnosis of the site of obstruction. US was correct in diagnosing a malignant etiology in 26 out of 27 malignant cases whereas it accurately indentified the benign nature of biliary obstruction in 14 of the 15 patients of SOJ due to benign obstruction (specificity and sensitivity range 93.3% to 96.3%). A second investigation could correctly change the etiology and site of biliary obstruction in only 5 patients (17.9%) whereas in the remaining 23 patients (82.1%) it did not add any additional information over the US findings. Six out of fifteen patients (40%) who underwent cholangiography had cholangitis and in one severe septicemia led to death.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[Ultrasonography and biliary calculi: a retrospective study on the diagnostic reliability].The Authors evaluated diagnostic reliability of echotomography in biliary tract lithiasis, reviewing a series of 130 patients (out of 171) who were surgically treated; 30 had proved to be affected with biliary main tract stones. A high rate of false negatives was documented as related to the diagnosis of lithiasis of the main biliary duct.[Ultrasonics in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].The value of ultrasound in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis is controversial, sensitivity figures ranging from 22 to 75%. We correlated the ultrasound study with operative findings in 38 patients. A diagnosis of common bile duct stone was made upon finding an echogenic image with or without acoustic shadow in the common bile duct; no attention was paid to the dilatation of the biliary tree. The sensitivity was 68% and the positive predictive value was 85%. Therefore, our results approach the highest reported figures for the value of this diagnostic technique.Preoperative ultrasonic of common bile duct stones and its importance to surgical management--result of a prospective controlled trial.The biliary tract was examined by sonography in 192 nonselected surgical patients with clinically suspected gallbladder stone disease. This study was carried out to assess the potentiality of ultrasonic examination in the detection of common bile duct stones. All patients were operated on with sonographic monitoring during surgery. Common bile duct stones can be detected with high accuracy only in patients with an obstructive jaundice and a dilated common duct. In these, the sensitivity was found to be 70%, whereas that for the whole group of patients was as low as 28%. Accuracy in the ultrasonic detection of common bile duct stones is limited, and operative cholangiography seems to retain its position as the most reliable method of exploring common bile duct stones.Value of sonography in obstructive jaundice. Limitations of bile duct caliber as an index of obstruction.The diagnostic value of sonography was assessed in 176 patients with jaundice who had a final diagnosis on the basis of surgery, autopsy, liver biopsy, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and serum tests positive for hepatitis A and B. Obstructive (n = 113) versus nonobstructive jaundice (n = 63) was diagnosed with a sensitivity of 91% and a specificity of 95%. Nine of the 10 false negatives had choledocholithiasis. Application of stricter criteria for common duct (CD) dilatation than the one used of CD greater than or equal to 8 mm to greater than or equal to 12 mm would have lowered the sensitivity from 91% to 84%. On the basis of these criteria the predicted level of obstruction would have shifted from distal to proximal in 36% of the patients. Choledocholithiasis was more often associated with decreasing bilirubin values than malignancy: 55% versus 9% (p less than 0.05). The present study indicates that intermittent obstruction, usually associated with choledocholithiasis, constitutes the main problem in detection of obstructive jaundice. Diameter criteria used for diagnosing dilatation of the CD may greatly influence sonographic accuracy.[The value of various imaging technics in the preoperative diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].In a retrospective study different methods of detecting choledocholithiasis-sonography, intravenous cholangiography, computed tomography and transhepatic cholangiography-have been compared to evaluate their accuracy. A total of 130 investigations in 93 patients were analysed. Choledocholithiasis could be predicted by sonography in 42.9%, by intravenous cholangiography in 60% and by transhepatic cholangiography in 85.7%. The overall accuracy rate with a single investigation was 51.6%. The combination of different methods increased the accuracy rate of 81.6%. We use sonography as the screening examination. In unclear cases transhepatic cholangiography has proven helpful in demonstrating choledocholithiasis. Only cholangiography, together with cholangioscopy, is performed intraoperatively. Due to high cost and limited availability, computed tomography should not be used as a basic examination.Serum transaminase levels and cholescintigraphic abnormalities in acute biliary tract obstruction.Twenty-five patients presenting to the hospital with symptoms suggestive of acute biliary tract disease were noted to have a characteristic pattern of transaminase and cholescintigraphic abnormalities. There was marked variability in the initial serum transaminase levels; however, 16 patients had aspartate aminotransferase levels greater than 300 IU, and 19 patients had alanine aminotransferase values greater than 300 IU. Regardless of the initial values, there was a 76% (aspartate aminotransferase) and 58% (alanine aminotransferase) reduction in transaminase levels within 72 hours, prior to therapeutic relief of bile duct obstruction. In ten patients with common bile duct obstruction, cholescintigraphy revealed no excretion of technetium Tc-99m-labeled iminodiacetic acid, for up to two hours after injection, into the extrahepatic biliary tract or small bowel. Common bile duct stones were present in 16 patients, five patients had acute pancreatitis, and four patients were thought to have spontaneously passed common duct stones. We believe that high transaminase levels may be found in patients with obstructive biliary tract disease, sequential measurements of transaminase levels may provide an important diagnostic clue for biliary tract disease, and nonexcretion of radionuclide on cholescintigraphy may be a feature of acute bile duct obstruction.[Sonographic diagnosis of bile duct calculi. Results of a prospective study of 222 cases of choledocholithiasis].To evaluate sonographic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledochal calculi 490 patients with cholestasis were examined prospectively with real-time scanner before ERCP or surgery. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 177 of 222 patients (sensibility 80%) and their absence in 242 of 268 (specificity 90%). Dilated extrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated via ultrasound in 84% of cases with choledocholithiasis, dilated intrahepatic bile ducts in 57%. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones.[Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones (an analysis of 112 cases)].The role of clinical and biochemical criteria and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the urgent diagnosis of common bile duct stones in acute pancreatitis.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria in predicting common bile duct (CBD) stones was analyzed in 76 patients with acute pancreatitis undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) during the same hospital admission. Forty patients had ERCP within 72 hours; cholangiography was successful in 92%. Fifty patients had biliary pancreatitis; 25 patients had CBD stones and all were successfully removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES). Twenty-six patients had nonbiliary pancreatitis. Two patients had complications from ERCP and/or ES; two patients died (no CBD stones) but ERCP was noncontributory. Significant differences were found between the biliary and nonbiliary disease groups with respect to age, and bilirubin. gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, alkaline phosphatase, alanine transaminase, and amylase levels. The first four factors also discriminated between those patients with and without CBD stones. Logistic discriminant functions were estimated providing probabilities for the presence of CBD stones for each patient but were too cumbersome for clinical use. A simple scoring system was devised on the basis of cut-off levels: bilirubin greater than or equal to 40 mumol/L, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase greater than or equal to 250 IU/L, alkaline phosphatase greater than or equal to 225 IU/L, and age greater than or equal to 70 years, indicating CBD stones. Bilirubin alone had a sensitivity and specificity of 80%; the specificity increased to 93% with all four factors. These results suggest that clinical and biochemical criteria and ERCP and/or ES may have important roles in the management of patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis.Ultrasound diagnosis of bile duct calculi.[Results of sonographic diagnosis of choledochal calculi].To evaluate sonographic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledochal calculi 44 patients were examined prospectively with a mechanical sector scanner before endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC). Calculi with a diameter of more than 1.5 cm could be detected in all cases. Smaller stones (less than 1 cm) were missed in 50% of cases. To quantitate sensitivity in daily clinical practice, the data of 229 patients, suspected to have common bile duct stones, were analysed retrospectively. The overall accuracy was 76%, 90% when an experienced sonographer performed the examination and 47% if the examiner was less experienced. From these data it is concluded that the sonographic detection of choledochal calculi is influenced by the examination technique, experience of the examiner and diameter of the stones.Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice.Fifty consecutive patients (32 males and 18 females) with cholestatic jaundice were examined by grey-scale ultrasound from June 1981 to June 1983. All patients were studied without access to case notes. All patients had a diagnosis established by subsequent liver biopsy, clinical course, surgery or autopsy. Using the presence or absence of a dilated biliary system as the criterion, intrahepatic or extrahepatic cholestasis was correctly differentiated in 48 of the 50 patients, giving an overall accuracy of 96%. All 16 patients with intrahepatic cholestasis were correctly identified. Two of the 34 patients with extrahepatic cholestasis, each of whom had biliary stones, were misdiagnosed as intrahepatic cholestasis. In the 34 patients with extra-hepatic cholestasis, site of obstruction was defined in 55.9%, and specific aetiology diagnosed in 44.1%. Ultrasound proves to be an accurate method for the evaluation of cholestatic jaundice, and would have a definite value as a screening test before proceeding to invasive studies.Predictive ability of choledocholithiasis indicators.Ultrasound detection of choledocholithiasis: prospective comparison with ERCP in the postcholecystectomy patient.The role of ultrasound as a screening test for choledocholithiasis was prospectively assessed by comparing the results of upper abdominal ultrasound with direct cholangiography in 59 unselected symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 13 of 29 patients (sensitivity, 45%) and their absence in 29 of 30 (specificity, 97%). A positive ultrasound diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was correct 13 times out of 14 (predictive value, 93%) whereas a negative diagnosis was correct on only 29 of 45 occasions (predictive value, 64%). No significant learning effect was seen. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones. Duct stones were present in 25 of 35 patients shown to have a dilated common duct on ultrasound, and in 4 of 24 with nondilated ducts; the predictive value of duct dilatation at ultrasound for duct stones was therefore 71% and that of nondilatation in excluding stones was 83%. Dilated intrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated at ultrasound in only 17% of patients with choledocholithiasis. We conclude that ultrasound cannot reliably diagnose or exclude bile duct stones and is an inadequate screening test for the symptomatic postcholecystectomy patient.[The significance of preoperative and postoperative sonography for biliary tract surgery. A prospective study].112 patients with biliary calculi and destined for cholecystectomy were sonographically investigated in a prospective study carried immediately before the operation as well as between the third and fifth, and between the seventh and ninth postoperative day. Biliary calculi were sonographically detectable in 111 of the 112 patients (sensitivity 0.99). The sonographically measured bile duct diameter agreed well with the actual bile duct diameter (r = 0.898). There was a correlation between the bile duct diameter and the severity of the underlying biliary disease. A sonographic diagnosis was successful in 11 of 17 patients with choledocholithiasis (sensitivity 0.65) whereas 10 false positive diagnoses gave a specificity of 0.88. Gallbladder wall thickness above 4 mm had a sensitivity of 0.9 and a specificity of 0.72 for the detection of severe chronic or acute cholecystitis. A high rate (50%) of postoperative subhepatic fluid collections was a conspicuous finding but these were predominantly transient or only short-lived and attained clinical significance in only 7 out of 108 patients (6.5%).[Value of ultrasonic examination for detection of biliary calculi].[Value of sonography and intravenous cholangiography in preoperative choledochus diagnosis].[Value of echotomography for the diagnosis of lithiasis of the common bile duct].The accuracy of ultrasonography (US) for the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and for dilatation of the intra- and extra-hepatic biliary tree is well known. However, the value of US for the diagnosis of common bile duct stones remains poorly defined. We performed a prospective study in 100 patients who were referred for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP); all the examinations were carried out by the same sonographist in the 24 h preceding the ERCP. Fifty patients had choledocholithiasis, 20 patients had obstruction of the bile ducts without lithiasis and the common bile duct (CBD) was free in 30 patients. The sensitivity of US for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was 40 p. 100, the specificity 90 p. 100. The positive and negative predictive values of the "CBD stone" sign was 80 p. 100 and 60 p. 100 respectively. In a total of 30 false negatives, the CBD could not be explored in 4 cases, dilatation of the CBD was missed in one case, and obstruction of the CBD by an other disease was diagnosed in 2; in all the other cases, US was able to appreciate the CBD size as well as the ERCP. In the 20 patients with an obstructed CBD but without choledocholithiasis, US diagnosed a stone in 5 cases. Age, serum bilirubin, existence of a previous cholecystectomy, technical difficulties, stone size were comparable in patients with true positive tests and in patients with false negative tests. However the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was more frequently achieved in patients with dilated CBD over 10 mm (p less than 0.05) and in patients with multiple stones.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Comparative accuracy of operative ultrasonography and cholangiography in detecting common duct calculi.Operative ultrasonography and operative radiographic cholangiography were compared for diagnostic effectiveness with regard to their ability to screen the common bile duct for the presence of calculi. We performed real-time B-mode ultrasonography and cholangiography using two injections of contrast material. In 350 patients, 349 ultrasonic and 285 cholangiographic examinations were performed with technically satisfactory results. The sensitivity, specificity, efficiency, and predictability of a negative test were at a high and comparable level for the two diagnostic procedures. However, the predictability of a positive test for ultrasonography of 91.8% was significantly greater (P less than 0.02) than the predictability of 73.2% for cholangiography. Since predictability of a positive test is based on common duct exploration rather than presumptive evidence of a clinical course, this test may be more valid than the other measures to determine diagnostic effectiveness. The advantages of ultrasonography, which are superior accuracy, favorable image qualities, reduced invasiveness, increased safety, avoidance of contrast material, and lower cost, were contrasted with the problems of ultrasonography, which included a slow learning curve for performance and interpretation of the technique and the limited availability of dedicated ultrasound equipment for surgical operations. We concluded that the advantages outweighed the problems and that operative ultrasonography of the common duct warrants wider application in clinical surgery.Ultrasonic evaluation of common bile duct stones: prospective comparison with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Ultrasound is the modality of choice for the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and for the evaluation of the intra- and extrahepatic biliary tree in the patient with jaundice, but its role in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis is less certain. We prospectively examined 90 patients who were to undergo endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) by performing right upper quadrant sonography immediately prior to ERCP. We assessed the size of the intra- and extrahepatic ducts and the presence or absence of calculi. ERCP, which was successfully performed in 77 of 94 attempted examinations, percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography, or surgical follow-up composed the diagnostic standard for comparison. Ultrasound was not accurate in the diagnosis (sensitivity, 25%) or exclusion (value of a negative study, 73%) of choledocholithiasis. Furthermore, in the postcholecystectomy patient population, ultrasound assessment of biliary duct size is not a useful predictor of biliary disease. For symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients, we recommend ERCP as the initial diagnostic modality.[Critical evaluation of echography in the diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice].Seventy one patients affected by cholestasis and jaundice were studied by means of ultrasound between september 1980 and february 1983 in order to evaluate the accuracy of this procedure in the investigation of the site of obstruction and its ethiology. The ultrasound findings were correlated with those obtained by opacification of the bile ducts, either endoscopic or percutaneous, and by surgery. The sonographic diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice was based on the size of the biliary tract taking in account that the intrahepatic branches are not evident in normal conditions and considering 4-5 mm and 7-8 mm as the upper limits for the proximal and distal segments of the common bile duct respectively. The accuracy of ultrasound in establishing the common bile duct size was 98%. Forty eight patients had extrahepatic obstruction, 45 of whom had a dilated common bile duct (94%), while 3 were normal (6%). Twenty two patients had an intrahepatic cholestasis, 20 of whom had a normal size of the common bile duct (91%) while 2 showed a dilatation (9%). Thus, the sensitivity was 95.7% and the specificity 86.9%. The ethiologic diagnosis was available in 31 patients with extrahepatic obstruction (65%) and in 7 with intrahepatic cholestasis (32%). Dilated common bile duct with stones and pancreas and gallbladder carcinoma were the most common causes of obstructions we have found in this group of patients. In patients with cholestasis and jaundice the ultrasonic diagnosis should establish the site of obstruction and, if it is possible, the ethiology.[Ultrasonics and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Correlation in biliopancreatic pathology].Preoperative bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and amylase levels as predictors of common duct stones.The predictive value of the preoperative level of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and amylase as indicators of choledocholithiasis was determined by prospectively evaluating 304 consecutive patients undergoing cholecystectomy. Elevated levels of bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase are associated with an increased incidence of common duct stones, and the percentage incidence of stones increases with rising bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels. Alkaline phosphatase levels as great as 200 are associated with common duct stones in a low percentage of instances, being equivalent to that for unsuspected stones. Levels of 200 or greater are associated with a marked increase in the incidence of common duct stones. An elevated serum or urine amylase level, or both, is of little, if any, value as a predictor of common duct stones. Alkaline phosphatase appears to be a better indicator of common duct stones than does bilirubin, but neither bilirubin nor alkaline phosphatase in themselves are statistically significant indicators. Bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase in combination is a statistically significant predictor of common duct stones at all levels. The combination of a bilirubin level of greater than 3.0 and an alkaline phosphatase level of greater than 250 has a 76.2 per cent probability of an associated common duct stone. The quite important role of operative cholangiography in demonstrating unsuspected stones and in preventing unnecessary common duct explorations is reinforced.[The importance and value of pre-, intra- and postoperative roentgenologic biliary tract diagnosis].Exploration of the common bile duct--the relevance of the clinical picture and the importance of peroperative cholangiography.A series of 500 cholecystectomies performed over a 7-year period was reviewed retrospectively. The reliability of preoperative clinical features such as jaundice and pancreatitis was assessed in determining the presence of choledocholithiasis, and was found to be of limited value. Investigations such as intravenous cholangiography and liver function tests were found also to be inaccurate in the detection of common duct stones as was the appearance of the duct at operation. The usefulness of the peroperative cholangiogram in the detection of common duct stones that would otherwise have been overlooked is emphasized. Common duct stones would have remained undetected in 25 per cent of patients with choledocholithiasis. Despite the use of routine peroperative cholangiography common duct stones were overlooked in 11.25 per cent of patients who underwent exploration.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and gray-scale abdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of jaundice.Fifty-five patients with suspected obstructive jaundice were studied with both ERCP and abdominal ultrasound. Biliary tract obstruction was documented in 49 patients and parenchymal liver disease in 7. A definite cause of jaundice was demonstrated by ERCP in 45 of 49 patients with biliary tract obstruction but in only 28 of 49 patients by ultrasound. Bile duct dilatation, where present, was detected by ERCP in only 33 of 42 patients. ERCP was particularly effective in patients with common duct stones; common duct calculi and a dilated common duct were detected in 15 of 16 such patients. Dilated bile ducts where present were detected by ultrasound in 22 of 42 patients. Ultrasound was particularly helpful in patients with pancreatic cancer in whom a dilated common duct could not be opacified during ERCP. ERCP and abdominal ultrasound together provide a rapid and safe method of diagnosis in the jaundiced patient with suspected bile duct obstruction.[Upper-abdominal ultrasonography and ERCP? (author's transl)].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as well as upper-abdominal ultrasonography were performed on 134 patients. Organ structure was optimally demonstrated by ultrasonography in 94 patients (70.2%) and partially in 29 (21.6%) Comparing the diagnostic assessment in 62 patients who had undergone 73 tests and had subsequently been operated on (57) or examined post-mortem (5) there was a statistically significant advantage of ERCP in diseases in which the choledochal duct had been involved. The method was successful in 95% of cases of choledocholithiasis (20 cases) compared with 45% by ultrasound and in 85% of cases of gall-bladder carcinoma which also involved the choledochal duct (38% by ultrasound). In clinically manifest carcinoma of the head of the pancreas (9 cases) and cholecystolithiasis (19 cases) ultrasonography provided the correct diagnosis in 89%, while the results for ERCP were 56% and 74%, respectively.Abnormal liver function tests in acute cholecystitis; the predicting of common duct stones.In a prospective series of 155 patients with acute cholecystitis preoperative liver function tests were determined with the aim of predicting the presence of common duct stones. Elevated serum bilirubin, aminotransferases and alkaline phosphatase levels were observed in 32, 34 and 22% of cases, respectively. The frequency of common duct stones was 17.4%. The sensitivity of bilirubin and aminotransferases with regard to ductal stones was higher (70-81%), but alkaline phosphatase showed the best predictive values (46%). The probability of common duct stones increased with higher degrees of elevation in the case of alkaline phosphatase, but not in the case of bilirubin or aminotransferases, A frequency of 31-67% of choledocholithiasis was found when one or all of the tests were positive. After random assignment the patients were operated on early or after delay. In the delayed surgery group more failures occurred in the conservative treatment of acute cholecystitis if the tests were elevated (36%) than if normal (15%, p less than 0.05). The frequencies of common duct stones were 11 and one in these groups (p less than 0.001). There was no increase in postoperative morbidity after early surgery (15%) compared with delayed surgery (22%, p greater than 0.1), when liver function was disturbed. Liver function tests thus allow patients with common duct stones to be selected for early surgery in acute cholecystitis.Grey scale ultrasonography: evaluating the jaundiced patient.Over a period of one year, 75 patients with jaundice were evaluated by grey scale ultrasonography. Intravenous cholangiography was attempted in 26 instances (bilirubin value greater than 4.3 mg/100 ml) and was diagnostic in only four. Ultrasound, on the other hand, was diagnostic for surgical jaundice in 62 of the 75 cases (82%). In 52 of the 62 patients a cause for the extrahepatic obstruction was demonstrated: 40 had cholelithiasis and choledocholithiasis, and 12 had tumors (11 pancreatic tumors, one lymphoma). In the remaining ten instances, obstruction was sonographically demonstrated but the cause was not. Of these, four patients were subsequently proven to have distal common duct stones, five had carcinoma of the pancreas and one had cholangiocarcinoma. This evidence indicates that ultrasound should be the noninvasive procedure of choice in the clinical assessment of obstructive jaundice.Clinical indications and accuracy of gray scale ultrasonography in the patient with suspected biliary tract disease.One hundred patients with suspected biliary tract disease underwent gray scale cholecystosonography (GSCS) and had diagnostic confirmation by oral cholecystogram (OCG) and/or operation. Ultrasonography demonstrated the gallbladder in 94 of the 100 patients; 2 patients had had previous cholecystectomy and 3 of the 4 remaining patients had documented stones with no confirmation of a nonvisualizing OCG in the other patient. Among the 88 patients with OCG, GSCS findings correlated in 91 per cent (2 per cent false-positive; 7 per cent false-negative). Among the 43 operative patients, GSCS was proven correct in 91 per cent (no false positive; 9 per cent false-negative). Of 12 patients with jaundice GSCS correlated with operative findings in 75 per cent (no false-positive; 25 per cent false-negative). Diagnostic errors occurred in patients with very small biliary calculi, particularly when a single stone was impacted in the cystic duct. Failure to identify the gallbladder with ultrasound signifies probable cholelithiasis in the patient without previous cholecystectomy. On the basis of this experience, we conclude that (1) GSCS is most useful when jaundice or acute illness precludes conventional studies; (2) GSCS provides an inexpensive, quick, accurate means of diagnosing cholelithiasis with a very high specificity (97 per cent) and moderate sensitivity (88 per cent); and (3) GSCS is the optimal diagnostic procedure for evaluating the biliary tract in the acutely ill, jaundiced, vomiting, allergic, and/or pregnant patient.Diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Relations between historical, laboratory, operative, and peroperative roentgen data.[VALUE OF THE LIVER FUNCTION TESTS IN SURGERY OF THE BILIARY TRACT].[Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and its complications].The author presents the results of ultrasound investigation (USI) of 419 patients with cholecystocholedocholithiasis. The diagnostic accuracy of USI methods in patients with calculous cholecystitis was 98.8%. Direct signs of visualization of concrements in the common bile duct (CBD) were found but in 68.5% of patients. On the basis of USI results the common bile stones were found in 287 (68.5%) patients. The concrements omitted in transabdominal USI were diagnosed using endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography, magnetic resonance cholangio-pancreaticography, endoscopic ultrasonography as well as in operative intervention.Are liver function tests, pancreatitis and cholecystitis predictors of common bile duct stones? Results of a prospective, population-based, cohort study of 1171 patients undergoing cholecystectomy.The purpose of this study was to explore the accuracy of elevated liver function values, age, gender, pancreatitis and cholecystitis as predictors of common bile duct stones (CBDS).All patients operated on for gallstone disease over a period of 3 years in a Swedish county of 302,564 citizens were registered prospectively. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was used to detect CBDS.A total of 1171 patients were registered; 95% of these patients underwent IOC. Common bile duct stones were found in 42% of patients with elevated liver function values, 20% of patients with a history of pancreatitis and 9% of patients with cholecystitis. The presence of CBDS was significantly predicted by elevated liver function values, but not by age, gender, history of acute pancreatitis or cholecystitis. A total of 93% of patients with normal liver function tests had a normal IOC. The best agreement between elevated liver function values and CBDS was seen in patients undergoing elective surgery without a history of acute pancreatitis or cholecystitis.Although alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and bilirubin levels represented the most reliable predictors of CBDS, false positive and false negative values were common, especially in patients with a history of cholecystitis or pancreatitis, which indicates that other mechanisms were responsible for elevated liver function values in these patients.Indication of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography by noninvasive predictive factors of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective clinical study.To evaluate the reliability of a screening method in patients with common bile duct (CBD) stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) based on predictive factors, and to determine the cases for which preoperative therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) is indicated.Alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, amylase, and dilation of CBD results were defined as predictive factors for CBD stones. In cases in which all these 4 factors were negative, preoperative ERC was omitted, and in cases in which 1 of the 4 factors was positive, ERC was performed before LC.A total of 323 patients (83.7%) in whom all 4 factors were negative, ERC was omitted. In all the 63 patients (16.3%) in whom 1 of the 4 factors was positive, ERC was performed. In 52 (82.5%) of them, CBD stones were present and in 43 of them, LC was performed after endoscopic choledocholithotomy.For cases in which any 1 of the 4 factors was positive before LC, it was strongly recommended to perform preoperative ERC.Prediction of common bile duct stones in the earliest stages of acute biliary pancreatitis.Accurate prediction of common bile duct (CBD) stones in acute biliary pancreatitis is warranted to select patients for early therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). We evaluated commonly used biochemical and radiological predictors of CBD stones in a large prospective cohort of patients with acute biliary pancreatitis who were undergoing early ERCP.167 patients with acute biliary pancreatitis who were undergoing early ERCP (< 72 hours after symptom onset) in 15 Dutch hospitals in 2004 - 2007 were prospectively included. Abdominal ultrasonography and/or computed tomography (CT) was performed on admission and complete liver biochemistry determined daily. We used univariate logistic regression to assess associations between CBD stones found during ERCP (gold standard) and the following parameters: (1) clinical: age, sex, predicted severity; (2) radiological: dilated CBD, impacted stone in CBD; and (3) biochemical: bilirubin, γ-glutamyltransferase (GGT), alkaline phosphatase, alanine aminotransferase (ALT), and aspartate aminotransferase (AST).Out of 167 patients, 94 (56 %) had predicted severe acute biliary pancreatitis, 51 (31%) exhibited a dilated CBD and 15 (9%) had CBD stones on ultrasonography and/or CT. ERCP was performed at a median of 0 days (interquartile range 0 - 1) after admission. CBD stones were found during ERCP in 89/167 patients (53%). In univariate analysis, the only parameters significantly associated with CBD stones were GGT (per 10 units increase: odds ratio 1.02, 95% CI 1.01 - 1.03, P = 0.001) and alkaline phosphatase (per 10 units increase: odds ratio 1.03, 95% CI 1.00 - 1.05, P = 0.028). These and all other tested parameters, however, showed poor positive predictive value (ranging from 0.53 to 0.69) and poor negative predictive value (ranging from 0.46 to 0.67).The results of this study suggest that commonly used biochemical and radiological predictors of the presence of CBD stones during ERCP in the earliest stages of acute biliary pancreatitis are unreliable.[Diagnostic performance of biliary ultrasound vs. magnetic resonance cholangiogram in patients with recurrent biliary obstruction.].Obstructive jaundice in patients with previous cholecystectomy requires a precise diagnosis. In the diagnostic algorithm, biliary ultrasound (BUS) and magnetic resonance cholangiogram (MRC) are used, although the accuracy of each method is unknown in our setting. No previous comparison of US and MRC in subjects with cholecystectomy has been made.To determine diagnostic accuracy of BUS and MRC in patients with recurrent biliary obstruction.Patients with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopacreatography (ERCP) demonstrating recurrent biliary obstruction by stones were included. All patients underwent BUS and MRC. We determined the diagnostic performance of each image study compared with ERCP.Twenty-seven patients with a mean age of 62.9 +/- 17.3 years-old were included. Sensitivity and specificity of BUS were 0.12 and 0.58, respectively. Figures for MRC were 0.88 and 0.82. Diagnostic agreement between ERCP and MRC was k= 0.66 whereas BUS had a k of only 0.26.MRC had good diagnostic performance for recurrent choledocolithiasis. BUS demonstrated lower accuracy compared with previous reports, so should not be considered in the initial approach of recurrent choledocus obstruction.Comparative diagnostic evaluation with MR cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography and CT in patients with pancreatobiliary disease.The aim of this study was to directly compare the results of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) with those of ultrasonography (US) and multislice computed tomography (MSCT) in the diagnosis of pancreaticobiliary diseases.A total of 70 patients (41 men, 29 women) aged 22-89 years were studied either before (n=59) or after cholecystectomy (n=11) for biliary lithiasis. Clinical signs and symptoms were jaundice (n=15), abdominal pain (n=37) and proven biliary lithiasis (n=18). MRCP was performed in all patients, whereas abdominal US was performed in 55 (group 1) and MSCT in 37 (group 2) patients. A regional evaluation of the main structures of the pancreaticobiliary system was performed: gallbladder and cystic duct, intra- and extrahepatic bile ducts and main pancreatic duct. Histology (n=27), biopsy (n=5), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) (n=28) and/or clinical-imaging follow-up (n=10) were considered standards of reference. In particular, patients were classified as showing benign (n=47) or malignant (n=12) lesions or normal biliary anatomy (n=11).In group 1, the results of MRCP and US were concordant in the majority (92%) of cases; however, statistically significant discordance (p<0.01) was found in the evaluation of the extrahepatic ducts, with nine cases (16%) of middle-distal common bile duct stones being detected on MRCP only. In group 2, the results of MRCP and MSCT were also concordant in most cases (87%). However, findings were significantly discordant when the intra- and extrahepatic ducts were analysed, with seven (19%) and six (16%) cases, respectively, of lithiasis being detected on MRCP only (p<0.01 for both).The results of our study confirm the diagnostic potential of MRCP in the study of the pancreaticobiliary duct system. In particular, the comparison between MRCP and US and MSCT indicates the superiority of MRCP in evaluating bile ducts and detecting stones in the common bile duct.Liver test patterns in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis and/or choledocholithiasis.Liver tests are utilized to determine the presence of biliary obstruction.To examine our hypothesis that liver tests aid in elucidating whether patients have simple calculous cholecystitis (ACC) or choledocholithiasis (CDL).We performed a retrospective study of patients admitted to two University of Texas Southwestern teaching hospitals with a clinical picture consistent with 'acute gallstone disease', i.e. cholecystitis +/- choledocolithiasis. The presence of ACC and CDL was based on defined clinical criteria.The cohort consisted of 154 patients meeting specific entry criteria, primarily with right upper quadrant pain; 62 ACC, 79 both ACC and CDL and 13 CDL alone. Approximately 30% of patients with ACC had abnormal alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and/or bilirubin level and approximately 50% had abnormal aminotransferase levels. Among patients with ACC/CDL, 77% had abnormal ALP, 60% had abnormal bilirubin and 90% had abnormal aminotransferase levels. By multivariate analysis, increasing common bile duct size and an abnormal ALP and alanine aminotransferase (ALT) were excellent predictors of having ACC with CDL.Liver test patterns can aid in elucidating CDL, including in ACC patients. Fundamentally, patients with CDL were more likely to have more abnormal liver tests, whether they had CDL only, or CDL and ACC. A dilated CBD, and abnormal ALP and ALT had modest sensitivity and high specificity for identification of patients with ACC and CDL.[Comparative study of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in common duct stones].To compare the diagnostic value study the technique of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in common duct stones.Three hundreds and eighty-four patients suspected common duct stones from August 2005 to October 2007 were undergone abdominal ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP.There was stone in common duct in 370 and no stones in 14 of 384 patients. Ultrasonography indicated stones 268 cases, 8 false positive result was among them. MRCP diagnosed stones in 362 cases and false positive result in 6 cases, ERCP diagnosed stones 370 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP was 70.3% (260/370), 96.2% (356/370) and 100% respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography for common duct stone was little higher, US should be used as a primary checking method. There was higher concordance between MRCP and ERCP for common duct stone. Combination of MRCP and ERCP can improve diagnostic accuracy of common duct stone.Total bilirubin is a useful predictor of persisting common bile duct stone in gallstone pancreatitis.Accepted guidelines for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in gallstone pancreatitis are lacking. Our previous investigations suggested that serum total bilirubin on hospital Day 2 best predicts persisting common bile duct (CBD) stones. We aim to identify an optimal total bilirubin threshold on hospital Day 2 that would predict persisting CBD stones and guide obtaining preoperative ERCP. Prospective and retrospective data were available from 200 consecutive patients with gallstone pancreatitis at a public teaching hospital from 2003 through 2007. Charts were examined for persisting CBD stones on ERCP and/or intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Patients with cholangitis (n = 18) were excluded. Nineteen of the remaining 182 (10%) patients had CBD stones. Mean hospital Day 2 bilirubin was 3.7 mg/dL for patients with CBD stones versus 1.4 mg/dL for those without (P < 0.0001). Seventeen patients (9%) had total bilirubin 4 or greater on hospital Day 2. Of these, eight (4%) had CBD stones (specificity 94%). Of the 165 patients with total bilirubin less than 4, 11 (7%) had CBD stones (P < 0.0001). In gallstone pancreatitis, a serum total bilirubin level 4 mg/dL or greater on hospital Day 2 predicts persisting CBD stones with enough specificity to serve as a practical guideline for ERCP while minimizing unnecessary procedures.Preoperative clinical and paraclinical predictors of choledocholithiasis.Choledocholithiasis is the most common cause of obstructive jaundice and cholangitis and occurs in about 10% of patients with symptomatic gallstone. The aim of this study was to find preoperative and non-invasive tests for predicting common bile duct stones (CBDs).Findings of clinical examination, history, laboratory tests and ultrasound (US) in 60 patients with CBDs were compared retrospectively, with 60 patients with gallstones. The data were collected from medical charts. The sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value (PPV) were determined.The comparison between the two groups showed significant differences in anorexia, itching, dark urine, subicterus (slightly elevated serum bilirubin without clinical evidence of jaundice) and jaundice appearance, increased bilirubin level, aspartate aminotransferase (AST) and alanine aminotranferase (ALT), CBD diameter >6 mm and stone observation under US (P<0.05). The highest specificity (100%) and PPV (100%) were found in dark urine and pale colored stool, history of cholangitis, and icterus. Among paraclinical tests, alkaline phosphatase (ALP) had the highest specificity (72.1%) and PPV (12.5%). Under US, stone observation in CBD was the most important factor with a sensitivity of 94.5%, a specificity of 100% and a PPV of 100%.The most important factors for predicting CBDs are history of cholangitis and pancreatitis, presence of icterus, dark urine, pale colored stool, elevation of ALP, and sonographic evidence of chledocholithiasis.Biochemical predictors for absence of common bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To provide optimal selection of patients for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography or intraoperative cholangiography, we evaluated simple, noninvasive biochemical parameters as screening tests to predict the absence of common bile duct stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A total of 1002 patients underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Five biochemical parameters were measured preoperatively: gamma glutamyl transferase (GGT), alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, alanine aminotransferase, and aspartate aminotransferase. Conventional diagnostic tests, including ultrasound imaging, computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, common bile duct diameter, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and serum amylase were performed. Along with the five biochemical tests above, these diagnostic tests were scrutinized and compared as potential predictors for common bile duct stones.Eighty-eight (8.8%) patients with gallstone disease who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy had concurrent common bile duct stones. Among all diagnostic tests, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography had the highest sensitivity (96.0%), specificity (99.1%), probability ratio (107.3), accuracy (98.0%), and positive predictive value (98.8%) in detecting common bile duct stones. At least one abnormal elevation among the five biochemical parameters had the highest sensitivity (87.5%). Total bilirubin had the highest specificity (87.5%), highest probability ratio (3.9), highest accuracy (84.1%), and highest positive predictive value (27.4%). All five biochemical predictors had high negative predictive values; gamma glutamyl transferase was highest (97.9%), while the lowest was total bilirubin (94.7%). Multivariate analysis showed only gamma glutamyl transferase, alkaline phosphatase, and total bilirubin to be independent predictors; gamma glutamyl transferase appeared to be the most powerful predictor (odds ratio 3.20).Biochemical tests, especially gamma glutamyl transferase with 97.9% negative predictive value, are ideal noninvasive predictors for the absence of common bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. We suggest that unnecessary, costly, or risky procedures such as endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography can be omitted prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy in patients without abnormal elevation of these biochemical values.Triple non-invasive diagnostic test for exclusion of common bile ducts stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To evaluate the impact of a preoperative "triple non-invasive diagnostic test" for diagnosis and/or exclusion of common bile duct stones.All patients with symptomatic gallstone disease, operated on by laparoscopic cholecystectomy from March 2004 to March 2006 were studied retrospectively. Two hundred patients were included and reviewed by using a triple diagnostic test including: patient's medical history, routine liver function tests and routine ultrasonography. All patients were followed up 2-24 mo after surgery to evaluate the impact of triple diagnostic test.Twenty-five patients were identified to have common bile duct stones. Lack of history of stones, negative laboratory tests and normal ultrasonography alone was proven to exclude common bile duct stones in some patients. However, a combination of these three components (triple diagnostic), was proven to be the most statistically significant test to exclude common bile duct stones in patients with gallstone disease.Using a combination of routinely used diagnostic components as triple diagnostic modality would increase the diagnostic accuracy of common bile duct stones preoperatively. This triple non-invasive test is recommended for excluding common bile duct stones and to identify patients in need for other investigations.[Alterations in laboratory tests as predictors of choledocholithiasis in patients who underwent ERCP: experience in a national private center].ERCP is very important in the management of common bile duct stones but it has associated morbidity.We analyze retrospectively records of 293 patients with suspected CBD stones to determine laboratory predictors of the pathology and improve the selection of patients for the examination. Sensitivity, specifity, predictive positive value and predictive negative value were calculated for alkaline phosphatase (FA), Total Bilirrubin (BT), TGO(AST) and TGO(ALT). We also compared values between patients with and without gallbladder suffering CBD stones confirmed by ERCP.293 patients had ERCP. 247 had CBD stones and 46 had no stones. OF the CBD stones group 58(23%) didn't have gallbladder and 187(77%) had gallbladder. Hepatic function tests FA, TGP y BT where all pronostic factors for CBD stones on univariate analysis with statistical value of p<0.01. Clinical presentation was not included in analysis. Age, TGO(AST) and GGTP didn't showed statistical significance.The predictors of CBD stones have better results when combined. The use of stricter selection criteria can reduce the number of normal exams and complications.Preoperative determinants of common bile duct stones during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The aim of this study is to determine whether there are any clinical or biochemical predictors of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prospective database of nearly 1000 laparoscopic cholecystectomies performed under the care of a single surgeon with a standardised technique between 1999 and 2006, was analysed. Clinical presentation, ultrasound and immediate preoperative biochemical results as well as the operative cholangiogram findings were reviewed. Routine cholangiography was attempted in most patients and the primary outcome variable was the detection of bile duct stones. The data was analysed using chi-squared test for categorical variables. The significant variables on univariate analysis were further characterised to identify the independent predictors of bile duct stones using a logistic regression model (significance p < 0.05).A total of 757 of 988 patients (77%) underwent cholangiography. Male-to-female ratio was 1 : 3 with a median age of 54 years (range: 17-93). Ten per cent of patients had bile duct stones identified on cholangiography. On univariate analysis, jaundice (p = 0.019), cholangitis (p < 0.001), alanine transaminase > 100 (p = 0.024), alkaline phosphatase (ALP) > 350 (p < 0.001) and CBD > 10 mm (p = 0.01) were significant markers for predicting bile duct stones. Bilirubin > 30 (x2 normal) was found not to be significant (p = 0.145). On a logistic regression model, ALP > 350 and/or cholangitis were found to be independent predictive factors of CBD stones (odds ratio 6.1).If a policy of routine intra-operative cholangiography is not adopted, a history of cholangitis or a raised ALP immediately preoperatively should lead to a high suspicion of CBD stones.[Choledocolithiasis predictors in high-risk population subjected to endoscopic retrograde pancreatocholangiography at "Hospital Nacional Arzobispo Loayza"].The choledocholithiasis is a frequent complication of gallstone disease. The endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is suitable for its diagnosis and treatment. That approach has both significative morbility and mortality so others methods of diagnosis have been proposed such as intraoperatorycholangiography (IOC) and magnetic resonance cholangiography (MRC), reserving ERCP only for therapy purpose.Verify the utility of choledocholithiasis predictors described in literatureThis study is a correlational observational transversal prospective approach. It was performed at the Arzobispo Loayza Hospital from August 2004 to January 2005. Many clinical, biochemical and ecographyc predictors of choledocholithiasis were analyzed in 151 patient underwent to ERCP. In all peopleunder study and analyzing separately patients underwent to cholecystectomy or not previous to ERCP, it was identified some risk factors for choledocholithiasis by means of both univariate and multivariate analysis.The univariate analysis showed a relationships among age, icterus, cholangytis, direct bilirrubin, amylase, lactic deshidrogenasa, ductal dilatation (>8 mm) and choledocholithiasis. In all groups, the multivariate analysis determined that ductal dilatation by ecography was the unique predictor for choledocholithiasis in the group of patients postoperated.None single indicator was able to predict with accuracy the choledocholithiasis. However, the parameters described in the literature are useful in our country.[Conventional ultrasound in the diagnosis of bile duct calculi].Transabdominal ultrasound (US) is one of the most useful methods in the diagnosis of biliary stones.To appreciate the value of US in the diagnosis of bile duct stones.989 patients, explored in the Institute of Gastroenterology and Hepatology Iaşi by US compared with ERCP, MRCP, operative diagnosis and the final diagnostic.The sensitivity of US in the detection of bile duct stones was 78.39% and specificity was 72.22% in the first group of 650 patients, and bile duct stones were identified in 139 cases of 339 of the second group where US could not identify the cause of bile duct dilatations.The results were comparable with the most recent studies in the literature.US is an efficient method for the diagnosis of bile duct stones in many cases and remains the first step in the diagnosis.Impact of the operator's experience on value of high-resolution transabdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis: a prospective comparison using endoscopic retrograde cholangiography as the gold standard.Transabdominal ultrasound (US) is the most frequently used imaging method for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of high-resolution US in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones depending on the operator's experience and in comparison with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) as the gold standard.From April 2003 through November 2004, 126 patients referred because of clinically and biochemically suspected common bile duct stones were included in the study. Two patients were excluded because they refused to undergo ERC. Consequently, the study comprised 124 patients (86 F, 38 M, mean age 63.2 years, range 21-91 years). High-resolution US was performed (2-5 MHz sector scanner; Siemens Elegra, Erlangen, Germany) by operators who were unaware of the results of other imaging procedures. The definitive diagnosis was established by means of ERC.Thirty-five out of 124 patients were investigated by experienced examiners. Twenty-seven of 35 patients (77%) were found to have stones at ERC. Bile duct stones were correctly found by US in 22 out of 27 patients (sensitivity 82%, 95% CI: 63-92). Of the 8 patients without stones at ERC, one false-positive diagnosis was made with US (specificity 88%, 95% CI: 53-98). Correct diagnoses were made in 29 out of 35 (accuracy 83%, 95% CI: 67-92) patients investigated by experienced examiners. Eighty-nine out of 124 patients were investigated by less-experienced examiners. Fifty-four of 89 patients (61%) were found to have stones at ERC. Choledocholithiasis was found correctly in only 25 out of 54 patients (sensitivity 46%, 95% CI: 34-59). Of the 35 patients without stones at ERC, three false-positive diagnoses were made with US (specificity 91%, 95% CI: 78-97). In conclusion, correct diagnoses were observed in 57 of 89 patients (accuracy 64%, 95% CI: 54-73) investigated by less-experienced examiners (p<0.05 in comparison with the results of experienced examiners).High-resolution US carried out by experienced examiners has a high diagnostic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Therefore, good training and continued experience are prerequisites for successful sonographic detection of bile duct stones using US. Under these conditions, further expensive and invasive methods such as ERC, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic ultrasonography may not be necessary in cases with a clear sonographic diagnosis.Useful predictive factors of common bile duct stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for gallstones.The aim of this study was to determine useful predictive factors of common bile duct stones (CBDs) as diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) for gallstones.A total of 510 patients underwent ERCP prior to LC. Also reviewed in each were clinical data, laboratory data, and ultrasonographic findings. Data were evaluated by uni- and multivariate analysis to determine which of the useful predictive factors thus far reported might be in the concurrence of CBDs.Univariate analysis identified jaundice, pancreatitis, ALT, total bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, amylase, and CBD dilatation at ultrasonography as predictors. Multivariate analysis subsequently identified alkaline phosphatase (p<0.0001), total bilirubin (p=0.0008), amylase (p=0.0009), and CBD dilatation at ultrasonography (p=0.0012) as independent predictive factors of CBDs. The estimates for the detection of CBDs, when the indication of ERCP is determined on the basis of the four predictive factors, were found to be as follows: sensitivity 97.6%, positive predictive value 78.6%, and positive accuracy 95.3%.It is advisable to ascertain by preoperative ERCP whether there might be any CBDs in patients about to undergo an LC for treatment of cholelithiasis insofar as the patient has one or more of these factors. It is concluded that an LC may be performed by omitting the prior ERCP, conversely, on patients devoid of all of these factors.Validity of ultrasonography in diagnosing obstructive jaundice.To evaluate the validity of ultrasonography in patients who have obstructive jaundice.A descriptive retrospective study.Surgical Department, Tikur Anbessa Teaching Hospital, Addis-Ababa, Ethiopia.A total of 49 patients; 15 male and 34 female underwent operation for obstructive jaundice.The cause of obstructive jaundice identified by ultrasonography with reasonable sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 79% for choledocholithiasis and sensitivity of 50% and specificity of 90% for pancreatic head tumours. The degree of common bile duct enlargement was significantly higher when the cause for obstruction was malignant, originating from the head of pancreas or distal end of the common bile duct.Ultrasonography should be the first and best initial imaging procedure in patients who have obstructive jaundice and shows reasonable sensitivity and specificity to identify causes of obstruction in obstructive jaundice. These findings may act also as a base for which further studies on validity of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of obstructive jaundice could be carried out.Role of liver function tests in predicting common bile duct stones in acute calculous cholecystitis.The role of liver function tests (LFTs) in evaluating common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients with cholelithiasis has been studied widely. However, it is not clear whether these predictive models are useful in inflammatory gallstone disease.A review was undertaken of 385 consecutive patients admitted as an emergency for acute calculous gallbladder disease. The diagnosis of calculous cholecystitis was confirmed by ultrasonography or histological confirmation of acute or chronic inflammation of the gallbladder. Patients with obvious jaundice, defined as a bilirubin level above 80 micromol/l, and gallstone pancreatitis were excluded.Some 216 patients met the inclusion criteria, of whom 28 (13.0 per cent) were found to have CBD stones. LFT results were not significantly different in patients with chronic, acute or complicated acute cholecystitis. Using several cut-off levels, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT) had the highest specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value, comparable to a scoring system that combined all LFTs. Bilirubin was the least specific and predictive. A cut-off point for GGT at 90 units/l produced a sensitivity of 86 per cent (24 of 28), specificity of 74.5 per cent (140 of 188), and positive and negative predictive values of 33 per cent (24 of 72) and 97.2 per cent (140 of 144) respectively. This represented a one in three chance of CBD stones when the GGT level was above 90 units/l and a one in 30 chance when the level was less than 90 units/l.Selection criteria based on GGT can be used in acute calculous cholecystitis to identify high-risk patients who would benefit most from further imaging to exclude choledocholithiasis.[Ultrasonic diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].Potential of ultrasonic examination for diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was analyzed in 47 patients. Ultrasonic scanners Acuson 128XP and SONOLINE Elegra with 2-9 MHz sensors were used. Choledocholithisis was diagnosed during transabdominal echography in 38 (80.9%) patients. Method of ultrasound-assisted "vibratory" palpation for diagnosis of mobile concrements of the common bile duct is presented. Causes of 2 (4.3%) false-positive and 7 (14.9%) false-negative results of examination are analyzed.Predictors of common bile duct lithiasis in laparoscopic era.To analyze retrospectively the records of 294 consecutive patients operated upon for gallbladder stones, to determine the predictive factors of synchronous common bile duct (CBD) stones and validate prospectively the generated model.The prognostic estimation of a biochemical test and ultrasonography alone to differentiate between the absence and presence of choledocholithiasis was assessed using receiver operating characteristics curve analysis. Multivariate analysis was employed using discriminant analysis for establishment of a best model. Prospective validation of the model was made.Discriminant forward stepwise analysis disclosed that high values (> or = 2 x normal) of SGOT, ALP, conjugated bilirubin and CBD diameter on ultrasound > or = 10 mm were all prognostic factors of CBD lithiasis in univariate and multivariate analysis, P< 0.01. History was not included in the model. Prospective validation of the model was performed by multivariate analysis using Visual General Stepwise Regression. Positive predictive value, when considering all these predictors, was 93.3%, while the negative predictive value was 88.8%. Sensitivity of the model was 96.5% and specificity 80%.The above model can be objectively applied to predict the presence of CBD stones.The detection of bile duct stones in suspected biliary pancreatitis: comparison of MRCP, ERCP, and intraductal US.Early ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy for stone extraction can benefit the prognosis in patients with severe biliary pancreatitis, but are associated with complications. The ability to identify choledocholithiasis by noninvasive means in biliary pancreatitis is limited. The aim of this study was evaluation of the ability of MRCP to detect choledocholithiasis in patients with acute biliary pancreatitis. In addition, we investigated whether intraductal US (IDUS) could help manage these patients.Thirty-two patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis were studied prospectively. MRCP was performed immediately before ERCP by separate blinded examiners within 24 h of admission. Wire-guided IDUS was performed during ERCP within 72 h of admission, regardless of the results of MRCP. Using endoscopic extraction of a stone as the reference standard, the diagnostic yield of MRCP was compared with transabdominal US, CT, ERCP, and IDUS.The sensitivity of US, CT, MRCP, ERCP, and IDUS for identifying choledocholithiasis was 20.0%, 40.0%, 80.0%, 90.0%, and 95.0%, respectively. The overall agreement between MRCP and ERCP was 90.6% for choledocholithiasis (kappa= 0.808, p < 0.01). The sensitivity of MRCP for detecting choledocholithiasis decreased with dilated bile ducts (bile duct diameter > 10 mm, 72.7% vs 88.9%). The combination of ERCP and IDUS improved accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.MRCP can be used to select patients with biliary pancreatitis who require ERCP. IDUS may be applied in the management of biliary pancreatitis if ERCP is performed.Selective endoscopic cholangiography for the detection of common bile duct stones in patients with cholelithiasis.The detection and management of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy continues to be controversial. Several diagnostic and therapeutic strategies have been suggested. These include intraoperative cholangiography, selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography. The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of selective ERCP in detecting CBD stones in patients with cholelithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In a prospective study, patients with cholelithiasis who presented during a 6-year period were assessed on a selective basis with ERCP for suspected CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. ERCP was carried out if the patient had any of the following criteria: a dilated CBD on ultrasound, gallstone pancreatitis, or abnormal liver function tests. Intraoperative cholangiography was not performed in any of the patients. Long-term follow-up was undertaken.The study included 427 patients. On the basis of selective criteria, ERCP was carried out in 41 patients (9.6 %), with confirmed CBD stones in 22 cases (53.7 %). The most useful predictor of CBD stones on ERCP was the presence of a dilated CBD in association with abnormal liver function tests. In this situation, CBD stones were identified in 14 of 17 cases (82 %). Abnormal liver function tests alone had a sensitivity of 50 % (four of eight). All other parameters used in isolation had a lower detection rate. During a median follow-up period of 6 years (range 1-10 years), six of 386 patients (1.6 %) with initially normal imaging and biochemical tests presented again with retained stones. All were successfully managed by ERCP and sphincterotomy. There were no major complications.Preoperative selective ERCP is effective in detecting clinically significant CBD stones. However, there is a high false-negative rate when a single criterion is used to guide therapy. Multivariate analysis of preoperative parameters for risk stratification, in conjunction with other imaging modalities, may make it possible to minimize unnecessary ERCPs.Selection criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy and endoscopic treatment of bile duct stones: results of a retrospective, single center study between 1996-2002.The optimal treatment for bile duct stones (in terms of cost, complications and accuracy) is unclear. The aim of our study was to determine the predictive factors for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Patients undergoing preoperative ERCP (< or =90 d before laparoscopic cholecystectomy) were evaluated in this retrospective study from the 1st of January 1996 to the 31st of December 2002. The indications for ERCP were elevated serum bilirubin, elevated liver function tests (LFT), dilated bile duct (> or =8 mm) and/or stone at US examination, coexisting acute pancreatitis and/or acute pancreatitis or jaundice in patient's history. Suspected prognostic factors and the combination of factors were compared to the result of ERCP.Two hundred and six preoperative ERCPs were performed during the observed period. The rate of successful cannulation for ERC was (97.1%). Bile duct stones were detected in 81 patients (39.3%), and successfully removed in 79 (97.5%). The number of prognostic factors correlated with the presence of bile duct stones. The positive predictive value for one prognostic factor was 1.2%, for two 43%, for three 72.5%, for four or more 91.4%.Based on our data preoperative ERCP is highly recommended in patients with three or more positive factors (high risk patients). In contrast, ERCP is not indicated in patients with zero or one factor (low risk patients). Preoperative ERCP should be offered to patients with two positive factors (moderate risk patients), however the practice should also be based on the local conditions (e.g. skill of the endoscopist, other diagnostic tools).Endoscopic sphincterotomy in 100 patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: ultrasound evaluation.The aim of the study was to determine to what extent ultrasonography may monitor the process of sphincterotomy and its effectiveness. The study also aimed at determining the sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detecting choledocholithiasis, in comparison with the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Between January 1995 and June 2001, endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed on 100 patients with suspected synchronous choledocholithiasis in preparation for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The main parameters evaluated in the ultrasonography image included the breadth of the common bile duct and absence or presence of concrements in bile ducts before and after sphincterotomy.Applied before the endoscopic operation, ultrasonography revealed choledocholithiasis in 58 patients and dilatation of the common bile duct in 95 patients. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography confirmed choledocholithiasis in 74 patients, after sphincterotomy concrements were removed in 63 persons. In 26 patients sphincterotomy was performed for stenosis of Vater's papilla. Patients with the breadth of the duct > 10 mm, were referred to a check-up examination.Compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography correctly specifies the breadth of the bile duct and properly monitors the process of endoscopic sphincterotomy, but is less accurate in determining the occurrence of choledocholithiasis, and sensitivity in the test amounted to 73%, and specificity of the examination--84.5%.Prospective evaluation of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in patients with biliary disease: comparative study with conventional ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography diagnostic algorithm.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is an accurate technique that can replace invasive diagnostic methods of the biliary and pancreatic duct.Our aim was to assess sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasonography using the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography as reference, and to establish a diagnostic algorithm under which circumstances magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography can replace endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Eighty-three patients with suspicion of biliary disease based on clinical, biochemical and ultrasonography findings were studied.Ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were performed, comparing the results of the techniques for the determination of their sensitivity and specificity.Sensitivity and specificity results obtained by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography were: 100 and 92.8% when dilated ducts were detected (n=61); 97.4 and 97.2% in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis (n=38); 100 and 96.7% in malignant lesions (n=14) and 81.8 and 98.4% when biliary ducts were normal. The percentage of images of diagnostic quality was 97.6%. Sensitivity and specificity achieved by ultrasonography was: 100 and 57.1% in detection of dilatation, 71 and 97.2% in choledocholithiasis, 92.8 and 96.7% in malignancy and 66.6 and 96.8% in normal ducts.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is a technique with high sensitivity and specificity in the evaluation of biliary ducts. Thus, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography may replace diagnostic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for purely diagnostic purposes, following an initial clinical and ultrasonographic exam.Routine preoperative laboratory analyses are unnecessary before elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy.We formulated a clinical pathway (CP) for elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC), which included the following preoperative evaluation: history and physical (H&P), right upper quadrant ultrasound (US), and liver function tests (LFTs). We hypothesized that routine LFTs did not alter management beyond that dictated by H&P and US, and could be excluded from the CP.The study involved 387 consecutive patients undergoing elective LC. Abnormalities in the preoperative evaluation were compared with the finding of choledocholithiasis or other unexpected outcomes.In 187 (48%) patients, abnormalities were found by H&P (n = 7), US (n = 13), and LFTs (n = 177). Seven patients (2%) had documented choledocholithiasis; two had abnormal H & P; three had abnormal US; and four had abnormal LFTs. No patient with choledocholithiasis had abnormal LFTs but normal H&P and US.Routine LFTs before elective LC are not cost effective. Before LC H&P and US are warranted, but LFTs do not add any useful information and should not be routinely measured.Rapid diagnosis of choledocholithiasis using biochemical tests in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The present study was designed to identify the biochemical tests which could detect the presence of common bile duct stones in patients with symptomatic gallstones, without other invasive investigations. The usefulness of biochemical tests may reduce the necessity of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy.3000 patients with symptomatic laparoscopic cholecystectomy scheduled for laparoscopic cholesystectomy were included in the study. 458 patients (201 men, 257 women; mean age, 57.7 +/- 14.6 yrs) were examined with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for suspected common bile duct stones. The serum tests for liver function, including a measurement of aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase, alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, direct bilirubin, gamma-glutamyltransferase and albumin were obtained on admission prior to the ultrasonography, and the endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The six significant factors, including alkaline phosphatase, direct bilirubin, total bilirubin, aspartate aminotransferase, alanine aminotransferase and gamma-glutamyltransferase were identified by the univariate analysis and the multivariate logistic regression analysis which identified alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyltransferase, as the two significant independent factors. A statistical model was developed with a formula of [formula: see text] A curve of receiver operating characteristics was constructed to identify an alkaline phosphatase level greater than 300 U/L or a gamma-glutamyltransferase level greater than 420 mU/mL which would have both higher sensitivity and specificity.Biochemical tests can be a significant aid to the clinician's decision-making when predicting the presence of common bile duct stones in patients with gallstones.Evaluation of the predictors of choledocholithiasis: comparative analysis of clinical, biochemical, radiological, radionuclear, and intraoperative parameters.This prospective study was performed to assess the predictive ability of the various indicators of common bile duct (CBD) calculi, individually or in combination, by analyzing 88 patients with gallstone disease. The patients were classified into two groups according to the presence of 10 predefined criteria. Of 53 patients with one or more risk factors (group 2), 26 harbored CBD calculi; none of 35 patients with no risk factors (group 1) had CBD stones. Jaundice correlated best, with a sensitivity of 69%; and pancreatitis had the lowest sensitivity (12%). Elevated serum bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels correlated better than liver enzymes and serum amylase. The sensitivity and negative predictive value of cholescintigraphy scanning for diagnosing CBD calculi were better than those of ultrasonography, the sensitivity being 84% versus 50% and the negative predictive value 95% versus 82%. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography was successful in 94% of the patients, and CBD calculi were diagnosed in 74%. Moreover, peroperative cholangiography was 100% sensitive with no false-positive results. Ultimately, a palpable stone at surgery was the best predictor. When all the criteria were analyzed, it was found that as the number of criteria increased so did the percentage of patients harboring CBD calculi.The role of serum liver enzymes in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.The introduction of laparoscopic cholecystectomy has increased the need for preoperative diagnosis of common bile duct stones. The purpose of this study is to verify the sensitivity of the liver function tests in the detection of duct stones.We evaluated 438 patients (223 retrospectively and 215 prospectively) who underwent endoscopic papillotomy for bile duct stones in two different services. In every case, blood samples for liver function tests levels were collected prior to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.The most sensitive test was gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, that was abnormal in 92.2% of the cases. Alkaline phosphatase was elevated in 74.7% of the patients with choledocholithiasis. The least sensitive parameter was AST, altered in only 50.8% of times. The sensitivity of all liver tests for the diagnosis of choledochal stones taken together was 94.3%.Liver function tests are very sensitive in the detection of common bile duct stones, however these blood tests are in the normal range of about 5% of endoscopically treated patients.Detection of choledocholithiasis: comparison of unenhanced spiral CT, US, and ERCP.ERCP is an established method for the diagnosis and treatment of common bile duct stones, however, it is invasive, time-consuming, and expensive. The purpose of this study was to determine whether unenhanced spiral CT and US, compared with ERCP, have sufficient sensitivity and negative predictive value to be useful screening techniques in patients suspected of having choledocholithiasis.Over a period of 2 years, 82 patients with clinically suspected choledocholithiasis underwent unenhanced spiral computed tomography and US immediately before undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. CT/US scans and ERCP images were evaluated for the presence of bile duct stones, ampullary stones, and extrahepatic biliary dilatation.Unenhanced spiral computed tomography (US) depicted common bile duct stones in 24 (23) of 28 patients found to have stones at endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Five patients had stones impacted at the ampulla, all (two) of which were detected with CT (US). Computed tomography (US) had a sensitivity of 86% (82%) and a specificity of 98% (98%) in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.Both unenhanced spiral CT and US are useful for evaluating suspected common bile duct stones. Unenhanced spiral CT is especially useful when the patient is likely to have ampullary stones and is a safe, more available and less expensive alternative to magnetic resonance cholangiography.Preoperative abdominal ultrasound may be misleading in risk stratification for presence of common bile duct abnormalities.Following the advent of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC), the preoperative predictors of common bile duct (CBD) abnormalities became more important in perioperative decision making. Preoperative transabdominal ultrasound (US) is used to assess the preoperative risks associated with CBD abnormalities. This study attempts to determine the sensitivity and specificity of US in determining CBD abnormalities in patients prior to LC.US measurements of the CBD diameter and presence of stones were ascertained from radiology reports in 100 patients who had LC with a routine intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC). The same information was obtained from the patients' IOC. A supraduodenal CBD diameter of >8 mm was considered dilated.US demonstrated a sensitivity of 25% and a specificity of 70% for the detection of CBD dilatation compared to IOC. The sensitivity of US for predicting CBD dilatation was 55% when the IOC-derived diameter was >10 mm and 100% when it was >15 mm. The overall sensitivity of US for detection of stones was 10%; it improved to 17% in patients with a dilated CBD on US.Preoperative ultrasound is neither sensitive nor specific for detecting CBD dilatation or presence of stones. A negative preoperative US report may be misleading in risk stratification for the presence of these CBD abnormalities. In order to avoid missing any CBD pathology, we recommend the routine use of intraoperative cholangiography.Role of selective intra-operative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The use of routine intra-operative cholangiography (IOC) remains controversial. This prospective study was carried out to determine whether to perform selective or routine IOC in patients undergoing cholecystectomy for gallstones.All consecutive patients undergoing open cholecystectomy over a 16-month period were included in the present study. They were divided into two groups based on the absence (n = 79) or presence (n = 55) of indicators of choledocholithiasis. All patients were subjected to cholangiography. Each indicator, subsets of indicators and all indicators combined were evaluated for their ability to predict choledocholithiasis.There would be only two missed stones (1.5%) if selective cholangiography was to be practised. Intra-operative cholangiography had a positive predictive value of 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of all the indicators combined were 93.5%, 84.6%, 74.5%, 97.5% and 88.0%, respectively. The best indicators in each subset were jaundice, common bile duct diameter as assessed by ultrasonography, and a palpable stone during surgery with NPV of 82.7%, 91.1% and 96.8%, respectively.Routine IOC during cholecystectomy is not essential for the prevention of retained stones. A combination of the various indicators of choledocholithiasis can be used to select patients for cholangiography.Diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasound compared with direct cholangiography in the detection of choledocholithiasis.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and trans-abdominal ultrasound in the detection of choledocholithiasis, and to compare bile duct stone characteristics using endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), MRCP and ultrasound.Of 191 consecutive patients referred for diagnostic ERCP, choledocholithiasis was diagnosed in 34 patients using direct cholangiography. The latter took the form of ERCP (n = 29), intraoperative cholangiography (n = 3) or percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (n = 2). All patients underwent MRCP and ultrasound examinations and their findings for choledocholitiasis were compared with those at direct cholangiography. Finally, in the 29 patients with choledocholithiasis diagnosed under ERCP, stone characteristics were compared across the three investigations of ERCP, MRCP and ultrasound.Compared with direct cholangiography, MRCP showed a sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of 91%, 98% and 97%, respectively, in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. MRCP resulted in three false-negative and three false-positive findings, four of which occurred due to confusion with lesions at the ampulla. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity, specificity and diagnostic accuracy of 38%, 100% and 89%, respectively, in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. ERCP revealed a greater number of stones and these were more proximally distributed within the bile ducts when compared to MRCP.MRCP is highly accurate in the diagnosis of choloedocholithiasis and has the potential to replace diagnostic ERCP. MRCP underestimates the number of bile duct stones present.[The role of intravenous cholangiography in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy: is there a renaissance?].The preoperative investigation for choledocholithiasis in patients undergoing elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy is still a matter of debate.In a prospective clinical trial the accuracy of intravenous cholangiography (IVC), ultrasonography and liver function tests in the preoperative diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was assessed in 98 patients undergoing elective cholecystectomy. Only patients with uncomplicated cholecystolithiasis considered to be at low risk for having bile duct stones were investigated. A 2-year follow-up clinical survey (mean) was performed in 92 of the 98 patients to investigate the occurrence of postoperative choledocholithiasis (gold standard: clinically manifest choledocholithiasis).In this patient cohort the incidence of choledocholithiasis was found to be 5.1%. Among the three diagnostic tests IVC proved to be more accurate with higher sensitivity and a better positive predictive value than ultrasonography and liver function tests. The sensitivity for IVC was 100% compared to 20% for ultrasonography and 40% for liver function tests, respectively. The positive predictive value for IVC was 83.3% in comparison to 20% for ultrasonography and 25% for liver function tests. Mild side effects caused by intravenous contrast media were observed in 2.0%. During a mean postoperative follow-up of 2 years no clinically manifest and initially overlooked choledocholithiasis could be detected in the 92 investigated patients.IVC is a reliable method to detect unsuspected common bile duct stones and should be used in the preoperative diagnosis prior to elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy. IVC may play a role in decreasing the rate of preoperative ERCP or intraoperative cholangiography in these patients.Proposed criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There has been a dramatic increase in the number of endoscopic retrograde cholangiograms (ERC) performed on patients who are candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The majority of these procedures result in normal findings. This study is an attempt to determine useful clinical criteria and strategy for predicting the presence or absence of common bile duct stones (CBDS) and the need for ERC in patients who are candidates for LC.The observational portion of this study explored laboratory and ultrasound data from 134 consecutive patients who had undergone preoperative ERC, followed by LC, over a 4-year period. The data were then analyzed by multivariate logistic regression to determine the best models for predicting the presence or absence of stones in the common bile duct. Models using gamma glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT), alkaline phophatase (AP), common bile duct diameter (CBDIA), and amylase (AMY) were then evaluated retrospectively in 36 additional patients (validation group).A model based on GGT and common bile duct diameter as positive predictors and amylase as a negative predictor correctly classified 78% of the patients in the validation group. This model resulted in a negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), sensitivity, and specificity of 0.88, 0.68, 0.87, and 0.71, respectively. The model utilizing AP was almost as effective. This model resulted in a NPV, PPV, sensitivity, and specificity of 0.83, 0.67, 0.80, and 0.71, respectively.Although a number of laboratory values and imaging techniques correlate with the presence or absence of CBDS, our study confirms that individually they have poor predictive value. Our data and models suggest that elevated serum amylase is a negative predictor for CBDS. Elevated GGT and/or AP with widened CBDIA and normal AMY strongly suggest the presence of CBDS and the need for preoperative ERC. Elevated GGT, AP, or widened CBDIA with elevated amylase, in the absence of clinical pancreatitis, may suggest that small stones have passed through the ampulla of Vater and that the CBD is generally cleared of stones.Relative merits of ultrasonography, computed tomography and cholangiography in patients of surgical obstructive jaundice.Fifty consecutive patients with surgical obstructive jaundice were evaluated prospectively with ultrasonography (US), computed tomographic scans (CT scan) and cholangiography-percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (PTC) or endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreaticography (ERCP). The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasound in defining the level of obstruction was 86% as compared to 86% and 94.8% for CT scan and cholangiography, respectively. To measure the etiology of the obstruction, the accuracy of ultrasound, CT scan and cholangiography were 84%, 86% and 75%, respectively. The sensitivity of CT scans and cholangiography in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was 100%, 81.8% and 90%, respectively, whereas specificity was 97%, 100% and 100%, respectively. Sensitivity for a diagnosis of malignant disease was 100% for both US and CT scans whereas specificity was 90% and 81%, respectively. Ultrasonography as a single radiological investigation is sufficient in the evaluation of the majority of patients with surgical obstructive jaundice. CT scan and cholangiography should be done only when US gives equivocal findings or if concomitant therapeutic procedures like basketing and stenting are also planned.Factors predictive of bile duct stones in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis.The objective of the study was to investigate the accuracy of using preoperative data for the prediction of bile duct calculi in patients operated on for acute cholecystitis. 279 consecutive patients underwent cholecystectomy with peroperative cholangiography for acute calculous cholecystitis in the Department of Surgery, Lund University Hospital, between 1985 and 1991. The correlation between 13 preoperative clinical and laboratory variables, and the incidence of bile duct calculi was studied. Among the 13 variables tested, serum bilirubin concentration and serum gamma-glutamyltransferase activity were independent factors of predictive significance. These two factors were used for constructing an additive prognostic index for the presence of bile duct stones. Thus, three groups of patients could be identified having a 3, 7-9 or 59% risk of harboring bile duct stones, corresponding to a sensitivity of 61% and a specificity of 93% in predicting the presence of bile duct stones in the 'high-risk' group. Logistic regression analysis permits accurate preoperative identification of bile duct stones in patients with acute calculous cholecystitis.A prospective experience with selective cholangiography.A prospective study of patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis was undertaken to determine the effectiveness of identifying clinically significant choledocholithiasis with selective cholangiography. Between 1991 and 1995, 262 patients presented to the senior author (K.W.M.) with acute or chronic cholecystitis. Sixteen patients had a preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) for an elevated alkaline phosphatase or total bilirubin greater than twice the normal value or an ultrasound finding suspecting choledocholithiasis. Ten of the ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis, with eight patients having successful clearance by ERCP. Ninety other patients had intraoperative cholangiography for abnormal serum liver biochemistries, a history of jaundice or pancreatitis, or a dilated common bile duct (CBD) (>6 mm) on ultrasound. Fourteen of the intraoperative cholangiography patients and the two remaining ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis requiring CBD exploration for clearance of their stones. There were no false-positive cholangiograms, and there were no bile duct injuries in this series. With 100 per cent follow-up of at least 2 years, only one patient required ERCP clearance of a retained CBD stone 13 months after cholecystectomy. The positive predictive value and the negative predictive value for the selective cholangiography criteria are 23 per cent and 99 per cent, respectively. In conclusion, clinically significant choledocholithiasis can be found effectively with selective cholangiography. Also, utilizing selective cholangiography reduces the number of routine cholangiograms by 60 per cent.Gallstone pancreatitis: a prospective study on the incidence of cholangitis and clinical predictors of retained common bile duct stones.The aim of this study was to define the incidence of cholangitis in gallstone pancreatitis, in the absence of cholangitis, to identify the clinical predictors of persistent common bile duct (CBD) stones at endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP) or at intraoperative cholangiography (IOC).A total of 122 consecutive patients with acute gallstone pancreatitis were prospectively evaluated for the presence of CBD stones as determined by elective ERCP or IOC. Urgent ERCP was restricted to patients with concomitant cholangitis. APACHE II scores and serial laboratory data were obtained.Four (3%) patients had cholangitis and all underwent urgent ERCP successfully. Eighteen (15%) patients without cholangiogram were excluded. The remaining 100 patients underwent elective ERCP or IOC on a mean of hospital day 6.8. Twenty-one (21%) patients had persistent CBD stones. Univariate analysis detected significant differences in serum total bilirubin, ALT, and alkaline phosphatase levels between patients with and without persistent CBD stones. On multivariate analysis, serum total bilirubin on hospital day 2 was the best predictor of CBD stones. A serum total bilirubin level > 1.35 mg/dl had a sensitivity of 90.5% and specificity of 63%. Age, gender, mean APACHE II score, amylase, and presence of CBD dilation on ultrasound were not predictive of CBD stones.In patients with gallstone pancreatitis, 1) cholangitis is uncommon, and 2) the best clinical predictor of persistent CBD stones is serum total bilirubin on hospital day 2.Prediction of common bile duct stones prior to cholecystectomy: a prospective validation of a discriminant analysis function.Selection routines for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients with symptomatic gallstone disease should give a low frequency of both false-negative ERCP results and residual common bile duct stones (CBDS).To validate a discriminant function (DF) based on retrospectively collected data, for characterization of patients with symptomatic gallstone disease as regards presence of CBDS, and to compare clinical, ultrasonographic, and DF characterization.Prospective registration of CBDS criteria in consecutive patients with symptomatic gallstone disease.A department of surgical gastroenterology in a Norwegian central hospital.One hundred ninety-two patients with gallbladder stones.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy or ERCP with or without endoscopic sphincterotomy.Sensitivity and specificity of the clinical, ultrasonographic, and DF characterizations, and test of the validity of the DF.Thirty-two patients had CBDS. The clinical criteria of CBDS were present in 152 patients (79.2%): 21.1% of these patients had CBDS and there were no false-negative results (sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 25%). The risk of CBDS in patients with normal bile ducts at ultrasonographic examination was 8 of 124, and in patients with dilated ducts or suspected CBDS, 17 of 47 (sensitivity, 68%; specificity, 80%). The DF was positive in 50 patients (26%): 60% of these had CBDS, and there were 2 false-negative results (sensitivity, 94%; specificity, 88%). A discriminant analysis of the prospectively registered data selected the same set of CBDS criteria, and a new DF did not alter the characterization of any patient.Clinical characterization had a higher sensitivity for CBDS detection than ultrasonography alone, but a lower specificity. The DF analysis was both more sensitive and specific than ultrasonography, and seemed efficient in selecting symptomatic gallstone patients for ERCP. It was reproducible and simple to use.Abnormal common bile duct sonography. The best predictor of choledocholithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.We conducted a prospective study to determine the most reliable indicator of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. One hundred thirty-seven patients were referred for endoscopic retrograde cholangiography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy for suspected choledocholithiasis due to one or more of the following abnormalities: (a) altered liver function tests, (b) increased serum amylase levels, or (c) a dilated common bile duct (> 7 mm) with or without evidence of stones on sonography. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and the likelihood of the presence or absence of morbidity were calculated for 25 different variables. Common bile duct stones were detected in 63 (46%) patients. Abnormal result of sonography of the common bile duct was the best predictor of choledocholithiasis (p < 0.0001). Abnormalities of the combined liver function tests were statistically significant predictors only when combined with abnormal sonographic results. Improving liver function tests before endoscopy had a significant negative predictive value (p = 0.01). Stepwise logistic regression analysis showed that abnormal ultrasound and the presence of common bile duct stones on ultrasound were significant (p = 0.009 and p = 0.049, respectively). Abnormal result of sonography of the common bile duct is the best predictor of choledocholithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prospective evaluation of the diagnostic work-up before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prerequisite for successful laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the exclusion of potential risks such as cholangiolithiasis or anatomical malformations. As there is no general agreement regarding the appropriate preoperative diagnostic work-up, a comparative study of different diagnostic methods was carried out.In 180 consecutive patients admitted to a community hospital for cholecystectomy due to symptomatic cholecystolithiasis, a prospective comparison was carried out of the diagnostic accuracy of patient history, physical examination, laboratory tests, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, intravenous cholangiography, ultrasonography, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Measurement of the diameter of the common bile duct was found to be a reliable method as a single noninvasive parameter for diagnosing cholangiolithiasis (sensitivity 100%, specificity 93%), with good predictive power (positive predictive value 0.7, negative predictive value 1.0). The best accuracy achieved noninvasively and without sonography was with a combination of positive patient history and gamma-glutamyl transferase findings (sensitivity 58%, specificity 84%, positive predictive value 0.37, negative predictive value 0.93). ERCP detected additional cholangiolithiasis in 19 of 139 patients (13.7%) and anatomical malformations in three patients. In all 19 patients, the bile ducts were cleared of stones endoscopically within 24 hours, prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Among the 163 patients primarily assigned to laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the protocol diagnostic work-up, including ERCP, allocated three patients (1.8%) to open surgery. Conversion from laparoscopic cholecystectomy to open cholecystectomy occurred in a further two of 158 patients (1.3%).These results show that routine ultrasonography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be recommended in order to determine the diameter of the common bile duct. In patients with a ductal diameter of more than 6 mm, ERCP should be performed. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be carried out within 24 hours after ERCP and papillotomy.Reliability of ultrasounds in detecting common bile duct stones before biliary surgery. A retrospective analysis.The aim of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic benefit of US in the preoperative screening for CBD stones in patients submitted to surgery for biliary lithiasis.We analyzed the data of 135 patients admitted for biliary lithiasis, jaundice or biliary pancreatitis in the last three years. Mean age was 63 years (54.8% females), 48% of the cases had an urgent admission. US of the liver and biliary ducts was the first examination performed and the patients were divided in 2 groups on the bases of the results: those with the diameter of the CBD < 1 cm (101 pts-group A) and those with a diameter > 1 cm (34 pts-group B).In group A were subsequently performed: 35 IV cholangiographies (6 showed CBD stones, 1 was a false negative for CBD stones), 15 intraoperative (I.O.) cholangiographies (1 positive for CBD stones), 9 ERCP for jaundice or pancreatitis (2 positive for CBD stones). The incidence of CBD stones was 8.9% in this group. In group B were performed: 7 IV cholangiographies (2 showed CBD stones), 12 I.O. cholangiographies (6 showed CBD stones), 10 ERCP for jaundice or pancreatitis (7 showed CBD stones). The incidence of CBD stones was 44% in this group. CBD stones were detected by US in 2 cases (22%) in group A and in 6 cases (40%) in group B.In our patients there is a relatively high incidence of CBD stones (8.9%) in spite of a normal CBD at US. Considering that the minimally invasive approach for the gallbladder stones is becoming the "gold standard" and the laparoscopic treatment of the CBD stones is not widely diffused, it is important to know the presence of CBD stones before surgery. With this in mind US does not seem to be a reliable diagnostic tool and we suggest that before surgery an IV cholangiography (sensitivity > 95% in our experience) should be performed together with US and ERCP in selected cases. Moreover this could reduce the number of preoperative ERCP leaving the possibility to treat more selectively by endoscopic papillosphincterotomy the patients with CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Evaluation of the pattern of liver tests and yield of cholangiography in symptomatic choledocholithiasis: a prospective study.The role of ERCP in the management of choledocholithiasis in an era of minimally invasive therapy continues to be defined.We evaluated prospectively the pattern of liver test abnormalities and yield of cholangiography after presentation with illnesses suggesting choledocholithiasis. Ninety-four consecutive patients, all with liver test abnormalities (total bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, AST, and ALT) at presentation, had serial determinations to within 24 hours of cholangiography and were divided into four groups based on their patterns of rise or fall of liver test results as well as presenting clinical syndrome. Group I: normalized liver tests; Group II: falling liver tests, and alkaline phosphatase falling greater than 50% of the difference between presentation value and upper limit of normal; Group III: alkaline phosphatase falling less than 50%; and Group IV: any liver test with increasing levels. Clinical syndromes included cholangitis, pancreatitis, combined cholangitis and pancreatitis, and biliary pain with abnormal liver tests.Yields of choledocholithiasis were 13% (Group I), 50% (Group II), 67% (Group III), and 94% (Group IV). Yield by syndromes were 36% (biliary pancreatitis), 72% (biliary pain and abnormal liver tests), 87% (cholangitis), and 100% (cholangitis and pancreatitis).The degree of decline in liver test levels is inversely related to the yield of cholangiography in symptomatic choledocholithiasis; the yield of ERCP in these patients (with normalized liver tests) is low and they do not require ERCP. Pre-ERCP estimates of the likelihood of choledocholithiasis can be made on the basis of the pattern of liver tests, and biliary pancreatitis patients with normalized liver tests do not require ERCP.Endoscopic ultrasonography for diagnosing choledocholithiasis: a prospective comparative study with ultrasonography and computed tomography.We assessed the diagnostic usefulness of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) for choledocholithiasis.A prospective series of 155 patients with suspected choledocholithiasis all underwent EUS, conventional ultrasonography, CT, and ERCP. In 142 patients with a clear cholangiogram on ERCP, we analyzed the capability of EUS to image the extrahepatic bile duct and to identify choledocholithiasis, compared with ultrasonography and CT.No complications were encountered in performing EUS. In 51 patients, ERCP demonstrated bile duct stones, which were confirmed at endoscopic sphincterotomy or surgery. The extrahepatic bile duct was wholly displayed in 96% by EUS, in 60% by ultrasonography, and in 80% by CT. EUS (96%) was more sensitive than ultrasonography (63%) and CT (71%) for detecting choledocholithiasis (p < 0.001). Although ultrasonography and CT were poorly diagnostic for choledocholithiasis in patients with small stones or those with a nondilated common bile duct, EUS was able to accurately detect choledocholithiasis regardless of the size of stones or the diameter of the bile duct. The specificity of EUS (100%) was higher than those of ultrasonography (95%) and CT (97%).EUS, a safe imaging procedure, is more accurate than ultrasonography and CT and may be as accurate as ERCP for diagnosing choledocholithiasis.Diagnosis of common bile duct stones by intravenous cholangiography: prediction by ultrasound and liver function tests compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography.Routine intravenous cholangiography using the safer contrast medium, meglumine iotroxate, may be a useful investigation prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for the detection of suspected common bile duct stones. We compared this with endoscopic cholangiography.Eighty-one consecutive nonjaundiced patients (mean age 62 years; range 20 to 90) with suspected common bile duct stones referred for endoscopic cholangiography to one center underwent intravenous cholangiography that was considered positive if it detected ductal stones. The ability of ultrasound scans and liver function tests to predict ductal stones was also assessed.Sixty patients had both endoscopic and intravenous cholangiograms performed. Thirteen out of 27 patients with ductal stones confirmed by endoscopic cholangiography had positive intravenous cholangiograms, and 29 out of 30 with no stones had negative intravenous cholangiograms. The sensitivity for intravenous cholangiography was 48%, specificity 97%, positive predictive value 93%, negative predictive value 67%, and accuracy 73%. For ultrasound scans the positive predictive value was 69%; negative predictive value was 78%. For liver function tests the positive predictive value was 68%; negative predictive value was 93%.Intravenous cholangiography cannot be recommended instead of endoscopic cholangiography except in situations where the latter is not readily available. Ultrasound and liver function tests are useful in predicting ductal stones.Selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and preoperative bile duct stone removal in patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective study.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) has become the treatment of choice for patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis. About 10% of patients with symptomatic gallstones may bear associated common bile duct (CBD) stones. The preferred approach to these patients is the removal of CBD stones by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP) before LC. However, ERCP before LC should be performed only in patients with suspected choledocholithiasis. The aims of this study were to: 1) generate an efficacious predictive model for selecting patients with suspected choledocholithiasis to submit to preoperative ERCP, and 2) test the safety of the endoscopic/laparoscopic procedure.Historical, biochemical, and ultrasonographic data were collected prospectively. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis was adopted for determining optimal biochemical and ultrasonographic cut-off values. Multivariate analysis using logistic regression with generation of the best model identifying independent predictors of CBD stones was also employed.The optimal model predicted a 95% probability of CBD stones in a patient who presented with elevated ALP (over 300 IU/L) and ALT (over 40 IU/L) levels and CBD dilation > 8 mm at ultrasonography. Endoscopic removal of CBD stones was achieved in 95% of patients, with minimal morbidity and no mortality.The identified independent predictors of CBD stones are highly efficient selectors of patients with choledocholithiasis. Moreover, endoscopic removal of CBD stones before LC is a safe and efficacious procedure.Predicting the presence of choledocholithiasis in patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis.Accurate preoperative prediction of choledocholithiasis is essential in order to minimize patient risk and curtail health care expenditures. This study was designed to identify independent risk factors for choledocholithiasis in patients who had undergone cholecystectomy for symptomatic cholelithiasis and to develop a predictive model based on those factors.The charts of 1264 consecutive patients who had undergone cholecystectomy at one of three North Carolina hospitals between January 1, 1989 and December 31, 1991 were reviewed; 465 of these patients had confirmed presence or absence of choledocholithiasis by cholangiography and/or common bile duct exploration and were eligible for analysis. Candidate predictor variables included age and maximum preoperative values for each of the following: temperature, alkaline phosphatase, bilirubin, AST, amylase, white blood cell count, and common bile duct diameter. Model development and validation were conducted using standard data-splitting (60% "training," 40% "test") and logistic regression techniques.Choledocholithiasis was confirmed in 115 (25%) of the 465 eligible patients. Univariate analysis identified bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, temperature, alkaline phosphatase, and age as predictors. Multivariable analysis subsequently identified bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, alkaline phosphatase, and age as independent predictors of choledocholithiasis. A final model containing these variables (except age, whose contribution to the model was small) accurately predicted choledocholithiasis (c-index = 0.76).Accurate estimates of choledocholithiasis risk can be made using maximum preoperative bilirubin, common bile duct diameter, AST, and alkaline phosphatase values. Use of the model may help physicians select those patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis who would most likely benefit from further investigation to exclude choledocholithiasis.Selection criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the laparoscopic era.Indicators for cholangiography were originally designed to select patients at risk for common bile duct (CBD) stones for intraoperative cholangiography.To refine these criteria to apply to the much more invasive procedure of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Retrospective review of selection criteria for ERCP in consecutive patients referred over 18 months following the introduction of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Two ERCP units in adjacent teaching hospitals.Three hundred seventeen patients with gallstones and in situ gallbladders.Common bile duct imaging at ERCP.Abnormalities justifying ERCP.Abnormalities justifying ERCP were found in 66% of patients. This group differed significantly from those with normal ducts, with more being referred with abnormal results of all liver function tests (P < .001), jaundice (P < = .001), a dilated CBD on ultrasound (P < .001), or CBD stones on ultrasound (P < .001). On the other hand, patients with normal ducts were significantly more likely to have been referred with pancreatitis (P = .003) or elevated results of individual liver function tests (P < .001). A logistic regression model using age, presence of jaundice at ERCP, levels of alkaline phosphatase and albumin, and ultrasonography showing dilated ducts or visible CBD stones was found to have a specificity of 75% and a sensitivity of 89%. Past pancreatitis or elevated results of individual liver function tests were not predictive factors.The use of such a model rather than individual criteria would improve the selection of patients for preoperative ERCP, optimizing its role in the laparoscopic era.Prospective evaluation of ultrasonography and liver function tests for preoperative assessment of the bile duct.Current means of predicting the presence of bile duct stones are sensitive but produce a large number of false-positive results, potentially leading to added morbidity from unnecessary invasive investigation. This study prospectively assessed 545 patients with gallbladder stones, including 55 patients with bile duct stones, to refine criteria for further investigation of the bile duct. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were calculated for bile duct dilatation (diameter abnormal if larger than 5 mm below age 50 years, normal value increasing by 1 mm per decade) and elevation of three liver function tests, singly or in combination. Depending on the number of abnormalities used the sensitivity ranged from 46 to 96 per cent and the positive predictive value from 35 to 77 per cent. All groupings gave at least 96 per cent negative predictive value for the absence of stones but none combined both high sensitivity and positive predictive value. The specificity was improved if the tests were done on the working day before operation. Refining criteria for predicting bile duct stones allows the selective use of cholangiography and may reduce the number of negative cholangiograms.Yield of prospective, noninvasive evaluation of the common bile duct combined with selective ERCP/sphincterotomy in 1390 consecutive laparoscopic cholecystectomy patients.The role of noninvasive evaluation of the common bile duct combined with selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy was prospectively evaluated in 1390 consecutive patients subjected to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Preoperative common bile duct testing included liver chemistries, transcutaneous ultrasonography, and intravenous cholangiography. When indicated by various sets of abnormal studies, prelaparoscopic endoscopic retrograde cholangiography was attempted in 129 patients (9.3%) and successfully accomplished in 122 (94.6%). Seventy-six patients (62.3%) had duct stones or a papillary stenosis, and 73 of them (96%) were treated successfully by endoscopic duct clearance and subsequent laparoscopic cholecystectomy. No deaths occurred, and the morbidity rate was 6.2% (8/129), including 2 cases of pancreatitis and 1 case of a retained duct stone after sphincterotomy. Predicting the presence of common duct pathology was 60% accurate when based on abnormal laboratory test results alone, 69% when based on abnormal laboratory test results and concomitant radiologic abnormalities, and 42% when based on radiologic criteria alone (p < .05). We conclude that patients with altered serum liver chemistries with or without concomitant positive radiologic criteria should undergo endoscopic cholangiography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. However, in patients with radiologic duct dilatation as the sole indicator for duct stones, the frequency of normal findings in endoscopic examinations is high. This latter group is probably better managed with intraoperative cholangiography and postlaparoscopic sphincterotomy if needed.Preoperative assessment of choledocholithiasis in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In order to determine the predictive value of noninvasive investigations for choledocholithiasis, we conducted a prospective preoperative study on 82 patients with symptomatic gallstones who received laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Ultrasonography (US), liver function tests and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) were routinely performed in all cases prior to operation. The results showed a strong correlation between noninvasive procedures (liver function tests and US) and the presence of choledocholithiasis as shown by ERC. Using ERC as a reference, the sensitivity and selectivity of ductal dilatation at US and the elevation of alkaline phosphatase (ALP), gamma-glutamyltransferase and total bilirubin in the serum were studied for the detection of common bile duct (CBD) stones. The values of the combination of these tests were also calculated. From receiver operator characteristics curves, the best cut-off point for US in conjunction with ALP was chosen. ERC should be restricted to patients with possible CBD stones, suspected after a combination of the noninvasive US and ALP tests. This study emphasized the necessity and timing of performing ERC as a preoperative modality in the detection of choledocholithiasis in patients who are to undergo laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Assessment of the common bile duct before cholecystectomy: a direct comparison between ultrasonography and intravenous cholangiography.Sixty-seven consecutive patients undergoing cholecystectomy for symptomatic gallstones were investigated by both ultrasonography (US) and intravenous cholangiography (IVC). This provided the opportunity to compare these methods for assessing the common bile duct (CBD) preoperatively for stones. The results were correlated with a subsequent definitive procedure that formed the diagnostic standard in each case. The CBD diameters of 8 (12%) patients with stones was significantly greater than those without stones (t = 10.96, P < 0.001). Sensitivities of US and IVC were 87.5% and 100% respectively, but there were three unsuccessful IVC investigations that had to be excluded from the calculations. Specificities and overall accuracy of both methods were greater than 95%. The positive and negative predictive value of each test was similar and no difference using McNemar's test was found between US and IVC for providing information relating to CBD stones. Performing both procedures as routine assessment of the CBD is thus unnecessary as US, in conjunction with clinical history and liver biochemistry profile, provide an adequate preoperative screen of the CBD.[The importance of sonography before laparoscopic cholecystectomy].The increasing use of minimally invasive techniques for the treatment of symptomatic cholecystitis requires exact preoperative diagnosis. The significant sonographic findings are stones in the biliary system or indirect evidence of stones, consisting in dilatation of the bile duct to more than 10 mm, as well as free mobility of the abdominal wall to exclude peri-umbilical adhesions. Amongst 100 patients who had laparoscopic cholecystectomies there were 7 with bile ducts wider than 10 mm. In two of these cases calculi could also be demonstrated. ERCP was performed on the remaining five and in 3 of these stones were seen. Peri-umbilical adhesions were seen in 6 Patients, resulting in alternative placing of the incision. The sonographic findings which are of relevance to the surgeon were analysed in these 100 cases. A standardised examination protocol is an important feature for proper patient selection.[Ultrasonography and retrograde transpapillary cholangiopancreatography combined with sphincterotomy in the diagnosis of choledochal lithiasis. Our experience with 87 patients].We retrospectively reviewed the US findings of 87 patients to assess US sensitivity in the detection of choledochal (CBD) stones. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) with endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES) was used as the diagnostic standard, except for 1 patient who underwent surgical exploration. First, the distal CBD was studied with transverse and parasagittal US scans through the head and uncinate portions of the pancreas. CBD stones usually appeared as hyperechoic lesions, most of them with acoustic shadowing. In some cases, the stone moves during real-time scanning, which further confirms the diagnosis. Fifty-four of 87 patients had CBD stones and US detected them in 46 cases. The absence of a stone was diagnosed correctly in 28 of 33 patients. In our series, US sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 85%, positive predictive value 88% and negative predictive value 78%. If the distal duct cannot be demonstrated adequately or if duct size is normal, US sensitivity in detecting stones decreases and other examinations, such as ERCP, should be performed. We conclude that US can be used as the diagnostic method of choice to examine the patients with suspected biliary tract disease. Although ERCP is the gold standard for diagnosis and therapeutic purposes in choledochal stones, it remains an invasive technique and must therefore be held in reserve.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy: laboratory predictors of choledocholithiasis.Liver function tests (LFTs) are most often employed to select patients for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and therapeutic sphincterotomy. Although ERC accurately detects CBD stones, the associated financial costs and potential morbidity argue against its indiscriminate use. We analyzed the value of LFTs to predict CBD stones in patients treated by laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). CBD stones were identified in 41 of 660 patients (6.2%) treated by LC during the study period (January 1991 to May 1993). CBD stones were identified by preoperative ERC in 19 of 33 patients (57.6%); by operative cholangiography in 18 of 289 patients (6.2%), and by postoperative ERC in 4 patients. In patients with CBD stones, there was a significant difference in alkaline phosphatase, total bilirubin, SGPT, and SGOT (P < 0.001). The positive predictive value (PPV) of a value > normal at admission was 5%-19%; and immediately before operation was 9%-36%. The PPV of a value > 2X normal was 30%-47%. Alkaline phosphatase and total bilirubin were independent predictors of CBD stones. If both were greater than twice normal, there was a 55 per cent incidence of CBD stones. Our analysis suggests that patients with greater than twice normal liver function tests have a sufficient incidence of CBD stones to warrant ERC. Patients without both these criteria should be managed by laparoscopic CBDE, with postoperative endoscopic stone retrieval for the failures of laparoscopic CBDE.Common bile duct stones after laparoscopic cholecystectomy and its treatment. The role of ultrasound and intravenous and intraoperative cholangiography.In the present work we recount our experience in handling common bile duct stones (CBDS) in our first 100 cases of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. In the first 50 cases our diagnostic procedures involved the use of ultrasound exploration and intravenous cholangiotomography 48 h before laparoscopic surgery. We found three cases of residual CBDS. One of the cases was treated by means of ERCP. The other two cases were resolved by carrying out a transparietohepatic cholangiography after the ERCP procedure failed. After this experience, we changed our strategy, introducing the intraoperative cholangiography in the cases with an unclear diagnosis. With this new approach, no residual CBDS occurred in the following 50 cases. These findings demonstrate the following: (1) In our hands, intravenous cholangiography is not more effective than ultrasound exploration in resolving dubious cases. (2) These dubious cases are more effectively diagnosed by means of selective intraoperative cholangiography. (3) When CBDS is treated by transparietohepatic cholangiography it proves to be less uncomfortable for the patient than ERCP and, as we found, even more efficient in removing the stones, although our experience is based on only two cases.Radiology in laparoscopic cholecystectomy. A retrospective study.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is attempted in all our patients scheduled for cholecystectomy. The related standard radiologic procedures are preoperative ultrasonography (US) and preoperative cholangiography (PCA). In a retrospective study of 214 patients scheduled for LC over a 2-year period we have reviewed the radiologic and clinical records. Preoperative US revealed stones in the common bile duct (CBD) in 8 patients, all treated with endoscopic papillotomy before or after operation. PCA was successful in 176 patients (82%) and gave crucial information in 22 patients including 8 with stones in the CBD not preoperatively diagnosed, 6 with anomalous anatomy, and 8 with malpositioned surgical clip on the cystic duct. In 26 patients LC was converted into open surgery, but in only one case due to CBD stone revealed at PCA. Seventeen patients had minor postoperative complications, all managed conservatively. We consider preoperative US and PCA appropriate radiologic investigations in conjunction with LC.The sensitivity and role of ultrasound in the evaluation of biliary obstruction.Ultrasound is widely advocated as the initial noninvasive imaging study in evaluating suspected biliary obstruction. Some have suggested using ultrasound as the sole diagnostic test before exploratory laparotomy. To evaluate the accuracy of ultrasound in determining the level and etiology of biliary obstruction in patients with biliary dilatation, and to define its role in the evaluation of these patients, we performed a retrospective review of all patients from August 1986 to August 1991 who had biliary dilatation by ultrasound and subsequent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and/or a percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography. Forty-two patients were included in this study, and ultrasound delineated the level of obstruction in 88 per cent, defined the etiology of the obstruction in 48 per cent, and diagnosed choledocholithiasis in 33 per cent of patients with this condition. A literature review revealed that ultrasound has a sensitivity of 71 per cent in delineating the level of obstruction, a sensitivity of 57 per cent in defining the etiology of biliary obstruction, and detects choledocholithiasis in 32 per cent of patients with this condition. We conclude that ultrasound is a highly accurate diagnostic test for delineating the level of biliary obstruction. Ultrasound should be the initial radiographic test in the evaluation of the patient with suspected biliary obstruction to guide further radiographic evaluation.Assessment of the common bile duct before cholecystectomy using ultrasound and biochemical measurements: validation based on follow-up.The selective use of operative cholangiography with cholecystectomy is controversial. We have combined measurement of the serum bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and alanine aminotransferase with ultrasound measurement of the bile duct diameter to assess the common bile duct before cholecystectomy. Direct contrast cholangiography was not performed if the results of these measurements were normal on the day before operation. There were 253 patients assessed in this way before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Patients with known bile duct stones were excluded, but those with a previous history of jaundice, pancreatitis or abnormal liver function tests were included. In 47 cases abnormalities were found and X-ray cholangiograms were performed; only six patients were found to have bile duct stones. Follow-up of all 253 patients, including repeating the preoperative measurements after 12 months in 93, found only two patients with evidence that common duct stones had been missed and these two stones passed spontaneously. No bile duct injuries have occurred. We conclude that preoperative assessment of the bile duct using ultrasound and liver function tests safely obviates the need for 'routine' operative cholangiography.Useful predictors of bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. McGill Gallstone Treatment Group.The authors determined the most useful predictors of common bile duct (CBD) stones as diagnosed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Prospective and retrospective collection of historical, biochemical and ultrasonographic data was used. Receiver operating characteristics curve analysis was used to determine optimal biochemical cut-off values. Multivariate analysis using logistic regression with generation of the best model identifying independent predictors of CBD stones also was employed. Prospective validation of the model was performed on an independent group of patients.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographies were performed before LC in 106 patients, and after LC in 33. Only four of ten clinical variables evaluated independently predicted the presence of CBD stones. The optimal model predicted a 94% probability of CBD stones in a patient older than 55 years of age who presented with an elevated bilirubin (over 30 mumol/L) and positive ultrasound findings (a dilated CBD, and a CBD stone seen on ultrasound). This model was validated prospectively in a subsequent series of 49 patients in which the probability of CBD stone was only 8% when all four predictors were absent.The identified independent clinical predictors of a CBD stone helps select a population of symptomatic gallstone bearers who benefit most from cholangiographic assessment.Common bile duct evaluation in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. 1050 cases later.The authors documented the evolution of common bile duct (CBD) evaluation after the development of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) and CBD exploration. Emphasis was placed on stratification of CBD stone risk so that subgroups could be selected appropriately for no further studies, preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiogram (ERC), or intraoperative intervention.Data were accumulated by the authors on presentation, findings, and outcomes of 1050 patients who underwent cholecystectomies. Risk stratification was based on the history, ultrasound findings, biochemical derangements, and operative findings.Fifty-seven per cent of patients met criteria to be "no/low" risk for CBD stones (CBD diameter < 5 mm, normal liver enzymes, and no history of acute cholecystitis, jaundice, or pancreatitis); in these patients, cholangiograms were not obtained, and there was no clinical evidence of CBD stones observed in follow-up at 45 months (sensitivity = 100%). As techniques developed for laparoscopic CBD exploration, there was a decreased incidence of open cholecystectomy (p < 0.05) and preoperative ERC (p < 0.05). The rate of operative cholangiogram increased from 13% to 23% during the series (p < 0.01). There were no CBD injuries or late strictures. The only bile leak occurred from a peripheral segmental duct in the gallbladder bed and was resolved with a laparotomy and suture. There were no transfusions. Three retained stones were documented in patients who had false-normal operative cholangiograms.Criteria were defined that delineate a "no/low" risk group of LC patients for whom operative cholangiograms were not indicated for excluding CBD stones. The routine use of operative cholangiography as a means of preventing CBD injury was not substantiated by this study. The indications for preoperative ERC should continue to decrease as laparoscopic techniques evolve.The evaluation and management of known or suspected stones of the common bile duct in the era of minimal access surgery.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) has rapidly become the procedure of choice for symptomatic cholelithiasis. The perioperative diagnosis and modern treatment of suspected stones of the common bile duct (CBD) remains controversial. A database of 573 patients undergoing LC was compiled during an 11 month period. Sixty-seven patients (47 females, 20 males) (13 percent) were suspected of having CBD stones based upon clinical, laboratory and roentgenographic evidence. Fifty-two patients underwent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ER-CP) (45 preoperative and seven postoperative). Seventeen patients were studied with intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC). The indications for cholangiography (either ERCP or IOC) included pancreatitis (group 1), clinical history suggestive of CBD stones, but normal preoperative liver function tests (LFT) (group 2), cholangitis (group 3), grossly abnormal LFT (group 4) and dilated CBD (greater than 7 millimeters on sonogram) (group 5). The incidence of CBD stones was three of 14 (21 percent) in group 1, six of 20 (30 percent) in group 2, two of three (67 percent) in group 3, 16 of 26 (62 percent) in group 4 and two of four (50 percent) in group 5. Overall, 29 patients (23 females and six males) had stones retrieved from the CBD. Of the 52 ERCP, 20 endoscopic sphincterotomies were performed for documented CBD stones. Of the group that had pre-LC ERCP, three (6 percent) ultimately required an open procedure. There were three instances of post-ERCP pancreatitis (6 percent) and ERCP was not able to opacify or clear the CBD in four instances. Seven patients had postoperative ERCP with successful retrieval of retained CBD stones (100 percent). Of the 17 IOC, eight were positive--two patients underwent laparoscopic clearance of the CBD and six required conversion to an open procedure. There were no deaths or extensive complications. Total and direct bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and serum glutamic pyruvic transaminase were independently related to the presence of a CBD stone, while demographic data, past medical history, preoperative symptoms, leukocyte count, vital signs, amylase, serum glutamic-oxalacetic transaminase nuclear scintigraphic visualization of the duodenum or size of CBD on sonography, were not. No patient with biliary pancreatitis had CBD stones without abnormalities in the LFT or the preoperative sonogram. ERCP is a useful technique to clear the CBD pre-LC. However, ERCP in patients with biliary pancreatitis, but otherwise normal preoperative tests, has a low yield. In this group of patients, IOC is an appropriate alternative to pre-LC ERCP.A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.[Ultrasonic diagnosis of bile duct calculi. A prospective study regarding the effects and the objective and subjective factors on accuracy in choledocholithiasis].The reliability and diagnostic sensitivity of the sonographic identification of bile duct concrements is mainly determined by the examiner's competence and the size of the concrements, and secondly also by the diameter or patency of the bile ducts. Basing on the records of 175 patients on whom choledocholithiasis had been performed, a prospective study (reference: concrement removal after ERCP) showed that the sensitivity of the method is almost twice as high with an experienced examiner than with a less experienced physician (80% vs. 47%). In 231 other cases with extrahepatically conditioned cholestasis we found a 93% specificity of sonography in respect of excluding the presence of concrements. 93% of the concrements that were bigger than 10 mm were definitely diagnosed via sonography (71% sensitivity in case of concrements < 10 mm). If the proof of presence of concrements is differentiated according to bile duct width, it is seen that 85% of all concrements were visualised if the width of the ductus choledochus was > or = 8 mm and 71% in case of a width < 8 mm. The results of the study justify the use of sonography as a primary method in the diagnosis of concrements of the bile ducts; under certain conditions it is also possible to exclude the presence of stones. If findings do not agree with the clinical pattern of findings, or if the bile ducts cannot be visualised properly, diagnostic ERCP is indicated.Value of ultrasound and liver function tests in determining the need for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in unexplained abdominal pain.The value of serum liver function tests and abdominal ultrasound as screening tests of the need for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was determined in patients with unexplained abdominal pain without associated jaundice. In 1989 and 1990 1005 ERCPs were undertaken, of which 138 (14%) were for this indication. The duct or ducts of interest were delineated by ERCP in 95% of patients. The lesions found were bile duct stones in 10 patients, chronic pancreatitis in five, pancreatic carcinoma in one, peptic ulcer or duodenitis in four. A satisfactory ultrasound examination had been performed in 94% of patients. For chronic pancreatitis, its sensitivity was 60% and specificity 95%. For choledocholithiasis, the ultrasonic detection of duct dilatation or stones had a sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 86%. Of the liver function tests, the alkaline phosphatase was more sensitive (67%) than the transaminases (44%) in indicating the presence of bile duct stones and had a high specificity (95%). None of the 10 patients with duct stones had normal ultrasound and normal alkaline phosphatase. Thus it was found that demonstration of a normal common bile duct by abdominal ultrasound and normal serum alkaline phosphatase together have 100% specificity in excluding bile duct stones. Using such knowledge over the two year period of this study would have spared 36 patients the need for ERCP.[The role of clinical, biochemical and echographic data in identifying the biliary pathogenesis of acute pancreatitis].The role of clinical (biliary pain and/or jaundice), laboratory (discriminant function (DF) calculated using AST, ALT, AlkPh and GGT serum values) and ultrasonographic (US)(dilation and/or stone of common bile duct (CBD)) findings in identification of the biliary etiology of acute pancreatitis (AP) was studied in 60 patients. AP biliary etiology was defined by ERCP executed in the early phase of the disease (lithiasis and/or stenosis of CBD; endoscopic features of forced papilla in patients with gallstone). US showed the best values of sensitivity (84.6%) and diagnostic efficacy (76.7%); DF showed the best results of specificity (62.5%) and of test positive predictive value (92.8%). The statistical evaluation (McNemar test) showed a significant increase of sensitivity for US vs clinical findings and of specificity for DS vs clinical findings (p less than 0.05). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, test negative and positive predictive value were improved to 96.1, 87.5, 96.6, 77.1 and 92% by the combination of US and DF. Therefore the association of US and DF can provide the best non invasive method in rapidly detecting CBD pathology as an etiological factor in AP and then the enough accurate indication to early operative ERCP.Comparison of ultrasound and E.R.C.P. in the detection of the cause of obstructive biliary disease.The value of ultrasound (US) in determining the cause and site of biliary obstruction was critically evaluated and compared to endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERCP), in a prospective study performed on 120 consecutive patients. The final diagnosis was based on surgery, endoscopic retrograde cholangiography or a combination of other examinations. Ultrasound successfully differentiated obstructive from non obstructive jaundice in 96% of the patients, comparing well with the results ERCP. US correctly defined the cause of obstruction in 71% of the patients with ductal stones, in 90% of the patients with tumoural bile duct obstruction, but only in 59% of the patients with chronic pancreatitis.Reliability of ultrasonography in diagnosis of biliary lithiasis.Preoperative B-mode ultrasonograms of the biliary system in 302 patients with cholelithiasis confirmed operatively between March 1981 and December 1986 were analyzed retrospectively in contrast to the operative findings. The results showed that during 1985-1986 the sensitivity of ultrasonography (US) to detect stones in gallbladder (GB), extrahepatic bile duct (EHD) and intrahepatic bile duct (IHD) was 98.4%, 68.2% and 82.4% respectively, each was much higher than its counterpart during the periods 1981-1982 and 1983-1984 (P less than 0.01). The specificity of US in detecting GB, EHD and IHD stones was all over 90% during the latter two years. The observations made in the present study suggest that the accuracy of US has risen so significantly that it should be used as the first modality in diagnosing cholelithiasis, particularly cholecystolithiasis. It, however, should be supplemented with such tests as oral cholecystography, intravenous cholangiography, percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography (PTC), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) to establish a correct diagnosis when its interpretation is equivocal.[Selective intraoperative cholangiography].300 consecutive cholecystectomies performed from 1984 through 1986 were studied retrospectively to answer the following questions: which are suitable preoperative indicators for selective operative cholangiography, and which is the failure rate to detect biliary concrements by selective cholangiography? Patients with a history of jaundice, suspected concrements from preoperative intravenous cholangiography or ultrasound examination, a common bile duct wider than 8 mm, and elevated serum levels of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, ALAT (GPT) or ASAT (GOT) all had significantly higher rates of biliary concrements. Of these indicators, preoperative radiologic studies, serum levels of ALAT (GPT) and serum levels of alkaline phosphatase showed the best sensitivity, specificity as well as positive and negative predictive value. If two criteria, preoperative radiology and serum levels of ALAT (GPT), had been used, intraoperative cholangiography would have been performed in 34% of the cases. 82% of all biliary concrements would have been detected; in 3% of all cholecystectomies, the diagnosis of concrements would have been missed. We conclude that prospective studies should be performed to better define necessity and benefit of routine operative cholangiography still widely performed today.Pre-operative ultrasound measurement of bile duct diameter: basis for selective cholangiography.In this prospective study, prior to cholecystectomy, the diameter of the common hepatic duct was measured; duct size was then compared with probability of finding stones at operation. Of 115 patients entering the study, 36 had stones removed from the common duct at the time of cholecystectomy but only three (8%) were demonstrated by ultrasonography. No stones were found in ducts less than or equal to 3 mm in size (31% patients). Only two of 26 patients with ducts measuring 4 mm had stones. As duct size increased, so did the probability of stones and all patients with ducts greater than or equal to 9 mm in diameter had stones. It is concluded that pre-operative ultrasound provides a reliable basis for a policy of selective cholangiography.Ultrasound imaging of pancreas and biliary tract.Ultrasound and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) have been compared in the investigation of abnormalities of the pancreas and biliary tract. 208 patients undergoing ERCP were studied prospectively and all had an ultrasound examination in the 24 hours before ERCP. 15 patients had dilated bile-ducts for which no cause was seen on both ultrasound and ERCP; these patients were excluded. 120 of the remaining patients had an abnormal ERCP. In 101 ultrasound findings were in agreement (sensitivity 84%). 73 patients had a normal ERCP with ultrasound agreement in 70 (specificity 95%). The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasound is now such that patients can proceed directly to ERCP for diagnostic confirmation and papillotomy or endoprosthesis insertion where appropriate.Selective per-operative cholangiography and scoring method for selection.A prospective clinical study was undertaken over a period of 3 years on a series of 210 consecutive cases of gall stones to review a selective policy for per-operative cholangiography (PC). All patients had elective cholecystectomy and routine PC. A scoring method (SM) based on pre and per-operative surgical criteria was adopted to determine the necessity of PC before this was attempted. The study revealed that PC was indicated in 64 cases (30.5%) only. Of these 64 patients 20 had abnormal cholangiograms of which 18 proved positive on exploration. There were two false positive results (0.95%) of PC but no false negative result. Of 146 patients (69.5%) not clinically indicated for routine PC, 145 had normal cholangiograms and one had a small (5 mm diameter) silent stone (0.47%) in the Common Bile Duct (CBD). The scoring method failed to predict this case of silent stone. PC was technically unsatisfactory in 4 cases (1.9%). Thus by adopting the selective policy X-rays could have been avoided in 69.5% cases in which only a small silent stone would have been overlooked. However, this stone could have passed into the duodenum spontaneously or else it could have been removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy had it caused any symptoms. It is concluded that routine PC is not always necessary, a selective policy may be preferred and a scoring method may be used as a guide for selection of the cases.[Value of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of distal choledocolithiasis].We performed real time echotomographic studies in 203 patients with a clinical diagnosis of obstructive jaundice. All patients were operated on and a diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was established in 125. The same diagnosis had been made by echo in 69 of them for a 63% sensitivity rate. The specificity was 92% and the positive predictive value 93%. An improvement in sensitivity from 52 to 80% and in specificity from 91 to 94% along the 3 year study period was detected. This high yield of the echographic study, not widespread in the literature, may be attributed to a careful study of the intrapancreatic section of the common duct were 92% of the stones were found. Also, the experience and training of the radiologist performing the examination is essential.Accuracy of abdominal ultrasonography and the role of a second investigation in surgical obstructive jaundice.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography (US) was evaluated in delineating the site and cause of biliary obstruction in 59 patients of surgical obstructive jaundice (SOJ). A final analysis of the ultrasonographic data was carried out in 42 patients on whom laparotomy or endoscopic papillotomy with removal of common bile duct stones, confirmed the diagnosis. Evaluation of the role of second investigation following ultrasound in 28 patients (side-viewing endoscopy in 13, ERCP in 12 and PTC in 3) was also done to determine whether they provide any additional information over ultrasonography in delineating the exact level and etiology of biliary obstruction. US was done by the clinician who interpreted the findings in conjunction with the clinical profile of the patient. US correctly diagnosed SOJ in all 42 patients. In 26 of the 28 patients with distal CBD block (specificity 87.5%; sensitivity 100%) and in 14 out of 16 patients with proximal CBD block (specificity 100%; sensitivity 87.5%) US provided and accurate diagnosis of the site of obstruction. US was correct in diagnosing a malignant etiology in 26 out of 27 malignant cases whereas it accurately indentified the benign nature of biliary obstruction in 14 of the 15 patients of SOJ due to benign obstruction (specificity and sensitivity range 93.3% to 96.3%). A second investigation could correctly change the etiology and site of biliary obstruction in only 5 patients (17.9%) whereas in the remaining 23 patients (82.1%) it did not add any additional information over the US findings. Six out of fifteen patients (40%) who underwent cholangiography had cholangitis and in one severe septicemia led to death.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[Ultrasonography and biliary calculi: a retrospective study on the diagnostic reliability].The Authors evaluated diagnostic reliability of echotomography in biliary tract lithiasis, reviewing a series of 130 patients (out of 171) who were surgically treated; 30 had proved to be affected with biliary main tract stones. A high rate of false negatives was documented as related to the diagnosis of lithiasis of the main biliary duct.[Ultrasonics in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].The value of ultrasound in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis is controversial, sensitivity figures ranging from 22 to 75%. We correlated the ultrasound study with operative findings in 38 patients. A diagnosis of common bile duct stone was made upon finding an echogenic image with or without acoustic shadow in the common bile duct; no attention was paid to the dilatation of the biliary tree. The sensitivity was 68% and the positive predictive value was 85%. Therefore, our results approach the highest reported figures for the value of this diagnostic technique.Preoperative ultrasonic of common bile duct stones and its importance to surgical management--result of a prospective controlled trial.The biliary tract was examined by sonography in 192 nonselected surgical patients with clinically suspected gallbladder stone disease. This study was carried out to assess the potentiality of ultrasonic examination in the detection of common bile duct stones. All patients were operated on with sonographic monitoring during surgery. Common bile duct stones can be detected with high accuracy only in patients with an obstructive jaundice and a dilated common duct. In these, the sensitivity was found to be 70%, whereas that for the whole group of patients was as low as 28%. Accuracy in the ultrasonic detection of common bile duct stones is limited, and operative cholangiography seems to retain its position as the most reliable method of exploring common bile duct stones.Value of sonography in obstructive jaundice. Limitations of bile duct caliber as an index of obstruction.The diagnostic value of sonography was assessed in 176 patients with jaundice who had a final diagnosis on the basis of surgery, autopsy, liver biopsy, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, and serum tests positive for hepatitis A and B. Obstructive (n = 113) versus nonobstructive jaundice (n = 63) was diagnosed with a sensitivity of 91% and a specificity of 95%. Nine of the 10 false negatives had choledocholithiasis. Application of stricter criteria for common duct (CD) dilatation than the one used of CD greater than or equal to 8 mm to greater than or equal to 12 mm would have lowered the sensitivity from 91% to 84%. On the basis of these criteria the predicted level of obstruction would have shifted from distal to proximal in 36% of the patients. Choledocholithiasis was more often associated with decreasing bilirubin values than malignancy: 55% versus 9% (p less than 0.05). The present study indicates that intermittent obstruction, usually associated with choledocholithiasis, constitutes the main problem in detection of obstructive jaundice. Diameter criteria used for diagnosing dilatation of the CD may greatly influence sonographic accuracy.[The value of various imaging technics in the preoperative diagnosis of choledocholithiasis].In a retrospective study different methods of detecting choledocholithiasis-sonography, intravenous cholangiography, computed tomography and transhepatic cholangiography-have been compared to evaluate their accuracy. A total of 130 investigations in 93 patients were analysed. Choledocholithiasis could be predicted by sonography in 42.9%, by intravenous cholangiography in 60% and by transhepatic cholangiography in 85.7%. The overall accuracy rate with a single investigation was 51.6%. The combination of different methods increased the accuracy rate of 81.6%. We use sonography as the screening examination. In unclear cases transhepatic cholangiography has proven helpful in demonstrating choledocholithiasis. Only cholangiography, together with cholangioscopy, is performed intraoperatively. Due to high cost and limited availability, computed tomography should not be used as a basic examination.Serum transaminase levels and cholescintigraphic abnormalities in acute biliary tract obstruction.Twenty-five patients presenting to the hospital with symptoms suggestive of acute biliary tract disease were noted to have a characteristic pattern of transaminase and cholescintigraphic abnormalities. There was marked variability in the initial serum transaminase levels; however, 16 patients had aspartate aminotransferase levels greater than 300 IU, and 19 patients had alanine aminotransferase values greater than 300 IU. Regardless of the initial values, there was a 76% (aspartate aminotransferase) and 58% (alanine aminotransferase) reduction in transaminase levels within 72 hours, prior to therapeutic relief of bile duct obstruction. In ten patients with common bile duct obstruction, cholescintigraphy revealed no excretion of technetium Tc-99m-labeled iminodiacetic acid, for up to two hours after injection, into the extrahepatic biliary tract or small bowel. Common bile duct stones were present in 16 patients, five patients had acute pancreatitis, and four patients were thought to have spontaneously passed common duct stones. We believe that high transaminase levels may be found in patients with obstructive biliary tract disease, sequential measurements of transaminase levels may provide an important diagnostic clue for biliary tract disease, and nonexcretion of radionuclide on cholescintigraphy may be a feature of acute bile duct obstruction.[Sonographic diagnosis of bile duct calculi. Results of a prospective study of 222 cases of choledocholithiasis].To evaluate sonographic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledochal calculi 490 patients with cholestasis were examined prospectively with real-time scanner before ERCP or surgery. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 177 of 222 patients (sensibility 80%) and their absence in 242 of 268 (specificity 90%). Dilated extrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated via ultrasound in 84% of cases with choledocholithiasis, dilated intrahepatic bile ducts in 57%. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones.[Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones (an analysis of 112 cases)].The role of clinical and biochemical criteria and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the urgent diagnosis of common bile duct stones in acute pancreatitis.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria in predicting common bile duct (CBD) stones was analyzed in 76 patients with acute pancreatitis undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) during the same hospital admission. Forty patients had ERCP within 72 hours; cholangiography was successful in 92%. Fifty patients had biliary pancreatitis; 25 patients had CBD stones and all were successfully removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES). Twenty-six patients had nonbiliary pancreatitis. Two patients had complications from ERCP and/or ES; two patients died (no CBD stones) but ERCP was noncontributory. Significant differences were found between the biliary and nonbiliary disease groups with respect to age, and bilirubin. gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, alkaline phosphatase, alanine transaminase, and amylase levels. The first four factors also discriminated between those patients with and without CBD stones. Logistic discriminant functions were estimated providing probabilities for the presence of CBD stones for each patient but were too cumbersome for clinical use. A simple scoring system was devised on the basis of cut-off levels: bilirubin greater than or equal to 40 mumol/L, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase greater than or equal to 250 IU/L, alkaline phosphatase greater than or equal to 225 IU/L, and age greater than or equal to 70 years, indicating CBD stones. Bilirubin alone had a sensitivity and specificity of 80%; the specificity increased to 93% with all four factors. These results suggest that clinical and biochemical criteria and ERCP and/or ES may have important roles in the management of patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis.Ultrasound diagnosis of bile duct calculi.[Results of sonographic diagnosis of choledochal calculi].To evaluate sonographic accuracy in the diagnosis of choledochal calculi 44 patients were examined prospectively with a mechanical sector scanner before endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC). Calculi with a diameter of more than 1.5 cm could be detected in all cases. Smaller stones (less than 1 cm) were missed in 50% of cases. To quantitate sensitivity in daily clinical practice, the data of 229 patients, suspected to have common bile duct stones, were analysed retrospectively. The overall accuracy was 76%, 90% when an experienced sonographer performed the examination and 47% if the examiner was less experienced. From these data it is concluded that the sonographic detection of choledochal calculi is influenced by the examination technique, experience of the examiner and diameter of the stones.Ultrasonography in the diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice.Fifty consecutive patients (32 males and 18 females) with cholestatic jaundice were examined by grey-scale ultrasound from June 1981 to June 1983. All patients were studied without access to case notes. All patients had a diagnosis established by subsequent liver biopsy, clinical course, surgery or autopsy. Using the presence or absence of a dilated biliary system as the criterion, intrahepatic or extrahepatic cholestasis was correctly differentiated in 48 of the 50 patients, giving an overall accuracy of 96%. All 16 patients with intrahepatic cholestasis were correctly identified. Two of the 34 patients with extrahepatic cholestasis, each of whom had biliary stones, were misdiagnosed as intrahepatic cholestasis. In the 34 patients with extra-hepatic cholestasis, site of obstruction was defined in 55.9%, and specific aetiology diagnosed in 44.1%. Ultrasound proves to be an accurate method for the evaluation of cholestatic jaundice, and would have a definite value as a screening test before proceeding to invasive studies.Predictive ability of choledocholithiasis indicators.Ultrasound detection of choledocholithiasis: prospective comparison with ERCP in the postcholecystectomy patient.The role of ultrasound as a screening test for choledocholithiasis was prospectively assessed by comparing the results of upper abdominal ultrasound with direct cholangiography in 59 unselected symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 13 of 29 patients (sensitivity, 45%) and their absence in 29 of 30 (specificity, 97%). A positive ultrasound diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was correct 13 times out of 14 (predictive value, 93%) whereas a negative diagnosis was correct on only 29 of 45 occasions (predictive value, 64%). No significant learning effect was seen. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones. Duct stones were present in 25 of 35 patients shown to have a dilated common duct on ultrasound, and in 4 of 24 with nondilated ducts; the predictive value of duct dilatation at ultrasound for duct stones was therefore 71% and that of nondilatation in excluding stones was 83%. Dilated intrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated at ultrasound in only 17% of patients with choledocholithiasis. We conclude that ultrasound cannot reliably diagnose or exclude bile duct stones and is an inadequate screening test for the symptomatic postcholecystectomy patient.[The significance of preoperative and postoperative sonography for biliary tract surgery. A prospective study].112 patients with biliary calculi and destined for cholecystectomy were sonographically investigated in a prospective study carried immediately before the operation as well as between the third and fifth, and between the seventh and ninth postoperative day. Biliary calculi were sonographically detectable in 111 of the 112 patients (sensitivity 0.99). The sonographically measured bile duct diameter agreed well with the actual bile duct diameter (r = 0.898). There was a correlation between the bile duct diameter and the severity of the underlying biliary disease. A sonographic diagnosis was successful in 11 of 17 patients with choledocholithiasis (sensitivity 0.65) whereas 10 false positive diagnoses gave a specificity of 0.88. Gallbladder wall thickness above 4 mm had a sensitivity of 0.9 and a specificity of 0.72 for the detection of severe chronic or acute cholecystitis. A high rate (50%) of postoperative subhepatic fluid collections was a conspicuous finding but these were predominantly transient or only short-lived and attained clinical significance in only 7 out of 108 patients (6.5%).[Value of ultrasonic examination for detection of biliary calculi].[Value of sonography and intravenous cholangiography in preoperative choledochus diagnosis].[Value of echotomography for the diagnosis of lithiasis of the common bile duct].The accuracy of ultrasonography (US) for the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and for dilatation of the intra- and extra-hepatic biliary tree is well known. However, the value of US for the diagnosis of common bile duct stones remains poorly defined. We performed a prospective study in 100 patients who were referred for endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP); all the examinations were carried out by the same sonographist in the 24 h preceding the ERCP. Fifty patients had choledocholithiasis, 20 patients had obstruction of the bile ducts without lithiasis and the common bile duct (CBD) was free in 30 patients. The sensitivity of US for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was 40 p. 100, the specificity 90 p. 100. The positive and negative predictive values of the "CBD stone" sign was 80 p. 100 and 60 p. 100 respectively. In a total of 30 false negatives, the CBD could not be explored in 4 cases, dilatation of the CBD was missed in one case, and obstruction of the CBD by an other disease was diagnosed in 2; in all the other cases, US was able to appreciate the CBD size as well as the ERCP. In the 20 patients with an obstructed CBD but without choledocholithiasis, US diagnosed a stone in 5 cases. Age, serum bilirubin, existence of a previous cholecystectomy, technical difficulties, stone size were comparable in patients with true positive tests and in patients with false negative tests. However the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was more frequently achieved in patients with dilated CBD over 10 mm (p less than 0.05) and in patients with multiple stones.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Comparative accuracy of operative ultrasonography and cholangiography in detecting common duct calculi.Operative ultrasonography and operative radiographic cholangiography were compared for diagnostic effectiveness with regard to their ability to screen the common bile duct for the presence of calculi. We performed real-time B-mode ultrasonography and cholangiography using two injections of contrast material. In 350 patients, 349 ultrasonic and 285 cholangiographic examinations were performed with technically satisfactory results. The sensitivity, specificity, efficiency, and predictability of a negative test were at a high and comparable level for the two diagnostic procedures. However, the predictability of a positive test for ultrasonography of 91.8% was significantly greater (P less than 0.02) than the predictability of 73.2% for cholangiography. Since predictability of a positive test is based on common duct exploration rather than presumptive evidence of a clinical course, this test may be more valid than the other measures to determine diagnostic effectiveness. The advantages of ultrasonography, which are superior accuracy, favorable image qualities, reduced invasiveness, increased safety, avoidance of contrast material, and lower cost, were contrasted with the problems of ultrasonography, which included a slow learning curve for performance and interpretation of the technique and the limited availability of dedicated ultrasound equipment for surgical operations. We concluded that the advantages outweighed the problems and that operative ultrasonography of the common duct warrants wider application in clinical surgery.Ultrasonic evaluation of common bile duct stones: prospective comparison with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Ultrasound is the modality of choice for the diagnosis of cholelithiasis and for the evaluation of the intra- and extrahepatic biliary tree in the patient with jaundice, but its role in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis is less certain. We prospectively examined 90 patients who were to undergo endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) by performing right upper quadrant sonography immediately prior to ERCP. We assessed the size of the intra- and extrahepatic ducts and the presence or absence of calculi. ERCP, which was successfully performed in 77 of 94 attempted examinations, percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography, or surgical follow-up composed the diagnostic standard for comparison. Ultrasound was not accurate in the diagnosis (sensitivity, 25%) or exclusion (value of a negative study, 73%) of choledocholithiasis. Furthermore, in the postcholecystectomy patient population, ultrasound assessment of biliary duct size is not a useful predictor of biliary disease. For symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients, we recommend ERCP as the initial diagnostic modality.[Critical evaluation of echography in the diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice].Seventy one patients affected by cholestasis and jaundice were studied by means of ultrasound between september 1980 and february 1983 in order to evaluate the accuracy of this procedure in the investigation of the site of obstruction and its ethiology. The ultrasound findings were correlated with those obtained by opacification of the bile ducts, either endoscopic or percutaneous, and by surgery. The sonographic diagnosis of cholestatic jaundice was based on the size of the biliary tract taking in account that the intrahepatic branches are not evident in normal conditions and considering 4-5 mm and 7-8 mm as the upper limits for the proximal and distal segments of the common bile duct respectively. The accuracy of ultrasound in establishing the common bile duct size was 98%. Forty eight patients had extrahepatic obstruction, 45 of whom had a dilated common bile duct (94%), while 3 were normal (6%). Twenty two patients had an intrahepatic cholestasis, 20 of whom had a normal size of the common bile duct (91%) while 2 showed a dilatation (9%). Thus, the sensitivity was 95.7% and the specificity 86.9%. The ethiologic diagnosis was available in 31 patients with extrahepatic obstruction (65%) and in 7 with intrahepatic cholestasis (32%). Dilated common bile duct with stones and pancreas and gallbladder carcinoma were the most common causes of obstructions we have found in this group of patients. In patients with cholestasis and jaundice the ultrasonic diagnosis should establish the site of obstruction and, if it is possible, the ethiology.[Ultrasonics and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Correlation in biliopancreatic pathology].Preoperative bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and amylase levels as predictors of common duct stones.The predictive value of the preoperative level of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase and amylase as indicators of choledocholithiasis was determined by prospectively evaluating 304 consecutive patients undergoing cholecystectomy. Elevated levels of bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase are associated with an increased incidence of common duct stones, and the percentage incidence of stones increases with rising bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels. Alkaline phosphatase levels as great as 200 are associated with common duct stones in a low percentage of instances, being equivalent to that for unsuspected stones. Levels of 200 or greater are associated with a marked increase in the incidence of common duct stones. An elevated serum or urine amylase level, or both, is of little, if any, value as a predictor of common duct stones. Alkaline phosphatase appears to be a better indicator of common duct stones than does bilirubin, but neither bilirubin nor alkaline phosphatase in themselves are statistically significant indicators. Bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase in combination is a statistically significant predictor of common duct stones at all levels. The combination of a bilirubin level of greater than 3.0 and an alkaline phosphatase level of greater than 250 has a 76.2 per cent probability of an associated common duct stone. The quite important role of operative cholangiography in demonstrating unsuspected stones and in preventing unnecessary common duct explorations is reinforced.[The importance and value of pre-, intra- and postoperative roentgenologic biliary tract diagnosis].Exploration of the common bile duct--the relevance of the clinical picture and the importance of peroperative cholangiography.A series of 500 cholecystectomies performed over a 7-year period was reviewed retrospectively. The reliability of preoperative clinical features such as jaundice and pancreatitis was assessed in determining the presence of choledocholithiasis, and was found to be of limited value. Investigations such as intravenous cholangiography and liver function tests were found also to be inaccurate in the detection of common duct stones as was the appearance of the duct at operation. The usefulness of the peroperative cholangiogram in the detection of common duct stones that would otherwise have been overlooked is emphasized. Common duct stones would have remained undetected in 25 per cent of patients with choledocholithiasis. Despite the use of routine peroperative cholangiography common duct stones were overlooked in 11.25 per cent of patients who underwent exploration.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and gray-scale abdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of jaundice.Fifty-five patients with suspected obstructive jaundice were studied with both ERCP and abdominal ultrasound. Biliary tract obstruction was documented in 49 patients and parenchymal liver disease in 7. A definite cause of jaundice was demonstrated by ERCP in 45 of 49 patients with biliary tract obstruction but in only 28 of 49 patients by ultrasound. Bile duct dilatation, where present, was detected by ERCP in only 33 of 42 patients. ERCP was particularly effective in patients with common duct stones; common duct calculi and a dilated common duct were detected in 15 of 16 such patients. Dilated bile ducts where present were detected by ultrasound in 22 of 42 patients. Ultrasound was particularly helpful in patients with pancreatic cancer in whom a dilated common duct could not be opacified during ERCP. ERCP and abdominal ultrasound together provide a rapid and safe method of diagnosis in the jaundiced patient with suspected bile duct obstruction.[Upper-abdominal ultrasonography and ERCP? (author's transl)].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as well as upper-abdominal ultrasonography were performed on 134 patients. Organ structure was optimally demonstrated by ultrasonography in 94 patients (70.2%) and partially in 29 (21.6%) Comparing the diagnostic assessment in 62 patients who had undergone 73 tests and had subsequently been operated on (57) or examined post-mortem (5) there was a statistically significant advantage of ERCP in diseases in which the choledochal duct had been involved. The method was successful in 95% of cases of choledocholithiasis (20 cases) compared with 45% by ultrasound and in 85% of cases of gall-bladder carcinoma which also involved the choledochal duct (38% by ultrasound). In clinically manifest carcinoma of the head of the pancreas (9 cases) and cholecystolithiasis (19 cases) ultrasonography provided the correct diagnosis in 89%, while the results for ERCP were 56% and 74%, respectively.Abnormal liver function tests in acute cholecystitis; the predicting of common duct stones.In a prospective series of 155 patients with acute cholecystitis preoperative liver function tests were determined with the aim of predicting the presence of common duct stones. Elevated serum bilirubin, aminotransferases and alkaline phosphatase levels were observed in 32, 34 and 22% of cases, respectively. The frequency of common duct stones was 17.4%. The sensitivity of bilirubin and aminotransferases with regard to ductal stones was higher (70-81%), but alkaline phosphatase showed the best predictive values (46%). The probability of common duct stones increased with higher degrees of elevation in the case of alkaline phosphatase, but not in the case of bilirubin or aminotransferases, A frequency of 31-67% of choledocholithiasis was found when one or all of the tests were positive. After random assignment the patients were operated on early or after delay. In the delayed surgery group more failures occurred in the conservative treatment of acute cholecystitis if the tests were elevated (36%) than if normal (15%, p less than 0.05). The frequencies of common duct stones were 11 and one in these groups (p less than 0.001). There was no increase in postoperative morbidity after early surgery (15%) compared with delayed surgery (22%, p greater than 0.1), when liver function was disturbed. Liver function tests thus allow patients with common duct stones to be selected for early surgery in acute cholecystitis.Grey scale ultrasonography: evaluating the jaundiced patient.Over a period of one year, 75 patients with jaundice were evaluated by grey scale ultrasonography. Intravenous cholangiography was attempted in 26 instances (bilirubin value greater than 4.3 mg/100 ml) and was diagnostic in only four. Ultrasound, on the other hand, was diagnostic for surgical jaundice in 62 of the 75 cases (82%). In 52 of the 62 patients a cause for the extrahepatic obstruction was demonstrated: 40 had cholelithiasis and choledocholithiasis, and 12 had tumors (11 pancreatic tumors, one lymphoma). In the remaining ten instances, obstruction was sonographically demonstrated but the cause was not. Of these, four patients were subsequently proven to have distal common duct stones, five had carcinoma of the pancreas and one had cholangiocarcinoma. This evidence indicates that ultrasound should be the noninvasive procedure of choice in the clinical assessment of obstructive jaundice.Clinical indications and accuracy of gray scale ultrasonography in the patient with suspected biliary tract disease.One hundred patients with suspected biliary tract disease underwent gray scale cholecystosonography (GSCS) and had diagnostic confirmation by oral cholecystogram (OCG) and/or operation. Ultrasonography demonstrated the gallbladder in 94 of the 100 patients; 2 patients had had previous cholecystectomy and 3 of the 4 remaining patients had documented stones with no confirmation of a nonvisualizing OCG in the other patient. Among the 88 patients with OCG, GSCS findings correlated in 91 per cent (2 per cent false-positive; 7 per cent false-negative). Among the 43 operative patients, GSCS was proven correct in 91 per cent (no false positive; 9 per cent false-negative). Of 12 patients with jaundice GSCS correlated with operative findings in 75 per cent (no false-positive; 25 per cent false-negative). Diagnostic errors occurred in patients with very small biliary calculi, particularly when a single stone was impacted in the cystic duct. Failure to identify the gallbladder with ultrasound signifies probable cholelithiasis in the patient without previous cholecystectomy. On the basis of this experience, we conclude that (1) GSCS is most useful when jaundice or acute illness precludes conventional studies; (2) GSCS provides an inexpensive, quick, accurate means of diagnosing cholelithiasis with a very high specificity (97 per cent) and moderate sensitivity (88 per cent); and (3) GSCS is the optimal diagnostic procedure for evaluating the biliary tract in the acutely ill, jaundiced, vomiting, allergic, and/or pregnant patient.Diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Relations between historical, laboratory, operative, and peroperative roentgen data.[VALUE OF THE LIVER FUNCTION TESTS IN SURGERY OF THE BILIARY TRACT].